 Georgia-Pacific Corp., Atlanta, said it adopted a shareholder rights plan to protect against "partial tender offers and other abusive tactics."  The company's chairman and chief executive officer, T. Marshall Hahn Jr., said the plan "isn't being adopted in response to any effort to acquire control" of the forest-products concern.  Rather, he said, Georgia-Pacific wants to guard against efforts to gain control of the company "without paying all shareholders a fair price for their shares."  Under the plan, preferred stock purchase rights will be distributed as a dividend at the rate of one right for each common share held.  Rights will be distributed to holders of record at the close of business Aug. 10 and expire after 10 years.  The New Jersey Supreme Court declined to hold the makers of a vaccine for children collectively liable for injuries arising from inoculations.  A number of manufacturers have stopped producing the drug, and the court feared that the threat of collective liability might drive the last two makers of the drug out of the market and threaten the vaccine's availability.  The court also ruled that it would not adopt the collective-liability theory, known as "market share," because an alternative compensation plan passed by Congress already provides adequate relief for plaintiffs injured by vaccines.  Under a market-share theory, each company that manufactured the product could be held liable for damages in proportion to its share of the national market at the time the product was used.  This case was the first time that New Jersey's top court ruled on the issue of collective liability for manufacturers.  A doctor in an earlier case before the court was found not liable for malpractice after he administered the vaccine to a child.  Three states' highest courts have adopted the theory in cases involving DES, a drug that was often prescribed for pregnant women to reduce the chances of miscarriage.  The drug later was linked to cervical cancer in the plaintiffs' daughters.  In asbestos litigation, courts largely have rejected the theory, in part because of substantial differences in the manufacturers' products, said Jay P. Mayesh, a lawyer who has represented companies in those suits.  The current case involves the combined diptheria-pertussis-tetanus vaccine, known as DPT.  In 1972, Deanna Marrero was inoculated with DPT shortly before her second birthday.  Within 24 hours, her mother noticed that Deanna, now 18, was in severe pain.  She has been diagnosed as being brain-damaged and severely retarded.  The Marreros did not file their suit until 1985, when they learned of a link between the DPT vaccine and Deanna's medical condition, said Michael Hugo, an attorney for the Marreros.  By that time, they no longer could determine which company was responsible for manufacturing the dose that the Marreros allege harmed Deanna.  The vaccination can cause permanent neurological damage, seizures, and death, Mr. Hugo said.  A safer DPT vaccination was available at the time, he said, but it was not manufactured because it cost more to make.  The manufacturers in the case, including Lederle Laboratories, a division of American Cyanamid Co.; Eli Lilly & Co.; and Wyeth Laboratories, a division of American Home Products Corp., argued that New Jersey law requires that plaintiffs prove the identity of the manufacturer of the harmful product.  Lederle is the only defendant in the case that currently manufactures the DPT vaccine.  J. Peter Coll Jr., an attorney for Lederle at Donovan Leisure Newton & Irvine, said that unlike many vaccines, medical authorities do not agree on the risks associated with DPT.  Most states, including New Jersey, require all children to receive the vaccination before beginning elementary school, he said.  In 1986, Congress passed the National Childhood Vaccine Injury Act, under which plaintiffs injured by vaccines administered before Oct. 1, 1988, can collect as much as $30,000 for rehabilitation costs and other expenses if they withdraw any lawsuits they may have filed.  A person who is injured after that date first must make a claim under the act before he or she can file a suit.  Accepting compensation under the act precludes the plaintiff from filing a suit.  The act, designed to minimize the number of suits against manufacturers and help plaintiffs recover some damages, is funded by a tax on childhood vaccines.  Mr. Hugo, attorney for the Marreros, said about 150 claims concerning DPT are pending under the act.  The New Jersey Supreme Court emphasized that its ruling on collective liability applied only to vaccines and said it would be willing to consider adopting a collective-liability theory in other instances.  Paul Rheingold, a New York plaintiffs' lawyer in cases involving DES, said that the court's decision leaves the collective-liability theory open to plaintiffs in about 50 DES cases pending in New Jersey.  In a dissent, Justice Daniel O'Hern argued that the decision's scope was unclear.  He said it might make it more difficult for children who develop defects from other drugs to recover compensation for their injuries.  In addition, he said, the court's decision deprived Deanna Marrero of any way to recover funds because by not withdrawing her suit before a judgment was reached, Ms. Marrero now is ineligible to file a claim under the congressional act.  A weather-related rally as well as concern over the alleged killing of a U.S. hostage in the Middle East drove oil prices higher.  By late yesterday, six major oil producers in the Gulf of Mexico -- Exxon Corp., Mobil Corp., Conoco Inc., Texaco Inc., Chevron Corp. and Shell Oil Co., a unit of Royal Dutch/Shell Group -- had either evacuated their personnel from platforms in the northwestern sector of that body of water or limited output after a tropical depression was upgraded to Tropical Storm Chantal.  The Louisiana Offshore Oil Port, where most foreign oil imports are delivered, was also closed down.  The storm was expected to attain hurricane force and slam into the Texas coast near Galveston sometime today, weather experts said.  Crude-oil prices rose in anticipation of lost production, while gasoline prices climbed because of concern that refineries located along the coast could be damaged by the storm.  Any loss of gasoline production would be critical because of heavy demand for that product during the summer driving season.  Reports that a radical Iranian group hanged a U.S. Marine officer when its demand for the release of a kidnapped Moslem cleric wasn't met shook the market as well.  "There was a flurry of buying when that news hit the wires," said Mary Haskins, a broker for Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.  Additional reports that a second U.S. hostage could meet a similar fate within 24 hours made traders question whether turmoil in the Mideast, where the bulk of the world's oil is produced, might again involve the U.S.  Many strategists see this as President Bush's first real test in a crisis.  Crude oil for delivery during September rose 38 cents a barrel, to $18.31.  Gasoline prices for August climbed 0.53 cent, to 53.48 cents a gallon.  Heating oil for the same month increased by 0.44 cent to finish at 48.67 cents a gallon.  Yesterday's action reversed six consecutive days of falling prices.  A barrel of crude oil declined in value by almost $2 during the past two weeks as it became apparent that production by members of the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries was exceeding the quota the cartel set at its meeting in June.  "The market has been hungering for bullish news," said Michael Rothman, senior energy analyst for Merrill Lynch Capital Markets Inc.  But most market strategists expect the rally to be short-lived.  Peter Leavitt, executive vice president of Weather Services Corp. in Bedford, Mass., said that unless the storm intensifies sharply before it hits land, damage to offshore rigs shouldn't be serious.  According to the weather patterns he sees, he predicts offshore workers could return to their rigs by late Wednesday.  "Over the last few years, prices have tanked (fallen sharply) after every major storm," Mr. Rothman added.  For at least the next few weeks, Mr. Rothman sees an overabundant supply of crude oil.  Preliminary figures for July, when OPEC members promised to comply with their new accord, show they have been pumping 21.5 million barrels of crude daily, two million more than the quota ceiling of 19.5 million.  "The demand just isn't there" to absorb that output, he said.  In other U.S. commodity markets yesterday:  COPPER: Futures prices ended higher after trading over a range of five cents a pound.  The September contract settled at $1.115 a pound, up 2.10 cents.  At one point, September traded as low as $1.076 before recovering to the high of the day of $1.126.  Weakness in the dollar and a recovery in precious metals also gave a positive tone to copper, one analyst said.  The market became technically strong after reaching the day's low, the analyst said.  Demand appeared when the September price fell to near $1.07 a pound, which was regarded as a key support point.  A bigger-than-expected rise in London Metal Exchange inventories of copper contributed to early weakness, analysts said.  LME supplies last week rose 5,275 tons to 73,150 tons.  An increase of about 1,000 to 2,000 tons was expected.  Another analyst said the continuing work stoppage at Highland Valley mines in British Columbia, a major Canadian producer, was becoming critical.  If the walkout, which began July 9, isn't over by the end of this week, there could be a disruption of supplies and possibly a declaration of force majeure, he said.  Force majeure is a contract clause that legally excuses a supplier if it fails to deliver sufficient quantities of materials because of factors beyond its control.  But because both sides made some concessions in recent talks, the analyst said, a negotiator indicated there might be reason for at least one further session.  A meeting is set for today.  PRECIOUS METALS: Futures prices rose on a weaker dollar and increased tensions in the Middle East.  Gold for August delivery was up $3.50 an ounce to $370.50, while September silver advanced 13 cents an ounce to $5.313.  October platinum was $7.90 an ounce higher at $502.70.  Silver was the star performer among the metals.  The September contract, after dropping to a life-of-contract low of $5.135 an ounce Friday, declined further to $5.125 yesterday.  But its decline lacked follow-through, triggering demand that brought about a recovery.  In addition to technical demand and the easier dollar, the reported execution of U.S. Marine Lt. Col. William Higgins by his Shiite captors created a market-supporting influence, analysts said.  One analyst said a decline in interest rates as reflected by higher bond prices also helped the metals.  But another said the dollar is the key to the precious-metals market, and because political tensions also tend to strengthen the U.S. currency, yesterday's dollar weakness might be short-lived.  GRAINS & SOYBEANS: The prices of most corn and soybean futures contracts fell to life-of-contract lows during at least part of the trading session as heavier-than-expected weekend rains further raised the prospects of near-normal harvests this fall.  "It is a greenhouse out there," said Victor Lespinasse, a floor broker with Dean Witter Reynolds, Chicago.  "On the whole, we have really ideal growing conditions."  Because of recent rains, the price of some soybean futures contracts have touched new lows for five of the past six trading sessions.  Some corn futures contracts have also set new life-of-contract low prices during four of the past six trading sessions.  It isn't clear at what level prices will stabilize as traders grow more confident about the chances of normal harvests this fall.  Futures prices have swung wildly all year on rainfall reports because the 1988 drought exhausted the supply of subsoil moisture that the soybean and corn crops draw on during dry spells.  Some meteorologists expect more widespread rain over the Midwest later this week.  The rainy forecasts overshadowed speculation that railroad workers in the Soviet Union might strike, which would disrupt that country's ability to import crops from the U.S.  COFFEE: Selling continued to depress futures prices.  The September contract declined 3.03 cents a pound, to 78.99 cents.  Since June 9, the September contract has fallen 46.91 cents a pound, or 37%, as producing and consuming nations in the International Coffee Organization have failed to reach a new pricing and export-controlling pact to replace the one that will expire Sept. 30.  The decline was accelerated when the ICO suspended export quotas and created a free market early July.  Since then, there has been a rush by many producing countries to sell as much coffee as they could, causing prices to tumble.  One New York coffee importer and dealer says the situation could prompt new attempts to reach an international agreement and the reimposition of quotas.  However, he said, "There has been no effort on the part of major producing countries to encourage such talks."  Representatives from Colombia, Brazil and Mexico met in Cartagena, Colombia, during the weekend, but there was no indication of whether the talks made any progress, the dealer said.  One analyst said the market is vastly oversold but that while it is still under pressure from so much producer selling, technical factors haven't been able to take hold.  A one-week meeting of the Council of the ICO is set to begin Sept. 25, but there isn't yet much expectation in the market that an agreement will be reached.  Even if an accord is reached, an analyst said, it could be six months before implementing legislation is passed that would permit the U.S. to function as a member of the agreement.  The state government of Western Australia moved to dissolve a partnership with Bond Corp. Holdings Ltd. that was formed to develop a one billion Australian dollar (US$765.5 million) petrochemical project.  Bond Corp., flagship of entrepreneur Alan Bond, said it will fight the action in court.  The government plans to shut down Petrochemical Industries Ltd., a company developing the plant, and then restructure the project so it can proceed.  It suggested it wants Bond Corp.'s involvement reduced in part because bankers are reluctant to finance the project while the company holds a major stake.  Bond Corp. owns 49.9% of the project, the state government 43.75% and Zoltan Merszei, a former top official at Dow Chemical Co., 6.35%.  Peter Dowding, state premier, said a "dramatic decline in Bond Corp.'s public position" has affected the project.  Bond Corp. and Mr. Bond have faced adverse publicity over several business transactions this year.  Citing brisk gains in overseas markets, Bridgestone Corp., a Japanese tire manufacturer, said net income rose 13% in the first half of this year, to 19.21 billion yen ($138 million) from 17 billion yen a year before.  Sales increased 15%, to 334.56 billion yen ($2.4 billion) from 291.38 billion, setting a record for any six-month period.  Pretax profit was up 19% to 40.82 billion yen from 34.35 billion yen.  Contributing to the strong first-half results were foreign sales of 109.1 billion yen, a 35% gain from 80.6 billion yen a year earlier.  Bridgestone said sales "significantly" improved in the U.S., Europe and the Middle East.  The company, which acquired Firestone Tire & Rubber Co. of the U.S. last year, said its domestic sales rose only 7%, to 225.5 billion yen from 210.7 billion yen.  Italian automaker Fiat S.p.A. said it is holding talks with Maserati, a small Italian car manufacturer, to launch an "industrial production agreement."  Fiat didn't specify the nature or possible terms of the agreement, but Italian press reports said the two companies are discussing ways to exchange production and assembly capacities.  Fiat denied reports it would take a shareholding in Maserati, which is 51%-owned by De Tomaso Industries Inc.  MCN Corp. expects to report that second-quarter net income was down slightly from $2.8 million, or 14 cents a share, a year earlier, Chairman Alfred R. Glancy III said.  "It will be down a little bit, not much, primarily because of our new rate structure," Mr. Glancy said in an interview.  Last December, Michigan regulators reduced rates paid by the natural gas utility holding company's industrial customers and increased rates paid by residential and small-business customers.  Mr. Glancy said the change made MCN's income more subject to seasonal variations.  As a result, it had a $10 million earnings increase in the first quarter that it expects will be mostly offset by a decline in the third quarter.  William K. McCrackin, MCN's vice chairman and chief financial officer, said the company still considers "reasonable" analysts' estimates of full-year earnings of $2 to $2.25 a share.  Last year, MCN had net of $44.6 million, or $2.17 a share, after a nonrecurring loss of $3.1 million, or 15 cents a share, on bond redemptions.  MCN recently signed up a subsidiary of Shell Oil Co. as a user of its proposed 125-mile Saginaw Bay natural gas pipeline.  Altogether, MCN has commitments to use the Saginaw Bay pipeline from about two-thirds of the producers in the region.  The $40 million Saginaw Bay project still needs state approval, and there are two competing proposals for a pipeline.  The company expects a staff recommendation to come in late August.  Mr. McCrackin said that if the project wins approval, it will add an estimated 5% to 10% to earnings.  Mr. Glancy said the earliest the pipeline could begin operating is the fourth quarter of next year.  Pegasus Gold Inc. reported that second-quarter net income dropped 61% to $2.8 million, or 12 cents a share.  Sales increased to $47.8 million from $45.4 million.  A year earlier, Pegasus earned $7 million, or 30 cents a share.  The mining concern attributed the earnings slide to higher costs at its Montana Tunnels mine complex.  In addition, production was down at its Zortman/Landusky mine, partly because of heavy rainfall during the quarter.  For the six months, Pegasus earned $4.5 million, or 19 cents a share, down 48% from year-earlier profit of $8.7 million, or 37 cents a share.  Sales rose to $78.2 million from $72.8 million.  Ball Corp. said it named 54-year-old Delmont A. Davis as president and chief operating officer, and William L. Peterson, 59, to the new post of vice chairman, effective Aug. 1.  The maker of packaging, industrial and aerospace products said the action was prompted by the imminent retirement of its chairman and chief executive officer, Richard M. Ringoen who will reach the mandatory retirement age of 65 in 1991.  Under the company's bylaws, he can continue as chairman until the age of 70.  Mr. Davis, who succeeds Mr. Ringoen as president, most recently served as executive vice president, packaging products.  The post of chief operating officer has been vacant for more than a decade, a Ball spokesman said.  Mr. Peterson, formerly executive vice president, continues as chief financial officer.  Central Banking System Inc., whose main unit is under a government order to boost its capital, reported a net loss of $9.7 million for the second quarter.  The commercial banking concern cited losses in the consumer-loan portfolio of the unit, Central Bank.  It said it added $4.5 million in the quarter to its loan-loss reserve, primarily for bad consumer debt.  In the year-earlier quarter, Central Banking had a net loss of $14.9 million.  For the first six months of 1989, it had a loss of $12.9 million, compared with a year-earlier loss of $14.4 million.  The second-quarter loss cut the concern's net worth -- its assets minus its liabilities -- to $14.5 million.  It stood at $52.9 million a year earlier.  Central Banking said it has booked a $14 million gain in the current quarter from the sale of its auto-financing subsidiary for $131 milion to a unit of ABQ Corp., Albuquerque, N.M.  But it said it is still seeking ways of boosting capital for the unit, indicating it remains considerably short of a federal regulators' requirement that it build primary capital to $85 million or 7.5% of assets, whichever is greater, by Aug. 17.  The company didn't disclose the current level of primary capital, and officials couldn't be reached to comment, but assets were $1.1 billion as of June 30.  As of March 31, it had primary capital of only $66 million.  Southmark Corp. said it changed the bylaws of National Heritage Inc. through written consents, preventing National Heritage from restructuring without shareholder approval.  Southmark and one of its units own about 62.5% of National Heritage, and the executives of the two companies are locked in a battle over who will control the health-care management concern.  Southmark has asked National Heritage for a majority of the seats on National Heritage's board, but the health-care concern has refused and said it will "pursue all available means" to keep control of the company from changing.  Southmark said that through a majority of shareholder consents, it changed National Heritage's bylaws to force the company to seek shareholder approval for its planned spinoff of a National Heritage unit that holds about 77% of National Heritage's assets.  National Heritage had said the restructuring didn't require holder approval.  Southmark also amended bylaws to keep National Heritage from further diluting its stake.  A few weeks ago, National Heritage issued about 800,000 stock options to about three dozen employees and provided loans to allow the options to be exercised.  The move reduced Southmark's total stake to about 62.5% from 66%.  National Heritage couldn't be reached to comment on Southmark's move.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading Friday, National Heritage fell 12.5 cents to $3.  Separately both companies said that a state judge in Dallas dissolved a temporary restraining order prohibiting a Southmark unit from moving to replace National Heritage's board.  Southmark is expected to try to eliminate National Heritage's staggered board and nominate a slate of directors for National Heritage's annual meeting, scheduled for Aug. 31.  MMR Holding Corp. Chairman James B. Rutland, convicted earlier this year of bid-rigging and mail fraud, was sentenced to six months in jail and 400 hours of community service work.  Mr. Rutland was also ordered to pay a $103,000 fine and given five years' probation.  The company's MMR Corp. unit was fined $1 million for its role in the case.  A spokesman for MMR Holding, a mechanical and electrical contracting concern, said the company plans to appeal the penalties.  Mr. Rutland, also president and chief executive officer of the company, will continue to run the company while the matter is on appeal.  Through the spokesman, Mr. Rutland refused comment.  Mr. Rutland and MMR Corp. were convicted in May of conspiring with Fischbach & Moore Corp., a unit of Fischbach Corp. of New York, to submit collusive, non-competitive, rigged bids or no bids at all on electrical work to be performed at Cajun Electric Power Cooperative Inc.'s Big Cajun No. 2 power plant.  Neither Fischbach Corp., an electrical and mechanical contracting concern, nor the Fischbach & Moore unit were indicted in connection with the case in exchange for their cooperation in other bid-rigging investigations, according to a U.S. Justice Department official.  SmartCard International Inc.'s founder and chairman, Arlen R. Lessin, resigned to form a technology consulting and analysis firm, Lessin Group Inc.  Mr. Lessin, SmartCard's largest single shareholder with 15%, will remain on its board.  SmartCard makes a credit card-sized computer that is used as an access card for bank transactions, computer access and other purposes.  Nicholas Mihalas, SmartCard's 51-year-old president and chief executive officer, was named to the additional post of chairman, succeeding Mr. Lessin, whose resignation was effective last Monday.  The 60-year-old Mr. Lessin said his new firm, which, like SmartCard, will be based here, will concentrate on introducing new technologies in security systems, artificial intelligence, and voice and video response, among other areas.  Mr. Lessin is chairman and president of Lessin Group.  Joining him as vice chairman will be Richard Lopata, 63, who resigned recently as vice chairman of SmartCard.  Mr. Lessin said he expects Lessin Group to employ as many as 30 associates.  McDonnell Douglas Corp. received a $691.4 million Air Force contract for four C-17 aircraft.  RAM Systems, based in Ottobrunn, West Germany, received a $69 million Navy contract in pre-production funds for a shipboard missile.  Allied-Signal Inc. received a $25 million Army contract for missile fuses.  Grumman Corp. won an $18 million Navy contract for C-2A aircraft.  Honeywell Inc. received a $14.3 million Army contract for communications terminals.  Saco Defense Inc. got a $13.5 million Army contract for grenade machine guns.  Bendix Corp. received a $13.5 million Navy contract for acoustic decoys.  General Electric Co. was given $11.1 million in contracts for Army transmission systems and Air Force engine support.  Unisys Corp. received a $10.3 million Air Force contract for software.  Media General Inc. said it named J. Stewart Bryan III, 51-year-old vice chairman and executive vice president of the cable television, broadcasting and newspaper company, to the additional post of chief operating officer, filling a vacancy.  Marshall N. Morton, 44, was elected a senior vice president, with responsibilities in finance and data processing.  He had been vice president and controller at West Point-Pepperell Inc.  Basil Snider, 62, was elected a vice president with responsibility for Media General's newsprint holdings in New Jersey, Mexico and Georgia.  James A. Linen IV, who died in early July, had held those responsibilities.  Mr. Snider had been president of the Garden State Paper Co. subsidiary.  David L. Jordan, 51, formerly a vice president, was named senior vice president and remains responsible for staff and media relations.  Paul E. Freiman, president and chief operating officer, was named to the additional position of chief executive officer.  The move was expected.  Mr. Freiman, 55 years old, succeeds Albert Bowers, who will retain his position as chairman of the drug maker.  Mr. Bowers, 59, said earlier this year that he intended to lighten his duties at Syntex because of health problems.  Comprehensive Care Corp. said it received a revised merger proposal from First Hospital Corp. after Comprehensive Care posted a $5.1 million net loss in its fourth quarter.  The new proposal would significantly reduce the amount that Comprehensive Care shareholders would get in the transaction.  The two companies agreed in April to form a new publicly traded health care concern specializing in chemical dependency and psychiatric treatment.  Holders of Comprehensive Care's 10.1 million common shares were to receive $5 for each of their shares, $2.50 of 12-year, 14 3/4% senior subordinated notes and three-quarters of a common share in the new company.  The new proposal would lower the cash portion of the offer to $3 a share and the note portion, to $2.50 of 12-year senior subordinated notes with a 10% interest rate increasing to 15 1/2% in the fourth year.  The revisions would decrease the transaction's indicated value to about $55 million from $76 million -- excluding the value of the stock in the new concern that Comprehensive Care shareholders would receive.  Comprehensive Care said it is considering the amended proposal.  For the quarter ended May 31, the company's revenue fell 5% to $51.4 million, including a $2.4 million, pretax write-down related to the pending sale of its corporate headquarters and about $1.3 million of costs associated with the proposed merger.  For the year, Comprehensive Care had net income of $502,000, or five cents a share, compared with net of $8.8 million, or 88 cents a share.  Revenue rose 9%, to $211.6 million.  Comprehensive Care develops, markets and operates chemical dependency and psychiatric programs, primarily under the CareUnit name.  First Hospital, a closely held concern based in Norfolk, Va., owns and operates 10 psychiatric facilities and three substance abuse facilities.  Ralph K. Packard was named senior vice president and chief financial officer of this investment concern, and James H. Gately was named senior vice president, institutional.  Mr. Packard, formerly a vice president, succeeds John J. Brennan, who was elected president of Vanguard in May.  Mr. Gately, formerly executive vice president of Prudential Affiliated Investors, fills a vacancy created by a retirement last year.  Nemir Kirdar, president and chief executive officer of Investcorp, was elected a director of this retailer, increasing the board to seven members.  Clermont Matton was named executive vice president of the Schlumberger Technologies group of the oil-services company.  He succeeds Michel Gouilloud, who was named executive vice president of the company's development strategy for Europe and the Soviet Union.  Mr. Matton had been executive vice president of the water and gas division of the Schlumberger Industries group.  Numac Oil & Gas Ltd. adopted a so-called poison pill and put itself up for sale, in an apparent effort to prevent Toronto's Bronfman family from gaining effective control of the company.  Numac said it hired Goldman, Sachs & Co. to help explore ways to maximize the value of its shares, "including a sale or merger of the company."  Numac shares closed at $8.50, up 12.5 cents, in composite trading Friday on the American Stock Exchange, giving the company an indicated market value of about $216.8 million.  The company has 25.5 million common shares outstanding.  Numac said 33.3% of its shares are held by Enfield Corp. of Toronto, which is fighting over seats on the Enfield board with companies controlled by Edward and Peter Bronfman.  A Numac spokesman declined to say whether the company's measures were aimed at the Bronfmans, but said, "It is clear that the apparent uncertainty over control of Enfield was something the directors had to consider."  Though Numac appeared to be concerned that the Bronfmans might gain control of the company by indirect means, it left the door open to a Bronfman offer.  "We will be inviting serious proposals from all investors, whether they are already Numac shareholders or not," it said.  "The rights plan is simply intended to provide for equal treatment of all shareholders."  Manfred Walt, president of Bronfman-controlled Canadian Express Ltd., said the conflict about its representation on Enfield's board isn't an effort to gain control of Numac.  He said Canadian Express would support any plan that maximizes the value of Numac shares, as long as Enfield gets "a chance to get back its carrying costs of 14 {Canadian} dollars {US$11.84} a share."  He defined carrying costs as the price Enfield paid for the shares, plus interest since they were bought.  Numac said its shareholder rights plan was a temporary measure designed to prevent "interference," while it looks for a buyer or other alternatives.  It said the plan expires after four months, may be extended by the board for two additional months and requires holder approval for any further extension.  Numac said the plan would be triggered if any party acquired 10% or more of Numac's common shares outstanding or if an existing holder of a 10% stake raised this holding by one percentage point or more.  Numac said Enfield is the only holder with a stake of 10% or more.  If the plan were triggered, Numac said, it would permit holders other than the would-be acquirer to purchase Numac shares at 50% of the market price.  Numac had 1988 earnings of C$5.3 million, or 21 Canadian cents a share, on revenue of C$43.2 million.  Cash flow -- earnings plus depreciation allowances -- was C$25.7 million, or C$1.01 a share.  The company owns reserves of uranium, as well as oil and gas.  James L. Pate was named executive vice president of this oil company.  Mr. Pate, 53 years old, formerly was senior vice president, finance.  Trustcorp Inc. said it has taken a $96.6 million pretax charge against second-quarter earnings as part of an effort to clean up its balance sheet before merging with Society Corp.  The charge, an increase in loan-loss reserves largely related to losses on downtown Toledo real estate loans, resulted in a net loss of $88.6 million for the period, compared with net income of $12.4 million, or 77 cents a share, a year earlier.  The troubled Toledo bank holding company also said it won't pay a dividend for the second quarter and will probably suspend future dividends.  If the merger with Society goes through, current Trustcorp shareholders will receive dividends declared by Society, based in Cleveland, Ohio.  Trustcorp's last dividend was 37.5 cents, paid April 20.  Trustcorp's chairman, Chester Devenow, said the $96.6 million second-quarter provision accounts for "changes in economic conditions during the quarter that affected specific major credits" and new management's adoption of "a rigorous and conservative approach that is more in line with the standards Society Corp. uses in credit evaluation, timing of charge-offs, nonperforming status determination, and adequacy of reserve calculations."  Trustcorp's merger with Society, a stock exchange transaction valued at about $465 million, is expected to close at year end.  Trustcorp and Society both said the charge won't affect the agreement.  In fact, when the deal was announced in June, Trustcorp said it would have to make "substantial" additional contributions to its loan-loss reserves this year, prior to the merger.  Society "was consulted on the scope" of the latest contribution "and feels it is appropriate," said Robert W. Gillespie, Society's chairman and chief executive officer in a prepared statement.  With the additional reserves set aside in the second quarter, Trustcorp's chief financial officer, Robert K. Chapman, said the bank is now "adequately covered" for any future write-offs.  Since Jan. 1, 1988, Trustcorp has raised its loan-loss reserves to $120 million, including the latest provision, from $36.1 million.  Most of the problem loans accounted for by the latest provision are among the $106 million in loans Trustcorp made to real estate developments in downtown Toledo.  Mr. Chapman confirmed that two of the money-losing downtown projects were Summit Center, an office building, and Portside, a festival marketplace.  He declined to give further details.  At the end of 1988, Trustcorp had $17 million in loans outstanding to Portside.  But a Trustcorp source said the bank has written down its Portside loans to between $2 million and $2.5 million.  Trustcorp also said it named Daniel J. Gannon president of its main banking subsidiary, Trustcorp Bank, Ohio.  Mr. Gannon was previously president and chief operating officer of Cardinal Federal Savings Bank, Cleveland.  He succeeds interim president Arthur H. McElwee Jr., who continues as chairman, president and chief executive officer of Trustcorp of Indiana Inc.  Trustcorp and Society named Frederick A. Deal as merger transition leader; ultimately he will be nominated for election as chairman and chief executive of Trustcorp Bank, Ohio.  Mr. Deal is currently chairman and chief executive of Society Bank, Columbus.  Richard J. Bond, chairman of Security Bank & Trust Co., was named a director of this bank holding company, filling a vacancy on the board.  Lawrence P. Haeg, formerly director of public relations of Pillsbury Co., was named vice president, corporate communications, of this banking concern.  He succeeds Harold S. Webster, who left the company and is now president of Westmoreland, Larson & Webster, a Duluth, Minn., advertising agency.  Members of the staff of USA Today are up in arms over an inflammatory column written by Allen Neuharth, the former Gannett Co. chairman who is now a columnist for the paper.  The column, published in the Friday edition of USA Today, blasts the airlines for hiring as flight attendants "aging women who are tired of their jobs" and "flighty young men who have trouble balancing a cup of coffee or tea."  He calls for the airlines to bring back "sky girls": unmarried female nurses under the age of 25, not more than 5 feet, 4 inches tall and weighing less than 115 pounds.  Mr. Neuharth said in a telephone interview yesterday that "I write what I believe in and if it's provocative, fine."  But he called his detractors "thin-skinned."  Mr. Neuharth denied that he wanted to replace all flight attendants, pointing out that the column said each flight should have at least one "sky girl" who is a nurse.  Mr. Neuharth's column ran accompanied by several "Feedback" rebuttal statements such as one from Travel Management Daily managing editor Jim Glab calling it "sexist, reactionary and illegal."  Yesterday, Paul McMasters, deputy editorial page director, said, "Al's column is a column and doesn't reflect the opinion of the editorial board."  However, he acknowledged, "Obviously, it generated some excitement and disbelief."  Mr. McMasters said that a letter protesting the column and signed by a substantial number of USA Today's staff will be published today along with an interview with Susan Bianchi-Sand, head of the Association of Flight Attendants, which is "not happy at all."  Gannett officials often boast of the company's record of promoting minorities and women, and Mr. Neuharth's column came as a shock to many of them.  "What he represented to employees was a sham.  I feel personally let down, I really do," said one angry female USA Today reporter.  But Mr. Neuharth said, "This wasn't written by a chauvinist dirty old male, this is someone who has spent a lifetime working with all kinds of people."  Some members of the USA Today staff speculated that Mr. Neuharth was being intentionally inflammatory for public-relations reasons: His new book is expected to come out within three weeks.  "That's kind of silly," Mr. Neuharth said.  "It had nothing to do with it."  Albert E. Suter, former president and chief operating officer of Whirlpool Corp., Benton Harbor, Mich., was named executive vice president of this maker of electronic and electrical products.  In the new post, Mr. Suter, 53 years old, will oversee corporate manufacturing and strategic planning, among other things.  Orville L. Freeman, former governor of Minnesota, was named a director of this food concern, increasing board membership to 10.  Moody's Investors Service Inc. said it is reviewing for possible downgrade its ratings on $3 billion of securities issued by this utility.  The rating company cited growing concern about Niagara's cash flow and financial flexibility, in light of its postponement until late August of its decision to declare common stock dividends.  Niagara's financial position has "become increasingly strained" by expenses associated with the extended outage at its Nine-Mile Point 1 nuclear unit, Moody's said.  ---  UNISYS Corp. (Blue Bell, Pa.) -- Moody's Investors Service Inc. said it is reviewing its ratings of this computer maker's debt and preferred stock for a possible downgrade.  The rating concern cited "poor profitability and rising concerns over future prospects for significant margin improvement" at Unisys.  About $3.8 billion of securities are affected.  Helene L. Kaplan, former partner and currently counsel to the law firm of Webster & Sheffield, was elected to the oil company's board, expanding its size to 18 members.  James L. Fischer, a former Texas Instruments Inc. executive, was elected a director of this telecommunications concern.  He succeeds Clifford J. Osborn, who retired this spring.  BancTexas Group Inc., the first major Texas banking company to be restructured with federal assistance, has become the first to request another bailout.  The request, which comes just a week after the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp. announced rescue plans for National Bancshares Corp. of Texas and Texas American Bancshares Inc., underscores that soft real estate and energy markets still pose a major threat to the state's banks.  But the move, which was expected, didn't raise concerns about subsequent large bailouts because the later transactions insulated the institutions from bad loans.  "I think the signs were definitely there -- they'd have to come back to the well for a second drink," said Sandra Flannigan, an analyst with PaineWebber Inc. "Even at the time the transaction was done one had to question seriously whether it would be enough."  Separately, BancTexas reported that its losses narrowed to $8.8 million in the second quarter from $11.2 million in the year-earlier period.  In the first half, losses totaled $15.8 million, down slightly from $17 million a year earlier.  The request represents the second banking debacle this year for the Hallwood Group Inc., a New York investment firm that two years ago led both the first BancTexas restructuring and the federally assisted formation of Alliance Bancorp of Alaska out of three failed Alaskan banks.  In April, conceding that plummeting real estate values had once again overwhelmed the bank, regulators closed Alliance and assumed some $358.7 million of impaired assets.  Hallwood, which couldn't be reached for comment, will be able to recover much of its investment in Alaska under certain conditions as part of its agreement with the FDIC.  A spokesman for BancTexas said Hallwood no longer holds a stake in that company.  In the 1987 restructuring, the FDIC infused $150 million in cash into BancTexas subsidiary banks, while Hallwood underwrote a $50 million rights offering and got 12.5% of the company's common stock for its services.  BancTexas said it approached the FDIC for assistance after the primary capital ratio of its lead Dallas slipped to a dangerously low 2.3%.  The ratio includes loan-loss reserves plus shareholders equity as a percentage of total assets.  The company, which has $776.3 million in total assets, said its overall primary capital ratio was 5.3% as of June 30.  The company said the restructuring plan it presented to regulators contemplates an open bank transaction, meaning the banking units wouldn't be closed down first.  Included in the plan would be a financial assistance by the FDIC, as well as "a substantial capital infusion" into the Dallas bank by BancTexas and by outside investors.  In a prepared statement, the company indicated that shareholders would likely suffer dilution.  "While it is not possible at this time to predict the exact effect on the stockholders of BancTexas Group, it is probable that, if the assistance is granted, their interest will be substantially diluted as a result of the new capital injection," the company said.  FDIC officials couldn't be reached for comment.  William E. Butler, president and chief operating officer of Eaton Corp., and Victor A. Pelson, a group executive of American Telephone & Telegraph Co. and president of its communication-services business, were elected directors, expanding the board to 14 members.  Combustion Engineering provides systems and services in power generation.  The following U.S. Treasury, corporate and municipal offerings are tentatively scheduled for sale this week, according to Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ U.S. TREASURY  @ Today  @ $12.8 billion of 13-week and 26-week bills.  @ CORPORATE  @ One Day This Week  American Health Properties Inc. -- offering of three million common shares, via Dean Witter Capital Markets.  Continental Bank Corp. -- offering of 11.4 million deputy cumulative adjustable-rate preferred shares, via Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.  GATX Corp. -- offering of 2.5 million cumulative convertible preferred shares, via Morgan Stanley & Co.  Genetics Institute -- one million convertible exchangable preferred shares, via Goldman, Sachs & Co.  Kingdom of Thailand -- offering of $200 million bonds, via Salomon Brothers Inc.  National Australia Bank -- offering of three million American depository shares, via Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  Ogden Projects Inc. -- initial offering of 2.5 million shares, via Merrill Lynch.  Triad Systems Corp. -- offering of $80 million senior extendible reset notes, via Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co.  Verax Corp. -- initial offering of two million common shares, via Montgomery Securites.  Wilcox & Gibbs -- offering of $50 million convertible debentures, via Goldman Sachs.  @ MUNICIPAL  @ Wednesday  Illinois -- about $100 million of general obligation refunding bonds, 1989 August Series, via competitive bid.  @ One Day This Week  California -- $3 billion of 1989 revenue anticipation notes, via a Bank of America NT&SA group.  Puerto Rico Electric Power Authority -- $814.5 million of various bonds, including $592 million of power revenue refunding bonds, Series N, and $222.5 million of power revenue bonds, Series O, via a Prudential-Bache Capital Funding group.  Massachusetts Industrial Finance Agency -- $257 million of revenue bonds, Massachusetts Biomedical Research Corp. Issue, Series 1989, via a Goldman Sachs group.  Hawaii -- $119.5 million of general obligation refunding bonds, including $74 million of Series BO and $45.5 million of Series BP, via a Merrill Lynch group.  Oakland, Calif. -- $92.4 million of Local Government Finance Authority Redevelopment Agency 1989 refunding revenue bonds.  Hillsborough County Aviation Authority, Fla. -- $92,520,000 of Tampa International Airport revenue bonds, 1989 Series A, via a Smith Barney group.  Harris County, Texas -- $62,495,000 of toll road senior lien revenue bonds, Series 1989, via a Goldman Sachs group.  @ Indefinite (Competitive)  New York City -- about $1.3 billion of various notes, via competitive bid on at least 24 hours' notice.  Port Authority of New York & New Jersey -- $100 million of consolidated bonds, 65th Series, via competitive bid on 48 hours' notice.  A group including Cilluffo Associates Limited Partnership and Zenith Associates Limited Partnership, both New York investment partnerships, said it raised its stake in Amdura Corp. to the equivalent of 17.4% of the common shares outstanding.  In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, the group said it controls 1,206,827 Amdura common shares, assuming conversion of preferred stock.  The filing said the group bought 64,300 Amdura common shares from June 7 to last Monday for $12.25 to $13.50 a share.  In early June, the group disclosed it had raised its stake in the Denver industrial products company to 16.4%.  According to the filing, the group has been unsuccessful in arranging a meeting with Amdura's management to review Amdura's operations as well as the company's announced plan to refinance in September a bridge loan incurred in connection with the company's acquisition of Coast-America Corp.  Richard H. Matzke, 52 years old, was elected president of Chevron Overseas Petroleum Inc., the company's main international exploration and production unit.  He succeeds John H. Silcox, 63, who will retire from the San Ramon, Calif., unit on Dec. 1.  Mr. Matzke, currently president of Chevron Canada Resources, a Calgary, Alberta, unit, will be succeeded by James R. Baroffio, 57, vice president-exploration for Chevron U.S.A. Inc.  The assignments are effective Nov. 1.  Executive Vice President Matthew Hunter was named to the additional post of chief operating officer of this electric utility.  Mr. Hunter joined the utility in 1952 and has held posts in personnel, purchasing and administrative services.  He was named vice president for administrative services in 1978 and executive vice president in 1988.  He served as acting chief executive officer in this year's first half.  Donaldson B. Lee, a Birmingham, Ala., private investor, said he holds a 5.29% stake in Andrea Radio Corp.'s common shares outstanding.  In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, Mr. Lee said he holds 26,900 Andrea Radio common shares, including 5,100 shares bought from June 21 to July 18 for $10.25 to $12 a share.  Mr. Lee acquired the stock as an investment and may acquire additional shares from time to time, the filing said.  Andrea Radio is based in New York.  Douglas Andrea, Andrea corporate secretary, said the company has been closely following Mr. Lee's investment activities in Andrea shares.  Mr. Andrea said that Mr. Lee came to the company's board meeting in April to indicate that he is interested in Andrea's stock for investment purposes only and "likes our dividend," which is 18 cents a share.  Andrea is a maker of intercommunications systems for military and commercial aircraft.  Gary G. Benanav was named president of this insurer's Aetna International Inc. unit, which has insurance and financial-services operations in Canada, Latin America, Europe and the Pacific Rim.  Mr. Benanav, 43 years old, joined Aetna as an attorney in 1972.  He had been vice president-finance and treasurer of the parent company.  He succeeds Kenneth P. Veit, who retired in June.  The company also named Edmund F. Kelly, 44, to succeed Burton E. Burton, 60, who retires as president of Aetna's Employee Benefits Division.  Mr. Kelly is a senior vice president.  Roger M. Smith, currently a corporate vice president, will succeed Mr. Kelly.  Friday, July 28, 1989  Following is a weekly listing of unaudited net asset values of publicly traded investment fund shares, reported by the companies as of Friday's close.  Also shown is the closing listed market price or a dealer-to-dealer asked price of each fund's shares, with the percentage of difference.  @ Stock N.A. Stock %  @ Fund Name Exch.  Value Price Diff.  @ Diversified Common Stock Funds  @ Adams Express NYSE 19.16 15 7/8 - 17.15  @ Baker Fentress NYSE 28.59 24 - 16.05  @ Blue Chip Value NYSE 8.26 7 - 15.25  @ Clemente Global Gro NYSE b10.41 8 1/8 - 21.95  @ Gemini II Capital NYSE 20.29 16 1/4 - 19.91  @ Gemini II Income NYSE 9.80 12 3/4 + 30.10  @ General Amer Invest NYSE 21.75 17 3/4 - 18.39  @ Global Growth Capital NYSE z z z  @ Global Growth Incme NYSE z z z  @ Growth Stock Outlook NYSE z z z  @ Lehman Corp. NYSE 16.54 13 3/4 - 16.87  @ Liberty All-Star Eqty NYSE 9.74 7 7/8 - 19.15  @ Niagara Share Corp. NYSE 17.69 14 3/8 - 18.74  @ Nicholas-Applegate NYSE 11.13 9 1/4 - 16.89  @ Quest For Value Cap NYSE 17.07 12 3/8 - 27.50  @ Quest For Value Inco NYSE 11.70 12 1/2 + 6.84  @ Royce Value Trust NYSE z z z  @ Schafer Value Trust NYSE 11.72 10 1/4 - 12.54  @ Source Capital NYSE 43.21 41 1/2 - 3.96  @ Tri-Continental Corp. NYSE 29.10 23 3/4 - 18.38  @ Worldwide Value NYSE 20.96 17 1/4 - 17.70  @ Zweig Fund NYSE 11.44 11 7/8 + 3.80  @ Closed End Bond Funds  @ CIM High Yield Secs AMEX 9.06 8 3/8 - 7.56  @ Franklin Prin Mat Tr NYSE b9.24 9 7/8 + 6.87  @ Franklin Universal Tr NYSE b9.54 9 1/2 - 0.42  @ Municipal High Inco NYSE 9.63 10 + 3.84  @ Zenith Income Fund NYSE 8.47 9 1/4 + 9.21  @ Flexible Portfolio Funds  @ America's All Seasn OTC 5.81 5 - 13.94  @ America's All S Inco OTC 9.05 9 3/4 + 7.73  @ Zweig Total Return Fd NYSE 9.75 9 5/8 - 1.38  @ Specialized Equity and Convertible Funds  @ American Capital Conv NYSE 23.94 21 1/2 - 10.19  @ ASA Ltd NYSE bc59.93 42 3/8 - 29.29  @ Asia Pacific NYSE 12.92 10 7/8 - 15.83  @ Bancroft Convertible AMEX 21.53 18 1/2 - 14.07  @ Bergstrom Capital AMEX 62.47 56 1/2 - 9.56  @ BGR Precious Metals TOR z z z  @ Brazil NYSE z z z  @ CNV Holdings Capital NYSE 10.25 5 - 51.22  @ CNV Holdings Income NYSE 9.43 11 7/8 + 25.93  @ Castle Convertible AMEX 22.18 19 5/8 - 11.52  @ Central Fund Canada AMEX b5.11 4 7/8 - 4.60  @ Central Securities AMEX 12.70 10 3/8 - 18.31  @ Couns Tandem Secs NYSE 12.28 10 1/4 - 16.53  @ Cypress Fund AMEX 10.86 9 3/8 - 13.67  @ Duff&Phelps Sel Utils NYSE 8.57 8 3/8 - 2.28  @ Ellsw Conv Gr&Inc AMEX 8.94 7 5/8 - 14.71  @ Engex AMEX 13.69 d - 31.06  @ Financ'l News Compos NYSE 20.37 19 5/8 - 3.66  @ 1st Australia AMEX 10.15 8 1/4 - 18.72  @ First Financial Fund NYSE z z z  @ First Iberian AMEX 10.16 8 7/8 - 12.65  @ France Fund NYSE b12.80 11 5/8 - 9.18  @ Gabelli Equity Trust NYSE 14.22 13 7/8 - 2.43  @ Germany Fund NYSE 9.62 8 1/4 - 14.24  @ H&Q Healthcare Inv NYSE 9.79 8 - 18.28  @ Hampton Utils Tr Cap AMEX b11.67 9 7/8 - 15.38  @ Hampton Utils Tr Pref AMEX b48.76 h - 3.48  @ Helvetia Fund NYSE 12.78 10 3/4 - 15.88  @ India Growth Fund NYSE f13.55 12 3/4 - 5.90  @ Italy Fund NYSE b11.41 9 1/2 - 16.74  @ Korea Fund NYSE a16.40 33 +101.22  @ Malaysia Fund NYSE 11.63 11 5/8 - 0.04  @ Meeschaert G & C MWSE z z z  @ Mexico Fund NYSE b11.47 10 - 12.82  @ Morgan Grenf SmCap NYSE 10.21 9 1/2 - 6.95  @ Patriot Prem Div Fd NYSE 9.94 10 1/4 + 3.12  @ Petrol & Resources NYSE z z z  @ Pilgrim Regional NYSE 10.80 9 5/8 - 10.88  @ Rl Estate Sec Inco Fd AMEX 8.81 8 3/4 - 0.68  @ Regional Fin Shrs Inv NYSE 9.43 8 3/8 - 11.19  @ ROC Taiwan Fund NYSE 13.93 15 1/2 + 11.27  @ Scudder New Asia NYSE 13.94 10 1/4 - 26.47  @ Spain Fund NYSE 13.62 14 7/8 + 9.21  @ Taiwan Fund NYSE b37.79 37 - 2.09  @ TCW Convertible Secs NYSE b8.78 8 1/8 - 7.46  @ Templeton Em Mkts AMEX b11.77 10 1/2 - 10.79  @ Templeton Value Fund NYSE b10.44 9 3/8 - 10.20  @ Thai Fund NYSE 15.17 17 1/2 + 15.36  @ United Kingdom Fund NYSE z z z  @ Z-Seven OTC 14.68 15 + 2.18  a-Ex-dividend. b-As of Thursday's close. c-Translated at Commercial Rand exchange rate. d-Stck. price-9 7/16. f-As of Wednesday's close. h-Stck. price-47 1/16. z-Not available.  A group including Aciest Co. and Gatcombe Corp., both Hong Kong investment holding companies, said they lowered their stake in Everex Systems Inc. to 24.6% of the common shares outstanding.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, the group said it sold 450,000 Everex common shares from June 30 to July 21 at $10.50 to $10.625 a share.  As a result of the sales, the group holds 5.7 million remaining shares.  The filing didn't give a reason for the reduction.  Everex is based in Fremont, Calif.  Two Walt Disney Co. holders filed a suit seeking to compel the entertainment company's officers and directors to cooperate with anyone proposing a merger or other transaction to "enhance shareholder value."  The lawsuit, filed in state court here by shareholders Miriam Sarnoff and Frederick Rand, followed a week of intense takeover speculation that drove up stock prices of Disney and other entertainment concerns.  The takeover rumors began swirling after Paramount Communications Inc. dropped its hostile bid for Time Inc., which caused many to ponder who might be in Paramount's gunsights next.  The lawsuit, which seeks class-action status, alleges that Disney's officers and directors breached their fiduciary duty by adopting a "poison pill" shareholder rights plan last month to prevent unwanted takeovers.  "By adopting the rights plan, the company's director-defendants caused a fundamental shift of power from its shareholders to themselves," the suit says.  "The rights plan permits the director-defendants to act as the prime negotiator of -- and in effect to totally preclude -- any and all tender offers through their power to redeem or to refuse to redeem the rights."  A Disney spokesman declined to comment on the suit.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading Friday, shares of Burbank, Calif.-based Disney closed at $107, down $1.75.  The plaintiffs seek a court order that among other things would force the company's officers and directors to evaluate "Disney's worth as a merger/acquisition candidate," to "take all appropriate steps to effectively expose Disney to the marketplace in an effort to create an active auction for Disney" and to cooperate fully with anyone proposing a merger or other transaction to enhance shareholder value, "including MCA."  The suit, in specifying rival entertainment concern MCA Inc., cites a report last month in Business Week magazine that MCA Chairman Lew Wasserman might be considering relinquishing his 15.5% stake in MCA to Disney in a friendly transaction, something Disney declined to comment about.  The lawsuit also points to recent rumors that a group led by Fort Worth, Texas, investor Sid R. Bass "might sell their interest in Disney to Paramount."  On Friday, the Bass group disclosed it had gained control over an additional 3% of Disney's common, bringing its total stake to 18.6%.  In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, the group said it owns a total of 24,999,495 Disney shares.  Another Disney spokesman said the Bass group's newly acquired shares are held in trust for various Bass family members.  The investment group gained control over the additional shares through a recent change in trustees.  The new trustee is a member of the Bass group.  The spokesman said the group has had a considerable stake in Disney since 1984, when the company was facing takeover threats, and has assured Disney it is a friendly, long-term investor.  Atlantic Group Inc. of Jacksonville, Fla. said it entered into a confidentiality and standstill pact with Fairfield Communities Inc. on July 14.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, Atlantic said it has discussed with Fairfield and third parties making a possible proposal to Fairfield "to engage in a business combination transaction."  Atlantic and affiliates hold a combined 14.09% stake in Fairfield's common shares outstanding.  Atlantic noted in the filing that "no assurance can be given that any proposal will be made."  Fairfield is based in Little Rock, Ark.  Matec Corp. disclosed that records of its Alloy Surfaces unit have been subpoenaed by a Delaware grand jury in what it called an "apparent investigation of cost charging, cost allocation and product certification" in government contracts.  In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, Matec said the Alloy subsidiary has been under investigation by the inspector general of the Defense Department since November.  No charges have been brought, the company said.  Matec makes electronic parts, diffusion metal coatings and other products.  Under federal procurement rules, a grand jury indictment or conviction could preclude Alloy from new government contracts for a period of time.  The company said it couldn't predict the outcome or estimate claims or other actions relating to the investigation.  Michael J. Kroll, vice president and treasurer, declined comment on the status of the investigation.  Harris Associates Limited Partnership,. a Chicago-based investment advisory firm, said it raised its stake in Pioneer-Standard Electronics Inc., Cleveland, to the equivalent of 8.9% of the common shares outstanding.  In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, Harris said it controls 494,907 Pioneer-Standard common shares, assuming conversion of 9% convertible subordinated debentures due Aug. 1, 1998.  Recent purchases include 96,500 shares bought from June 27 to July 20 for $7.75 to $8.13 a share.  Harris didn't give a reason in the filing for the boost in its holdings.  In its original filing, it said it acquired the stock as an investment and may buy additional shares or sell shares in the future.  President Bush, saying he wouldn't "fall on my sword" insisting on his own plan to cut capital gains taxes, declared himself open to compromises with Democrats on the issue.  Speaking in the midst of sensitive negotiations between his aides and House Ways and Means Committee Chairman Dan Rostenkowski, Mr. Bush said at a Friday news conference, "If there's some compromise that can spur investment, spur jobs, increase employment, {and be} the cause of new jobs starting up, I'd be interested in it."  In particular, Mr. Bush seemed to indicate he would be willing to consider Democratic proposals to cut capital gains taxes by excluding from taxation gains that are attributable only to inflation.  Such an "indexing" plan, versions of which are under consideration, might be an alternative to Mr. Bush's proposal to cut the capital gains rate to 15% from the current top rate of 33%.  But Mr. Bush insisted he wants any capital gains tax plan to ensure a "differential" between the taxes paid on capital gains and the taxes paid on ordinary income.  His administration argues that such a differential will funnel more money into capital investments.  So any compromise acceptable to Mr. Bush might have to include more than simple indexing of capital gains.  One possibility widely discussed on Capitol Hill last week is to reduce capital gains by the rate of inflation, plus one percentage point.  But this suggestion was derided by top House Democrats as tantamount to a rate cut.  Mr. Bush seems to have gained an upper hand in the capital gains debate in recent days, as it has become clear that a majority on the Ways and Means Committee favors a proposal to cut the capital gains rate to 19.6% over two years.  Under that plan, the rate then would rise to a maximum of 28%, indexed for inflation.  But Mr. Rostenkowski and other Democratic leaders have kept the proposal from coming to a committee vote.  They are trying to muster support in their party to block a simple cut in the capital gains rate, which would be portrayed as a Republican victory.  While declining to predict the outcome of a Ways and Means vote, House Majority Leader Richard Gephardt (D., Mo.) said on CBS News's "Face the Nation" yesterday that the capital-gains issue "isn't something that is going to be determined by a committee.  It's going to be determined by the House of Representatives, and I think that we can win that argument on the floor."  In his remarks Friday, Mr. Bush turned up the political heat on the Democratic leadership, arguing that his proposal for a capital gains tax cut was "clearly in focus" during the presidential campaign last fall.  Mr. Bush argued that a rate cut "will stimulate jobs.  It will encourage business {and} small-business creation.  And I stand for it.  And if there's some way that that can be achieved by changing the proposal I sent up there, fine, I'm willing to listen."  White House aides have said privately in recent days that they are willing to discuss plans that index capital gains or that reduce by a fixed percentage the amount of capital gains subject to taxation, as long as such alternative measures produce a tax reduction commensurate with the amount Mr. Bush's proposal would produce.  Negotiations by Mr. Rostenkowski with budget director Richard Darman and Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady are likely to continue this week.  Health-care products maker Pfizer Inc. and watchdog magazine Consumer Reports are arguing over the efficacy of products that fight plaque, the bacteria-laden film that forms on teeth.  In its August issue, Consumer Reports cites research concluding that Plax, a prebrushing rinse, offers no more benefit than brushing alone.  The magazine relied on a report in a professional journal and a Better Business Bureau study challenging advertising claims.  Stung by the attack on one of its high-profile products, Pfizer suspects that the professional article was funded by a competitor.  Pfizer is particularly sensitive to the attacks because its Plax advertising already has faced challenges from critics and competitors.  Until recently, Pfizer had been advertising that Plax "removes 300% more plaque than brushing alone."  The magazine called Pfizer's ad "one claim you can brush off," saying that neither the professional article nor the BBB report supported Pfizer.  The magazine did none of its own testing on the plaque fighters.  "We aren't set up to do clinical medical studies.  We're not that kind of lab," says a spokeswoman for Consumers Union of U.S. Inc., the magazine's Mount Vernon, N.Y., parent.  But "we certainly are capable of reviewing the published studies that have been conducted and evaluating their test procedures and the conclusions."  Plax has been a major success for its original maker, Oral Research Laboratories Inc., and for Pfizer, which paid upwards of $200 million for the company.  Wall Street estimates put 1988 retail sales of Plax at more than $100 million.  Pfizer's marketing efforts on behalf of Plax are also threatened by a recent move by the Food and Drug Administration questioning claims by several companies that their mouthwash products can treat plaque and gum disease.  The FDA asserts that such claims mean the products should be regulated as drugs rather than as cosmetics.  Plax claims to treat only plaque, not gum disease.  The FDA says talks with Pfizer are continuing.  In addition, Pfizer competitors Procter & Gamble Co., maker of Peridex mouth rinse, and Warner-Lambert Co., maker of Listerine, filed challenges to the Plax "removes 300%" ads with the Better Business Bureau and the three TV networks.  Listerine and Peridex are the only mouth rinses that meet American Dental Association guidelines for plaque fighters.  The National Advertising Division of the BBB, which reviews ad claims, called three studies on which Pfizer based the "300% more plaque" claim "preliminary, small-scale tests subject to confirmation."  And two additional studies Pfizer sponsored failed to back up the claim, the division said.  Pfizer objects that in its competitors' challenges to the BBB, P&G and Warner-Lambert used research studies that they had funded.  Pfizer also faulted the methods used in that research, says Truman Susman, president of Pfizer's oral care division.  Mr. Susman says the BBB saw Pfizer's evidence as "good science, but preliminary {for} substantiating an advertising claim."  Pfizer settled the matter with the BBB, agreeing "in the spirit of cooperation" to withdraw the ads pending further corroboration, Mr. Susman says.  Ads for Plax now say that it "is specifically designed and formulated to remove plaque."  The bottle still has the 300% claim on it because of large supplies of labels in stock.  Production of new labels should start before the end of 1989, Mr. Susman says, and they will "conform with the ads," either with a resubstantiated 300% claim or without it.  Plax with the new label probably won't be on store shelves before early 1990.  The professional study Consumer Reports cites was prepared by Eli Grossman of Institutional Services Co., a Northfield, N.J., independent testing lab.  "He works out of a commercial testing facility.  They don't work for nothing," says Mr. Susman.  "We don't know who funded this study," but the company suspects it was a competitor, he says.  Mr. Susman adds that unlike much published research, the Grossman study -- published in the November-December issue of Clinical Preventive Dentistry -- didn't note how it was funded.  Dr. Grossman says that "when my raw data were analyzed, I had to come to the conclusion that there was no difference between {Plax} and the placebo."  Dr. Grossman, who was "surprised" that the source of the funding wasn't disclosed with the article, will say only that "a big company" funded the research.  A spokeswoman for P&G said the company didn't fund the Grossman report.  A spokesman for Warner-Lambert was unable to say whether the company funded the report.  Cobe Laboratories Inc. said its board adopted a shareholder-rights plan designed to deter any hostile takeover attempts but that the action wasn't a response to any specific efforts to acquire the medical-products company.  Under the plan, shareholders could buy Cobe stock at half price if any party acquired at least 20% of the shares outstanding.  In a merger or the purchase by any party of at least 50% of the shares outstanding, holders could buy stock in the surviving company at half price.  House Majority Leader Richard Gephardt said he is prepared to embrace a Senate-passed initiative to force the disclosure of consultants and lobbyists who pursue federal funds in the executive branch.  The Missouri Democrat's backing adds significantly to the chances for House approval of the sweeping provisions that were attached to a natural resources spending bill last week by Senate Appropriations Committee Chairman Robert Byrd (D., W.Va.).  Within the Bush administration, Budget Director Richard Darman is emerging as an important ally for Mr. Byrd on the same legislation, which is being driven by embarrassment over influence peddling at the Department of Housing and Urban Development and in the larger appropriations process.  Recipients of federal grants, contracts or loans would risk penalties of $100,000 in any case where it is shown that federal funds were used directly or indirectly to pay people to influence decision making in Congress or the executive branch.  Competitors for federal money would be required to report the names of any such lobbyist or consultant paid from nonfederal funds, and beginning April 30, all federal agencies would make these disclosures public, including the names of the lobbyists and sums paid to them.  Persons lobbying Congress are already covered by disclosure rules, but the new restrictions could shed significant light on a nether world of politically connected consultants who pursue funds from executive-branch agencies like HUD.  "I think it is a valuable amendment, a way to get at this problem," said Mr. Gephardt.  One option under consideration is for the leadership to bring a similar amendment to the House floor to force a vote on the issue before Congress's August recess begins Friday.  As many as a half-dozen fiscal 1990 spending bills are slated to come before the House this week, and the rush of legislation has attracted a laundry list of single-issue riders.  An $18.4 billion Treasury bill approved Friday is such a case, providing a 12.9% increase in funds for Internal Revenue Service tax-collection and investigation activities but also seeking to block enforcement of new tax rules governing employee benefit programs.  At issue are so-called Section 89 provisions, which were intended to prevent discrimination in health-care benefits for workers but have drawn complaints from businesses as being too burdensome.  The Treasury already has delayed the effective date of the provisions to Oct. 1, and though the House Ways and Means Committee this month approved revisions in the law to address complaints, opponents have continued pressing for outright repeal.  "I've got a modified version," said Ways and Means Committee Chairman Dan Rostenkowski (D., Ill.).  "But when they smell blood, they want it all."  Approval of the bill -- on a 376-26 vote -- was never in doubt once the Democratic leadership decided last week against raising procedural obstacles to the Section 89 rider.  The measure would take effect at the start of the new fiscal year Oct. 1, and the amendment would deny the Treasury any funds to enforce the provisions through September 1990.  The same Treasury bill is a battleground over pork-barrel politics focusing on $16.2 million earmarked by the House Appropriations Committee for five university science projects including new construction starts in New York, Michigan and Maryland.  By a 293-114 margin, the House beat back an effort to make the funds available to a more open competitive process.  But Mr. Byrd, who has been angered by the past practices of a lobbying firm hired by several of the universities, has signaled he will put a hold on the measure to ensure his Senate panel strips out the provisions.  In its third U.S. real estate acquisition in five months, Power Corp. of Dublin acquired the landmark Manhattan building that houses the Polo Ralph Lauren flagship store.  The publicly held development company paid $43 million, or what probably is a record $1,600 a square foot, for the richly detailed property on Madison Avenue and 72nd Street.  The building, built in 1894 at a cost of $500,000, was designed to resemble a French chateau.  Power acquired the mansion from a partnership including Ian Kean, who heads Aston Development Corp. in New York, and Jaymont Holdings Inc., headed by Yousef Jameel, a Saudi Arabian businessman.  The partnership paid $6.3 million for it in 1983; at the time, the property had been sorely neglected.  Late in 1984, Polo Ralph Lauren Corp. agreed to lease the mansion for 20 years with a 29-year renewal option.  Although it didn't own the building, the apparel and home-furnishings company spent $30 million to transform it into a storybook showcase for Ralph Lauren merchandise.  It restored the woodwork, carved moldings and vaulted ceilings, turning the building into a local tourist attraction.  The value of the Polo lease is based on a percentage of sales and was a prime attraction to the buyer, according to Power officials.  The Irish company is headed by Chairman Robin Power.  Polo pays rent equivalent to 8% of sales.  Its estimated 1989 rental is $3 million, said Tony Leonard, a Power executive director in Dublin.  In addition, he said, the retailer will be subject to rent boosts based on open-market rates.  Mr. Kean of Aston Development said the price per square foot is a record for retail space in New York.  By contrast, Tiffany & Co.'s Fifth Avenue flagship was sold to Dai-Ichi Real Estate Co. of Tokyo for about $959 a square foot in 1986.  The mansion had been on the market for about six months, Mr. Kean said, adding that it attracted only foreign buyers, primarily from the United Kingdom.  He said he offered the property to Polo.  Polo company officials weren't available for comment.  Earlier this month, an investment group including Power Corp. paid $64 million for the Ambassador Hotel in Los Angeles, intending to use the 23-acre site for retail development.  Power is also part of a joint-venture retail development at Two Rodeo Drive in Beverly Hills and is seeking more retail locations in U.S. cities, Mr. Leonard said.  Sandler Associates and Sandler Capital Management, both New York investment partnerships, said they hold a combined 5.04% stake in Price Communications Corp.'s common shares outstanding.  In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, Sandler Associates and Sandler Capital said they hold 464,375 Price common shares, all bought from March 16, 1988, to July 18, 1989, for $4.80 to $7.30 a share.  The stock was acquired "in the ordinary course of business" as an investment.  Sandler Associates and Sandler Capital said they reserve the right to acquire or to sell shares in the future.  Price is based in New York.  Test pilot, astronaut and space-shuttle savior, Richard Truly has the makings of an American hero.  Now he must take on the rather unheroic role of salesman.  Mr. Truly, the new head of the National Aeronautics and Space Administration, must convince a skeptical Congress and public that the U.S. should spend hundreds of billions of dollars to settle the moon and explore Mars.  And he must reassure the space agency, rattled by the recent departure of 34 top managers and hounded by the ghosts of Challenger, that it's up to the task.  "You're talking about a sustained effort that will go well into the 21st century," Mr. Truly says.  The NASA administrator -- the first astronaut to serve in that post -- already has lined up three powerful allies: President Bush, Vice President Dan Quayle and Budget Director Richard Darman.  The three men accepted a NASA recommendation that President Bush declare on July 20 -- the 20th anniversary of the first Apollo moon landing -- that the U.S. will send astronauts back to the moon shortly after the year 2000 and then off to Mars.  "Truly has seized the agency and put his own imprint on it," says John Logsdon, director of the Space Policy Institute at George Washington University.  "He got the president to embrace the boldest possible vision.  That ain't bad."  It's unexpected, though.  Temperamentally cautious and conservative, the 51-year-old ex-astronaut is known for competence, not grand gestures.  Salesmanship seems as unnatural to him as it did to another ex-Navy man with an easy grin, Jimmy Carter.  He comes across as dull, not inspirational.  Indeed, when Vice President Quayle, head of the newly created National Space Council, asked Mr. Truly to come up with a list of exploration projects, Mr. Truly initially balked.  NASA had planned to ask the president to approve an ambitious manned program but not for another few years -- after the proposed space station had cleared its biggest budget hurdles.  "I was concerned we could go too fast," Mr. Truly says.  "I didn't want NASA signed up to something we weren't prepared to accomplish."  But turn away from an opportunity, Mr. Truly understood, and it may not return.  Not since John Kennedy has a president been willing to make space exploration as high a priority as President Bush.  "As I got into it, I realized that with the proper resources and the proper vision," NASA could pull off the project, he says.  Mr. Truly recently appointed Aaron Cohen, head of Johnson Space Center, to put together over the next four or five months a detailed plan for manned exploration -- the first step in the lobbying process necessary to garner support.  Included will be what he called "modest" requests for budget increases in the fiscal year beginning Oct. 1, 1990, for technology studies, personnel increases and facilities improvements related to manned exploration.  The Space Council will use that plan as the basis for its own deliberations.  "Clearly the present NASA can't do the job, but we have the core capability to take on" ambitious exploration, Mr. Truly says.  One problem NASA faces is a recent exodus of managers who signed up during the Apollo years and fear a conflict-of-interest rule may limit their opportunities for outside employment.  The agency also lacks a space depot for refueling spaceships and a giant spacecraft capable of lifting four or five times as much cargo as the space shuttle.  But any new project will face tough times in a budget-conscious Congress.  The space station, for instance, faces a cut of about $400 million from the $2.05 billion administration request for the fiscal year starting Oct. 1.  The cost of space exploration is warranted, Mr. Truly believes, because it will inspire a new generation to go into areas such as engineering and science.  He sees it spurring technical innovation, thus adding to the country's wealth.  Mr. Truly's current job is the latest in a string of assignments that have made him an expert at living with risk.  As a young naval aviator, he made 300 aircraft carrier landings and then signed up as a test pilot.  In 1965, he became an astronaut, first assigned to an Air Force project to build a military space station, which was canceled before it ever flew.  Then he became a shuttle astronaut, piloting the second flight of the shuttle and commanding the first shuttle to launch and land at night.  During this time, he remained in the Navy and steadily earned promotions.  In 1983, he became the first commander of the Navy's space command, which oversees Navy satellites.  A month after the Challenger explosion, which killed seven astronauts in January 1986, he returned to NASA as head of the space-shuttle program.  The shuttle finally started flying again last year.  On June 30, a day before becoming NASA administrator, he retired from the Navy as a vice admiral.  Mr. Truly was acting administrator for a few months before being sworn in.  His great challenge now is to rally NASA and the country around the distant goal of manned exploration of the solar system, while making sure NASA doesn't slip back into the sloppy habits that led to the Challenger accident.  "We try to pound into our people (the idea that) no matter how aggressive we want to be, the best way to be successful is to fly the next flight safely and properly," he says.  "We're working the future, but our most important job is today."  Former marijuana smokers, take note: You're wanted by the Houston police.  Not for past misdeeds, mind you, but for possible employment: The Houston Police Department is out to make sure that former marijuana users -- which represent 50% of its applicants -- aren't unfairly weeded out in the recruiting process.  Until mid-June, it fell to individual police recruiters to judge whether an applicant's old pot-smoking habits would remove him from consideration as a cop.  Some decisions were a bit too arbitrary to suit the department's top brass.  So, to standardize the process, the department has developed a marijuana use index.  For example, according to the index, it's acceptable if an applicant smoked 10 marijuana cigarettes a day for 10 years, so long as he quit altogether at least two years ago.  A social toke every once in a while means he had to have just said no for the past year.  A polygraph test later in the process usually ensures that recruits tell the truth, officials say.  Many people see the index -- and the department's employing former marijuana users -- as simply a concession to the ubiquitousness of pot.  Former Supreme Court nominee Douglas Ginsburg, whose admission of pot use in law school cost him the appointment, might have wished for such attitudes.  After the Ginsburg flap, presidential candidates Albert Gore and Bruce Babbitt confessed similar indulgences early in life.  "If people can run for president and admit to having used marijuana in the past, I guess it's OK for cops, too," says Houston City Councilman Rodney Ellis.  Mark Clark, president of the Houston Police Officers Association, agrees, saying, "This is a different generation of people."  Others, though, suspect a smoke screen.  Mike Howard, vice president of the Houston patrolmen's union, chastises the department for lowering its standards.  "We see it as an act of desperation -- a lowering of standards because they're hurting for people."  How, he asks, are officers supposed to go into schools and tell kids not to smoke marijuana when the recruiting process allows potheads on the force?  That's nonsense, says Councilman Ellis.  "I'm sure there are officers who have stolen cookies from a cookie jar before . . . but they still tell people not to rob banks."  Not since the heyday of Leopold Stokowski has a conductor been so widely known, so widely debated and so widely revered as Herbert von Karajan.  He dominated the European musical scene for the past three decades, and his death this month has been greeted by many as the end of a matchless era.  Known as "the general music director of Europe" between the 1950s and the 1970s, he was at one period simultaneously at the helm of the Vienna State Opera, the Salzburg Festival and the Berlin Philharmonic, while working closely with the Vienna Symphony, London's Philharmonia Orchestra and La Scala in Milan.  And on top of this were numerous guest engagements as well as an exhausting recording schedule.  No wonder the joke circulated that upon springing into a cab and being asked his destination Karajan responded, "It doesn't matter, I've got something going everywhere."  In an age of increasingly superficial glitter, the energetic Karajan, with his lean athletic bearing, his swept-back shock of gray hair, his fine features and penetrating eyes, exuded an aura of true glamour.  But unlike other conductors whose reputations were often swamped by their jet-setting image, Karajan's glamour never compromised his integrity as a serious artist.  His most controversial interpretations, his experiments with eccentric tempos and dynamics, his forays into stage direction and his endless fascination with recording engineering were part of his constant search for perfection.  Even on his last visit to New York, in February, when he was so frail that he fairly had to be carried on and off stage, Karajan's inner strength, his ability to bring out the details of a score remained undiminished, and his performance of Anton Bruckner's grueling Eighth Symphony was visionary.  Born in Salzburg in 1908, he became that venerable city's most famous son after Mozart.  There was Greek blood in his veins -- his paternal ancestors, who came from Macedonia, originally bore the name Karajannis but changed it upon being elevated to the Saxon nobility in 1792.  Raised in a cultivated musical environment, Karajan studied at the Mozarteum in Salzburg before entering the Vienna Music Academy, where he made his conducting debut at the end of 1928.  By the spring he had been engaged as chief conductor at the Stadtheater at Ulm and had also bowed at the Festspielhaus in Salzburg.  From provincial Ulm, he moved to less-provincial Aachen, where in 1935, at 27, he was appointed Germany's youngest general music director.  But Aachen could hardly hope to keep a Karajan for itself.  In 1937 he debuted at the Vienna State Opera, and in 1938 at the Berlin State Opera, where he made his first international splash conducting "Tristan und Isolde."  That year he also cut his first record, "The Magic Flute" overture with the Berlin Staatskapelle, and the signing of his contract with Deutsche Grammophon inaugurated a lifelong involvement with the microphone and engineering console that stretched from 78s right up to CDs.  Indeed his activities in the studio eventually yielded a staggering discography of more than 800 recordings -- more than any other conductor -- and an income of around $6 million a year.  During World War II Karajan's second marriage to a woman with an unequivocally Jewish grandparent created some difficulties with the Hitler regime, and the questions about his relationship with the Nazi party -- which he joined in 1935, ostensibly as a prerequisite for the Aachen post -- have never been fully resolved.  Nonetheless, in 1947, after several years in postwar limbo, Karajan was cleansed of the Nazi taint and permitted to conduct again in Vienna, where he was soon appointed artistic director of the venerable Gesellschaft der Musikfreunde.  But it was in 1955 that Karajan received his most resounding title when the Berlin Philharmonic appointed him music director for life.  To be sure the marriage was not always smooth, and after 34 years the lifetime status ended on a sour note in April with Karajan's resignation.  He had stated ill health as his reason, but the true cause lay in the recurring squabbles of the past several years between the independent-minded orchestra members and a conductor who preferred to rule by divine right.  It is possible that the more cordial relationship Karajan enjoyed with the Vienna Philharmonic, which he called "my left hand," rested on its autonomy, which precluded any threat of a Karajan takeover.  In any event, the "gemutlich" warmth of its sound under his baton provided a telling contrast with the ofttimes cold brilliance of his Berlin forces, and now that Karajan has gone, it is in his vast recorded legacy that these contrasts can be judged.  To be sure, his persistent concern with engineering often yielded an artificial quality -- all those dynamic highs and lows -- particularly noticeable on CD reissues of his earlier work.  But Karajan's assured sense of an overall artistic conception is always evident.  His repertoire encompassed everything from Bach to Schoenberg, though he tended to concentrate his efforts on repeated interpretations of certain standard groups -- four complete cycles of the Beethoven symphonies, for example, the last (Deutsche Grammophon) begun as soon as he realized that he could fit the entire Ninth on one compact disk.  Karajan's Brandenberg Concertos (Deutsche Grammophon) are surprisingly lucid, if not particularly in keeping with current musicological orthodoxy, and his Mozart symphonies (variously on EMI) can be a bit weighty.  However his Bruckner cycle (Deutsche Grammophon) is a masterpiece, especially the towering Eighth symphony and the Fourth (in which slow tempos produce the impression of a protracted dream).  A primary characteristic of Karajan the opera conductor is his love of beautiful singing, but not at the expense of drama.  "Otello," with Jon Vickers and Mirella Freni, and "Don Carlo," with Ms. Freni, Jose Carreras and Agnes Baltsa (EMI), ought to be in any collection.  Likewise Karajan strove in his Wagner recordings to escape from the so-called "Bayreuth bark," and for all the controversy that raged around it, his Ring cycle (Deutsche Grammophon) is probably the most beautifully sung on record.  Karajan once said that, after death, he would probably sit in the clouds with a spyglass.  Listening to some of these recordings again, I hope he's got a CD player there too.  ---  Mr. Scherer writes frequently about music.  1988-89 will be remembered as the year of the couch potato that roared.  A tiny but large-lunged minority, outraged at the programs it was seeing on its TV sets, began an unprecedented number of campaigns to drive these shows off the air.  Nurses attacked "Nightingales."  Abortion foes attacked "Roe vs.  Wade."  And everyone attacked Mort and Geraldo.  From the comic (NBC's "Saturday Night Live") to the sleazy (ABC's "Crimes of Passion II"), these programs were attacked where it hurt the most -- in the pocketbook -- as advertisers (Sears, Tambrands, Domino's Pizza), fearing the wrath of special-interest groups, pulled out.  This month, the Rev. Donald Wildmon and his organization, Christian Leaders for Responsible TV, listed several programs that they considered "worst offenders" -- programs they felt were overloaded with sex, violence, profanity or anti-Christian ideals (like "Miami Vice," "Midnight Caller," "Tour of Duty," "A Man Called Hawk," etc.) -- and urged their 60 million followers to boycott those shows' sponsors, Clorox and Mennen.  If any one TV program has come to symbolize this brouhaha, it is Fox's "Married . . .  With Children" (Sundays, 9 p.m. EDT).  A satiric look at the most un-nuclear TV family since the Louds, "Married . . .  With Children" is the story of the Bundys -- snotty younger brother Bud, trampy older sister Kelly, sex-starved spandex-clad wife Peg, and terminally boorish husband Al.  Two episodes airing in repeats over the next few weeks show this crass bunch at their crassest -- "Eating Out" and "The House that Peg Lost."  In "Eating Out," for example, the Bundys get an inheritance check of $237 when Uncle Henry dies.  The kids want to go see a rock group, Tears and Vomit, and Mom wants a bikini wax, but they all decide on a group outing.  "Now kids," says Mom, "how often do we get to do things as a family?  I mean, besides getting Grandma Bundy out of the drunk tank."  At the restaurant, as the Bundys take to the dance floor, Kelly remarks to Bud, "I think it's romantic that two dinosaurs like Mom and Dad still care enough about each other to dance."  Cut to Peg, head on Al's shoulder, saying, "Couldn't you even wear deodorant?"  And when the food comes and they hoover it down, licking their plates, it's obvious that we're dealing with farce here, not reality -- but farce all the more shocking because it takes the form of the family living-room sitcom, that most comfortable of TV formats.  In "Married," Ron Leavitt and Michael Moye have created a show that continually sets up homespun situations, then subverts them.  That's its anarchic charm.  We're constantly told that Peg is no June Cleaver. ("So who died and made me Mom?" she asks.) Al is certainly no Ward. ("How come you never take me to a hotel?" demands Peg.  "You'd just find your way home," says Al.) And together, the two of them, well . . . ("Al, you promised we'd have sex," Peg frets.  "Oh God," says Al, "is it 1989 already?").  This is the show that drew the wrath of Michigan housewife Terry Rakolta this spring.  In a series of highly publicized exchanges, Ms. Rakolta reported how she had been shocked, when flipping around the dial, to see this kind of show -- so shocked she went right on watching.  Now frankly, I think "Married" misses as often as it hits: Sometimes it's outrageously funny, sometimes it's one gross-out joke after another -- about bad breath and pimples, for example.  Both upcoming episodes limp along on smelly feet gags.  But is that any reason to ban a program?  Of course not.  Here in America, we get to choose for ourselves which smelly feet to watch, and which to ignore.  And that's what viewers have been saying.  Since Ms. Rakolta's tirade, the show's ratings have actually gone up.  Ironically, Ms. Rakolta has -- more than any high-priced flack -- single-handedly introduced the nation to "Married . . .  With Children."  Just two weeks ago, the show garnered 21% of the total TV audience, its highest share ever (which is all the more remarkable because it was a repeat).  And where the viewers go, the advertisers follow.  In the "upfront" ad sales market for the coming season (which starts for "Married" Aug. 27), " 'Married' sold much better than last year," according to Fox TV President Jamie Kellner.  In fact, he says, "Married" sold perhaps as much as two to three times better.  And with 60 advertisers on the show, according to Mr. Kellner, "Married" seems to be keeping up with Fox's overall 40% jump in new advertising.  Now this is good news all around, especially since network executives are a skittish lot, constantly fretting about the squeaky wheels, the outraged fringe citizens, the self-appointed guardians of public morality -- the invigilators of pudicity.  The network credo is "Never Offend Anyone."  This, of course, is a particularly silly way to run any creative enterprise.  You can just see James Joyce: "Gee, I guess I'd better not write that 'Portrait of the Artist' -- it might offend the Irish."  Or Bizet: "Better not write 'Carmen' -- it might offend the gypsies."  If you don't offend anyone, all you get is some pablum sure to bother no one, because no one will stay awake to watch it.  I may just be a small-screen libertarian, but I say: Leave these programs alone.  Let them offend people.  If they're so terrible, no one will watch them, and they'll die.  The truth is that over the years, I've been a lot more offended by the sheer dumbness of most TV programming than by any meaningful nudge or three-letter word.  So to Mr. Wildmon and Ms. Rakolta, a bit of advice.  If you don't like a program, that's why God invented the remote control.  Personally, I hated "Nightingales."  I hated "The Mort Downey Jr. Show."  And I'm not a huge fan of "Married . . .  With Children."  But anytime someone starts trying to ban programs for me, I get nervous.  That's why, every Sunday, I'll be watching "Married . . .  With Children."  That's why I'll be buying Clorox and Mennen products, looking cleaner, smelling better, feeling 100% American.  The Bank of England this week is expected to begin disciplining some people with roles in the scandal involving National Westminster Bank PLC's handling of a 1987 rights issue.  Central bank officials probably will seek the dismissals of certain individuals who they believe are unfit to remain in British banking, knowledgeable persons said.  The central bank also may try to bar others who already have left banking from assuming future top-level posts in the industry, according to these sources.  A Bank of England spokesman declined to comment Friday.  The Bank of England would be the first regulatory agency to react to a highly critical government report about the Blue Arrow PLC rights issue.  More disciplinary steps may follow soon as United Kingdom financial-market regulators decide whether to restrict certain individuals or firms from securities-markets activities.  On Friday, officials of the Securities Association said that the self-regulatory agency expects to complete its own review of the report within several weeks.  The government report, released July 20, criticized County NatWest, the investment-banking arm of the big British bank, and U.K. securities house UBS-Phillips & Drew for misleading the stock market in their handling of a Blue Arrow stock sale that flopped in 1987.  The #837 million ($1.38 billion) issue financed the employment-services concern's takeover of U.S.-based Manpower Inc.  The Bank of England this week likely will write banks and individuals about persons it considers not "fit and proper" for the positions they hold.  Institutions that don't fire these staffers risk losing their banking licenses.  The report, which seriously shook London's financial community, triggered an unprecedented purge of NatWest's senior management last week, damaging its reputation and investment-banking ambitions.  NatWest Chairman Lord Boardman announced his resignation even though he wasn't cited in the report; two deputy chief executives and a third senior director also stepped down.  Cuisinarts Inc., one of the most famous brand names in housewares, plans to file for protection from creditors under Chapter 11 of the U.S. Bankruptcy Code, its chairman and chief executive officer said.  Donald L. Luke also said the deficit-ridden company, which markets the Cuisinart food processor, already is beginning to meet with prospective acquirers.  He declined to name them, but said they include major concerns in and outside the housewares industry.  The filing will be made as soon as possible, Mr. Luke said.  Under Chapter 11, a company operates under protection from creditors' lawsuits while it works out a plan to pay its debts.  Mr. Luke provided few details such as the size of assets and liabilities.  He said 1988 revenue was in the range of $50 million, but he wouldn't specify losses.  Cuisinarts and its major lender, Bank of Boston, will arrange the sale of the company, Mr. Luke said.  Cuisinarts, Stamford, Conn., was acquired in a leveraged buy-out last year by an investment group that included Robert M. Fomon, the former chairman of E.F. Hutton Group.  Mr. Fomon couldn't be reach for comment.  It was founded in 1971 by Shirley and Carl Sontheimer, who two years later began marketing the food processor.  Cuisinart quickly became the Rolls Royce of food processors, and today the brand owns 45% of the market for expensive food processors.  But the company is failing, Mr. Luke said, because neither the founders nor the new owners were fleet enough in plastering the famous Cuisinart name onto other products.  Currently, the brand name is carried only by the food processor and a few smaller electrical items, which combined contribute 85% of the company's sales, Mr. Luke said.  Some imported cookware is also marketed under the Cuisinart name, he added.  "You have an outstanding brandname in a big industry, but the company needs some economies of scale," Mr. Luke said.  "The company is a body looking for a head or at least some good arms and legs to give it a more complete composition."  Further, the entire food-processor category has been less than vibrant in recent years as the percentage of ownership of the product has swelled, Mr. Luke said.  In retrospect, Cuisinarts might not have been an ideal leveraged-buy-out candidate, Mr. Luke said.  He noted, for example, that the company required a significant investment to expand the product line and gain economies of scale.  Moreover, it doesn't make its products and thus has no control over manufacturing by its suppliers, who are based in Asia and Europe, Mr. Luke said.  A federal judge's decision to allow American Telephone & Telegraph Co. to enter the electronic publishing business could trigger rapid development of the U.S. information services industry.  By allowing a ban on such activities by AT&T to lapse as scheduled on Aug. 24, Judge Harold Greene paved the way for the company to provide a wide assortment of information, such as financial and securities data, videotex -- electronic delivery of information to home television sets -- and news, over telephone lines.  The telephone giant would end up competing with electronic publishers such as Citicorp, Reuters Holdings PLC, Dun & Bradstreet Corp. and Dow Jones & Co., the publisher of this newspaper.  Analysts have predicted AT&T's entry would help create a mass market for the fledgling industry.  AT&T has hinted at ways it could crack that elusive mass market.  In recent weeks, the company has acknowledged having discussions with Nintendo of America Inc. about providing owners of Nintendo game hardware access to information services using phone lines.  No agreement has been announced, and an AT&T spokesman would say only that the company "has a number of options under review."  In any case, a mass market has been elusive for on-line information service providers.  Moreover, major companies including Knight-Ridder Inc. and Time Mirror Co. spent millions of dollars during the 1980s in failed efforts to break into videotex, one type of information service.  Because of its communications prowess, AT&T's entry into information services could provide a heretofore critical but missing link, analysts and industry experts.  They pointed out, for example, that AT&T has been spending as much as $2.5 billion yearly on research and development, with emphasis on software.  Experts say that one challenge for the industry has been simply the difficulty of using the information and note that AT&T probably could help tremendously in surmounting that hurdle.  AT&T had asked Judge Greene last April to let the ban expire, and he was widely expected to do so, as there has been little opposition to AT&T's entering the information services field.  Even the American Newspaper Publishers Association and the Consumer Federation of America, which vociferously oppose entry into the market by the seven regional Bell companies, didn't call for retaining the AT&T ban.  Judge Greene said there is robust competition nationwide in the long-distance industry.  Thus, he said, "The monopoly or quasi-monopoly situation that gave life and reason to the electronic-publishing prohibition on AT&T no longer exists."  The ban, part of the decree that broke up the Bell System five and a half years ago, was put in place to protect the fledgling information services industry from potential anticompetitive activities by AT&T, which essentially controlled the long-distance network.  Judge Greene has allowed the regional Bell companies to offer electronic "gateways" that allow customers to reach a variety of information services.  But he has retained the ban on Bell companies' providing the services themselves, because the local companies are virtual monopolies with the potential for anticompetitive behavior.  Some Bell companies said they should be allowed to provide the content of data bases over their telephone networks.  "We could increase the range of choices offered to customers, for instance by using our expertise with Yellow Pages advertising," said a spokesman for Bell Atlantic Corp., Philadelphia.  Taken together, the essays in Peter Shaw's "The War Against the Intellect: Episodes on the Decline of Discourse" (University of Iowa Press, 200 pages, $22.50 cloth, $10.95 paper) make a persuasive argument that scholarship and education are undergoing a critical and by no means salutary transformation.  In Mr. Shaw's overview, concepts we normally associate with rational discourse -- logic, reason, objectivity -- are being replaced by the "right feeling and good intentions" and a dictatorial skepticism about the validity of knowledge.  The war of the book's title thus rages on two fronts: the political and the philosophical.  Guilt and shame over the humanities' failure to take proper cognizance of women, minorities and the disenfranchised has created an animus toward traditional aesthetic and historical surveys.  As a result, once widely accepted ideas about the origins and intent of art are seen by a new generation of scholars as "yet another hegemonic imposition employed by the powerful to enslave the rest of society."  The philosophical assault is more subtle, though no less subversive.  Borrowing from such French philosophers as Barthes and Derrida, American critics have discovered the specter of indeterminacy haunting the house of intellect.  Our neurological makeup and the self-reflexive limits of language make us read and interpret texts in predetermined patterns, so they say.  Objectivity is a naive myth, and hierarchies of meaning a political tool.  All this makes for heady academic debate, but, Mr. Shaw cautions, when put into pedagogic practice it becomes cause for grave concern.  The avowed purpose of such teachings is to demonstrate that, of the five words in the phrase High Culture of Western Civilization, four are inherently unfair to most of the world's population.  Political convictions, of course, cannot be proved wrong, but their application to texts, as Mr. Shaw shows, can contain errors and inconsistencies issuing from ideological dogma.  Mr. Shaw's reconnaissance in the enemy camp is laid out in 11 essays whose titles alone make a depressing statement: "The Dark Age of the Humanities," "The Demotion of Man," "The Decline of Criticism."  Each essay documents a set of revisionist tendencies as they affect, among other subjects, Pound's "Cantos," Melville's "Typee," scholarly editing, plagiarism and anthropology.  What emerges is a view of civilized man as a nasty piece of goods, endowed with fewer noble qualities than are found in primitive societies or sometimes in the animal kingdom.  As for the treasures of Western culture, they are, according to one feminist critic, nothing more than "the patrimony of male writers."  For Mr. Shaw, the danger lies not so much in such opinions, but in the process of intimidation that bars dissent.  In the current academic climate, high culture is viewed as a form of social control that must be opposed at every turn.  Reparations must be made to neglected artists (female) and unrecognized work (by minorities).  To think otherwise is to run the risk of being considered insensitive to these groups.  What's a poor academic to do?  Apparently, most acquiesce.  As Mr. Shaw notes, it is not assaults by Goths and cultural revolutionaries that pose the crucial danger, "but the ways that the guardians of the tradition themselves behave."  In short, institutions of learning crumble from within, not without.  Is Mr. Shaw right?  In his interrogation of scholars who wish to be politically correct and intellectually hip, I believe he is right on the mark.  It's the intensity of his concern, however, that may prove bothersome.  A critic must be allowed his earnestness and probity, yet the essays could do with a flash of wit or humor, if only to put Mr. Shaw firmly on the side of the angels.  More importantly, his indignation leads him to a rash statement of his own: "Our predecessors thought and expressed some things in ways that cannot be improved upon."  Surely those committed to the fallacy of tradition could want no weaker line of defense to overrun.  What is most infuriating about these antinomian theorists is their presumption that the rest of us hold to a permanent and implacable set of values.  What historical-minded person is unaware that values and beliefs must continually be re-evaluated in light of changing social conditions?  Without such changes, art itself would not change.  Being a reasonable man, Mr. Shaw resents the role that reason has been thrust into.  Reason is not a weapon the powerful wield over the powerless.  If acts undertaken in the name of reason have been clouded by self-interest and prejudice, that does not nullify reason itself.  As for art, it is certainly not the best of times and, as Mr. Shaw glumly observes, politically correct art is critically acclaimed art.  Yet I cannot help but feel, despite Mr. Shaw's severe and lucid arguments, that the idea of high art will survive the polemics that both defend and deface it, just as civilization will outlast the wars fought in its midst.  ---  Mr. Krystal is a writer and editor living in New York.  Healthcare International Inc. said its president and executive vice president resigned, effective immediately, and Jean P. Smith, formerly senior vice president of the psychiatric group, was named president.  The health-care concern said that David Whelan, former president, and Elliot H. Weir Jr., former executive vice president, will remain directors.  The company also said it doesn't plan to fill the executive vice president's job right away.  Healthcare didn't say why the executives resigned and a spokesman from a public relations firm said the company wouldn't comment.  Last week, Healthcare International said it expects a loss for the fourth quarter.  It also said it is facing cash-flow problems that could affect its ability to make debt payments on leases and equipment and could put it in technical violation of its loan agreements.  Mr. Whelan and Mr. Weir also dropped a plan to purchase the 73% of Healthcare's stock they don't already own, saying they weren't able to arrange financing.  In the fourth quarter ended June 30, 1988, Healthcare had net income of $1.4 million, or 16 cents a share.  The company's shares closed Friday at $2.50, up 75 cents, in American Stock Exchange composite trading.  Placer Dome Inc. said it seeks to expand its North American gold mining and base metals interests, and it has looked at purchases as large as British Petroleum Co.'s former minerals unit, sold earlier this year for $4.2 billion.  In an interview, Placer Dome Chairman Fraser Fell said the Vancouver, British Columbia, gold producer aims to shrink the average operating cost of its North American gold mines by acquiring lower-cost production, and it also hopes to expand its base metal interests, possibly to include nickel.  As previously reported, Mr. Fell said Placer Dome, which currently has about 700 million Canadian dollars of cash (US$591.9 million), might spend upwards of C$1 billion on a purchase.  He said it considered spending more than that for BP's minerals arm because Placer Dome could have broken it up and sold pieces off to reduce acquisition-related debt.  BP's minerals business was sold to Britain's RTZ Corp.  Mr. Fell wouldn't offer specifics about possible base metal acquisitions, but he ruled out Falconbridge Ltd., which last year bought back Placer Dome's 24.7% stake in the company and is now 28%-owned by Noranda Inc., and Inco Ltd., since it is large and couldn't easily be broken up.  Inco and Falconbridge are the noncommunist world's largest and second-largest nickel producers, respectively.  Mr. Fell said the recent appointment of former Inco treasurer Ian Austin as Placer Dome's chief financial officer "will give us new strength" to pursue opportunities on the base metals side.  Turning to gold mining, Mr. Fell said Placer Dome is examining several prospective acquisitions, though he didn't offer details.  Some of Placer Dome's Canadian mines have cash operating costs above US$300 an ounce, just US$74 below the metal's current spot price and more than three times the operating cost at the company's recently opened Misima gold mine, in Papua New Guinea.  Mr. Fell said the company seeks to reduce its average cash operating costs of more than US$230 an ounce, which are inflated by its higher-cost mines, by acquiring lower-cost gold production.  "We're interested in increasing our production in North America, and thereby reducing our costs in North America," he said.  Mr. Fell wouldn't say whether Placer Dome would bid for the North American gold assets of London-based Consolidated Gold Fields PLC, should the assets become available.  But a person close to Placer Dome confirmed that it has already told Britain's Hanson PLC, which recently agreed to acquire Consolidated Gold for US$5.52 billion, that the company would make a bid.  Analysts expect Hanson to sell many of Consolidated Gold's mining assets, including its directly owned gold mines in California and Nevada, and its 49.3% stake in Newmont Mining Corp., the biggest U.S. gold producer.  Toronto's American Barrick Resources Corp., which previously declared its interest in Newmont, said it doesn't expect Hanson to complete its review of Consolidated Gold's assets until late this year.  Separately, Mr. Fell said Placer Dome's gold output is expected to reach 1.2 million ounces this year and about 1.5 million ounces by 1991 or early 1992, up from 825,000 ounces last year, mainly because of production from its new mines in Papua New Guinea.  Fred Wenninger was groping for a new strategy.  He tried hiring more salesmen to push his radio products, but they took too much time to learn the ropes.  He tried changing the product design, but that cost a lot.  One solution, he decided, was to beef up advertising.  Lucky for Mr. Wenninger, who was then president of Allied Signal Inc.'s Bendix/King division, all this trial and error was carried out in the safety and privacy of his own computer.  He won't disclose Bendix/King's ultimate strategy, but he says using computer simulation was like gaining "the luxury of 20 years of experience" in a week.  Mr. Wenninger praises the software, saying it "is just the dog's woof."  Business simulation has been around corporate computer rooms and graduate-school labs for years.  But it is only recently that powerful personal computers and simpler software have brought the technology to average managers, giving them something akin to the airline pilot's experience in flight simulation.  The idea is to let managers launch experiments, test strategies, even fail -- without suffering the consequences.  Some computer experts are skeptical that simulation will ever be a standard management tool.  But inventors and users have high hopes that the machines can teach managers to do what they're always being exhorted to do: think about the long term, and care about more than their immediate turf.  "We sit managers down at the computer and try to make them look at the big picture," says Chris Charyk, who uses simulation software as an internal consultant at Digital Equipment Corp.  In the normal business day, of course, there's not much time for that.  Typical managers rush to decisions, at best weighing a few options and looking ahead a couple of months.  At worst, they live from crisis to crisis.  "If you're up to your butt in alligators, {it's too late} to think about draining the swamp," says a marketing executive for a consumer products company.  He cites his own product managers, who routinely "assuage short-term pain" by cutting prices to make sales, only to see retail inventories mount and volume drop a few months later.  He is working on a simulation for his employees, he says, hoping to let them "live through the situation and see what happens if you did a little drainage."  Bruce Carbone, a process control engineer at General Electric Co.'s turbine division, got a similar message in a recent project leadership simulation conducted by Planning & Control Inc., a New York-based training firm.  The PCI software pushed teams of GE employees to finish a project within a certain budget and deadline, Mr. Carbone says.  His team's inclination was to "throw people" at the project, figuring that more bodies would get it done sooner.  But the simulation showed that, in staffing, less is more: The extra workers in the simulation took longer to learn the job, and more people meant that there were more communication foul-ups.  When that happens in a real plant or office, says GE project manager Paula Wright, managers just rationalize it or "say, 'Well, they must be the wrong people,' so you change people."  Mr. Carbone says that making the mistake with the computer has made him think twice before doing the same in real life.  Real life is what simulations try to replicate.  A spreadsheet, probably the most common manager's software tool, presents static, numerical calculations and is basically a time saver.  A simulation should be more like getting into a good novel or movie, says Barry Richmond, president of High Performance Systems Inc., a software firm in Lyme, N.H.  "If it's powerful, you lose your sense of time, you are transported."  So simulations try to reproduce not only the numbers of business but also the human frailties and unexpected events that complicate working life.  PCI training simulations include workplace "personalities," from a workaholic who feels she doesn't get enough credit to an ornery veteran who doesn't want to work so hard anymore.  And just as teams of managers think they have pinned down a workable strategy, the software flashes "news bulletins": "Had an accident -- lost time 12 hours]" or "Vendor A announces 4% price increase]"  Many simulation tools, like those created by PCI, are used only in training.  But some companies are beginning to market software designed for day-to-day use by the individual manager at his desk.  One such tool is Stella, created by High Performance for Apple computers, and designed to allow users to build into it their own scenarios, using graphic displays and other visual aids.  With Stella, the screen shows a sort of animated plumbing system, where users can fill little buckets with cash, inventory and even frustration, and can send spending, hiring, sales and even buildup of confidence flowing through small pipes.  Lightbulbs flash warnings such as "Cost]"  Even if a manager doesn't have exact figures to plug in, Mr. Wenninger says, he can use the computer's hand-held pointer to draw onto the screen "what's in the mind's eye."  Advocates say that the power of simulation lies in its immediate feedback.  "It's the old Pavlovian thing," says Donna Wilson, a partner in Mader Group, which does simulation training.  Normally, she says, business people make decisions in the first quarter that they "don't get feedback on until next year" -- if then.  "If you're being {rated} on producing sales in this quarter," says Digital's Mr. Charyk, "the whole idea of manufacturing and production isn't your responsibility.  It's someone else's."  Simulation, he says, can give sales managers a graphic feel for what happens in a distant plant or warehouse weeks or months after the sales department decides to offer a discount allowance or attend another trade show.  To do this, a simulation piles on as many variables as possible, pushing users to see beyond simple cause and effect.  Without that look at what's further down the road, "the things we can measure {immediately} are the things we focus on," says Bob Bergin, a property claims manager who has helped develop simulation training for colleagues at Hanover Insurance Corp.  In real life, he says, a claims manager who skimps on the claims process and gets through lots of business quickly with few employees might look like "a hero" and get a promotion.  Simulation shows that this strategy could obscure less salutary side effects, like higher payments made on claims that aren't adequately investigated.  Hanover spent about 18 months developing a detailed simulation and has trained over 100 managers on it so far.  That kind of investment is what gives pause to some computer experts.  Tim Bajarin, executive vice president of Creative Strategies International, a high-technology market-research firm, says such customization of the software takes too much time and money to justify in many situations.  And he thinks the technology is going to appeal only to "managers with a lot of faith in computer process."  Chris Meyers, a consultant in San Francisco, is also cautious.  A simulation tool like Stella "might look less complex than the spread sheet," he says, "but it clearly boggles the average mind."  He shows clients the results of his simulation experiments, not the process.  Still, he considers his experiments enlightening.  "We're used to using models to predict what will happen," says Mr. Meyer.  "Stella is for understanding how things happen."  Thomas W. Boswell, 45 years old, was elected to the new post of vice chairman in the newly created office of the chief executive officer of the Overnite Transportation Co. unit.  The appointment is "part of a planned orderly transition," Mr. Boswell said.  But the company made no other transition announcements.  Harwood Cochrane, 77, remains chairman and chief executive.  Mr. Cochrane founded Overnite in 1935; it was sold to Union Pacific in 1986.  Mr. Boswell had been senior executive vice president of Overnite.  A.W. Duke Jr., 58, remains president of the unit and also joins the new office.  Yoshitaka Fujitani was named president of NKK America Inc., the U.S. subsidiary of the steelmaker.  Mr. Fujitani had been general manager of the electronics materials department of the advanced materials division.  He succeeds Toshio Nagashima, who returned to Japan to become president of Nippon Kokan Systems Service Co., an NKK unit.  "While at Rome they talked, Sagunto was taken."  With these harsh words Titus Livius blamed his countrymen for the indecision that permitted Hannibal's capture of the allied Spanish city, and cleared the way for the Carthaginian's devastating march on Italy.  The potential for a similar situation is at hand today in Italy.  Its financial markets are governed by outdated regulations that could prevent it from competing effectively with other financial centers in the European capital market.  A coming deadline, 1990, makes the problem more serious.  Next year all remaining controls on capital movement within the Common Market are set to be lifted, except for a few nations granted extensions.  Capital will flow freely to the most efficient markets.  The approach of this deadline is compelling reforms to introduce transparency and efficiency at both the European and national levels.  A proposal for a European Community directive on tender offers has been completed recently, as has a directive on insider trading, while many countries already have begun restructuring to meet those challenges.  Suffice it to mention the United Kingdom's Big Bang of 1987, and more recent reforms in France and Spain.  And Italy?  To be sure, in Italy the reform of the financial market has become a high priority in the past few years, if the many public debates, formations of parliamentary commissions and reports by various regulatory agencies are evidence.  Also, various bills for regulating insider trading, tender offers, permitting closed-end and real-estate funds, creating a new type of securities company and authorizing futures markets have been introduced in Parliament.  To date, though, concrete change is lacking.  The Milan stock exchange, after the strong performance of 1985 and 1986, has attracted the attention of the nation's small investors.  The Italian economy also has drawn foreign investors.  Such attention, however, is limited largely to forays rather than sustained investment.  Some legislative intervention to bring efficiency and transparency to Italy's securities dealings is necessary.  A brief look at the market conditions reveals further opportunities for change: Approximately 70% of trading takes place off the official exchanges by banks that match up buy-and-sell orders among their own accounts, going to the exchange only to offset imbalances.  Thus, exchange price and volume data do not reflect accurately shares traded.  Public information is not abundant as listed companies are required to report only every six months; insider trading is not banned.  There is no legislation governing tender offers or takeovers.  Only in 1984 were open-end mutual funds established, while neither closed-end nor real-estate funds are permitted.  Futures markets do not exist.  The guidelines for reform have been in place since 1987, when Consob, Italy's securities watchdog agency, called for the replacement of the current auction system with electronic trading and compulsory trading on the official exchange.  The body also called for regulation of insider trading and fraudulent dealings, the establishment of takeover rules, and the formation of new securities companies controlled by both banks and brokers.  The establishment of the latter, known as Societa di Intermediazione Mobiliare, or SIMs, represents a compromise in a struggle between banks, which wanted direct access to the exchange through electronic trading, and brokers, who wanted to maintain their monopoly of the trading floor and simultaneously ensure that all trades pass through them.  Unfortunately, the lack of regulation is convenient to many parties.  In the confusion, they have carved niches.  As initial proposals were put forward, brokers, banks, commission agents and others began heavy lobbying that produced conflicting vetoes of the various bills presented.  Also contributing to the inertia is the failure by the government to present a coherent overall plan.  Not surprisingly, the result was a variety of bills, two of which have been approved by Italy's upper house.  These represent the first concrete steps toward reform.  The first bill, which regards tender offers, was approved by the Senate last year.  Since then it seems to have been forgotten, and has not yet been called for discussion in the Chamber of Deputies, Italy's lower house.  Despite this delay the bill is a sign something finally is happening in Italy.  The importance of setting clear rules for the behavior of both potential acquirers and target companies is self-evident.  The new rules serve a second function of protecting small investors, ensuring that they will be granted the same treatment as large shareholders, particularly in the event of a change of control.  The bill provides that in exceeding certain thresholds of share ownership within a specified time, a tender offer becomes mandatory.  The benefits would be divided equally among all shareholders.  This is important in Italy, where most listed companies are controlled by large shareholders.  In the past they made the rules of the game and were able to transfer controlling interests at a premium price without sharing with minority holders.  The second draft bill with significant potential for change concerns the SIMs.  This was pending in the Senate while banks and brokers each sought to amend it in their favor.  Eventually the bill was approved at the end of April.  It provides for exclusive performance by SIMs of trading and dealing in securities, underwriting, portfolio management and financial consulting, among other things.  An exception permits bank and fiduciary companies to perform certain of these activities as well.  Under this law Consob will control the regulatory, informational and transparency aspects of the SIMs, while the Bank of Italy will oversee their financial stability.  A major achievement of this draft bill, yet to be passed by the second house, is the proposal that all trading be effected on official exchanges.  An important feature is the introduction of criminal sanctions for abuses of fiduciary responsibility.  A crucial issue that has yet to be addressed satisfactorily is the conflict of interests.  While the SIMs will be strictly prohibited from dealing in shares of affiliate companies, the problem of separating the various functions undertaken by a SIM, which may be involved in various securities activities, has been left for Consob and the Bank of Italy to regulate.  This is scarcely sufficient, as the potential for insider trading and conflict of interests is immense.  The law itself should have proposed a Chinese Wall and imposed sanctions for its violation.  Finally, this draft bill provides for the institution of a futures market by 1992.  Italy has just formed a new government.  Now is the time to abandon the pattern of fragmentary intervention and adopt a new global approach consistent with the spirit of reform in the rest of Europe.  Such action would be an important gesture for business in Italy.  After such reform, the strength of Italy's economy could truly be reflected on the securities markets.  ---  Mr. Saravalle, a member of the New York and the Italian bar, practices corporate law in Rome.  A federal judge's tentative decision to dismiss a massive lawsuit alleging that numerous big insurance companies conspired to control the insurance market signals only the first round of what still shapes up as a long, bitter legal fight.  The suit was brought in March 1988 by California and 18 other states and quickly became a symbol of the broad national backlash against skyrocketing insurance rates.  Its primary targets include Aetna Casualty & Surety Co., Allstate Insurance Co., Hartford Fire Insurance Co., Cigna Corp. and Lloyd's of London.  The suit charges that the companies colluded to deny cities and businesses certain kinds of liability coverage and to drive up rates in order to offset increased underwriting losses.  In a 58-page opinion circulated among attorneys in the case last week, U.S. District Judge William W. Schwarzer concluded that, even if it were proved that the defendants conspired as alleged, they couldn't be held liable for it because of a 45-year old federal statute that exempts insurance companies from most antitrust laws.  The judge also said Lloyd's couldn't be sued because of its foreign status.  Lawyers on both sides of the case cautioned that the proposed decision isn't final and predicted the case would go on.  Judge Schwarzer set a hearing for Sept. 15 for comment on the proposed decision; lawyers for the California attorney general's office, which is handling the plaintiffs' side of the case, said they will press the judge to revise the decision.  In any event, whatever ruling Judge Schwarzer renders is almost certain to be appealed, lawyers familiar with the case said.  The suit has been seen as one of the most serious challenges ever to the special status granted the insurance industry by federal laws and other favorable government treatment.  In 1944, Congress passed the McCarran-Ferguson Act, which allows insurance companies to engage in anticompetitive activities -- price-fixing, for example -- that would be considered illegal in most industries.  The immunity, however excludes acts of "boycott, coercion or intimidation."  Critics have charged for years that the antitrust exemption permits a small cartel of dominant companies to manipulate the market, and the states' suit alleges precisely that.  Specifically, the suit charges that beginning in September 1984, the defendants pressured an industry trade group into rewriting industrywide policy standards to exclude coverage for pollution damages and for "retroactive" losses -- losses occurring before the starting date of a policy.  The changes battered many municipalities, businesses and nonprofit organizations, which suddenly had to pay much higher premiums for less coverage.  The industry has maintained that the changes were necessary because of court rulings in the early 1980s that greatly expanded their liability.  But the lawsuit alleges that the changes amounted to an illegal industry boycott that limited the availability of liability insurance in the U.S.  However, in his tentative opinion, Judge Schwarzer said that the actions of the companies didn't constitute a boycott and thus were legal under the protections of the McCarran-Ferguson Act, regardless of whether collusion had occurred.  Even if the decision stands up through the appeals process, the insurance industry still faces attacks for such practices on other fronts.  In November, California voters approved an initiative making insurers subject to the state's antitrust laws for any future collusive actions.  The initiative also mandated sharp cutbacks in property and casualty insurance rates, although subsequent rulings by the state's insurance commission have made widespread rate rollbacks less likely.  Consumer groups in other states are pushing for passage of similar measures.  Advisers to Hooker Corp. were expected to arrive in the U.S. over the weekend to decide whether the financially troubled developer and retailer will seek court protection under Chapter 11 of the U.S. Bankruptcy Code.  The development follows the appointment last week of a court-appointment provisional liquidator to manage the Sydney-based concern.  The Hooker advisers include Richard Grellman, a partner in the Sydney office of accounting firm KPMG Peat Marwick and Sean Wareing, a partner in Gatfield Robinson Wareing Ltd., a small, Sydney-based financial advisory company.  A Chapter 11 filing would protect L.J. Hooker Corp., the company's U.S. subsidiary in Atlanta, from creditor lawsuits here while it works out a plan of reorganization.  Peat Marwick's U.S. partners also will be involved in deliberations regarding the fate of retailers Bonwit Teller and B. Altman & Co. Hooker also owns majority positions in Parisian Inc., a Birmingham, Ala.-based retailer; Sakowitz Inc., a Houston-based retailer, and various commerical properties.  Mr. Grellman said at a news conference in Australia Friday that he considered Hooker's U.S. holdings vital to its future and that there may be alternatives to a Chapter 11 filing.  Mr. Grellman was hired late month by Hooker to oversee an announced sale of assets the company valued at about $750 million.  The provisional liquidator, John Harkness, who heads the receivership, reconstructions and insolvency division of Peat Marwick in Sydney, was named last week following the collapse of a four-month moratorium involving 42 of Hooker's bank creditors owed 900 million Australian dollars (US$680 million).  As such, Mr. Harkness has wide powers over all aspects of Hooker's business, including the sale or retention of assets.  Mr. Harkness said Friday that fresh loans still are required for Hooker to continue its operations while it sells assets.  "There will be no fire sale," he said.  Hooker's liabilities totaled A$1.92 billion as of March 31.  Of that, Australian and other international banks are owed A$1.6 billion.  In addition to the A$900 million in unsecured loans, Hooker owes A$700 million that is secured against specific Hooker assets, mainly in the U.S.  The severity of Hooker Corp.'s problems were underscored Friday when Hersfield Developments Corp., the Melbourne-based family-owned company of Hooker chairman George Herscu, was placed in receivership at the request of some lenders.  Tony Hodgson and Andrew Cornell of Australian accounting firm Ferrier Hodgson & Co., said they were were appointed receiver and manager.  Mr. Hodgson said company records show the total value of Hersfield's shopping centers and office properties is A$700 million.  Liabilities, he added, are less than that amount.  "Our principal aim for the time being will be to control the income stream from the shopping centers and office buildings," said Mr. Hodgson in a statement.  He added that Mr. Herscu is cooperating with the receivers.  In an interview in early July, Ronald Pearce, a director at Hooker and chief general manager of Hersfield, said that Mr. Herscu's personal home and his Rolls-Royce were included in Hersfield Developments's holdings for tax purposes.  Whatever its outcome, the strange case of suspected Soviet spy Felix Bloch raises new questions about just how vigilantly the State Department protects American secrets.  If Mr. Bloch did spy for Moscow, he would be the first career U.S. diplomat known to have done so since 1961, and the first known spy to have headed a State Department office or been the day-to-day boss of an embassy. (Mr.  Bloch had that job in Vienna from 1983 through 1987).  On the face of it, that's a pretty good record.  It's only reasonable to assume the Soviets will be able to place at least a few spies in the sprawling foreign-policy apparatus.  And the Bloch case would make the department about the last national security agency to discover a spy in its midst in recent years -- the Central Intelligence Agency, the Army, the Navy, and even the supersecret National Security Agency all have been infected by current or former employees.  But a week before the Bloch case came to light, the Senate Intelligence Committee issued a blistering report charging the department with failing to act where security is concerned.  The laxness alleged in the report might explain how Mr. Bloch, who hasn't been arrested or charged, could have been on the KGB payroll, undetected, ever since he served in Berlin in the 1970s, as the FBI now suspects.  "The grave deficiencies in embassy security that have come to light in recent years . . . haven't been rectified," the committee wrote on July 14.  "The State Department has been derelict in failing to implement actions that are indispensible for the protection of U.S. diplomatic facilities."  The report asserted: "Our nation faces well-organized and sophisticated intelligence adversaries who have proven their ability to defeat the department's inadequate defenses."  Several congressmen, including House Minority Whip Newt Gingrich (R., Ga.), have been suggesting the Bloch case shows the U.S. must beef up its counter-spying capability.  President Bush, himself a former CIA director and ambassador, seemed to concede the point partially in a comment to reporters.  "Can we improve our counterintelligence?" he asked.  "We always ought to be striving to do that.  Can embassy security be improved?  We go through this periodically and the answer is, I'm sure it can."  The State Department says it "doesn't agree" with the Senate committee's report, and asserts it has "mounted a major world-wide program to improve security at all diplomatic posts."  In 1985, after bugs were discovered in both the current U.S. embassy in Moscow and a new one, and after terrorists were able to blow up the American Embassy in Beirut, the department formed an independent bureau of diplomatic security.  And last year, the CIA created a special security evaluation office to help make embassies more secure.  In a recent progress report, the new security bureau said that since 1985, it has made "security improvements" at 181 overseas posts, developed new security technology, instituted "an ambitious counterintelligence training program," beefed up computer security and more.  But the intelligence committee complained the new bureau is headed by just an assistant secretary, instead of a higher-ranking undersecretary-level official with direct access to the secretary of state.  It accused the department of failing to support the new CIA office, delaying a final decision to raze the new Moscow embassy, and carrying out "none" of various new security measures the Reagan administration proposed in 1987.  To understand why all this matters, it's necessary to focus on just what a U.S. embassy is.  A major embassy is a microcosm of the U.S. government's entire international-relations bureaucracy, with detachments from the State Department, the CIA, the Pentagon, and sometimes the NSA, the Federal Bureau of Investigation and anti-smuggling agents like the Customs Service.  All of them use classified communications channels.  Compromise an important official like Mr. Bloch, and you can read those cables and thus tap into the internal discussions of the U.S. government's national-security apparatus.  Break the codes themselves or invade the encryption technology, and you enhance your ability to read American cables elsewhere.  While Felix Bloch was deputy chief of mission in Vienna, the embassy there was on the front lines of the U.S. efforts to stop the Soviets from obtaining militarily useful Western technology, which often passed through neutral Austria.  A senior spy might have compromised that effort.  Soviet defector Vitaly Yurchenko is reported to have told the CIA in 1985 that the KGB had attained the ability to "read communications" at the Vienna embassy, as well as at the one in Moscow, according to the recent book, "Moscow Station."  Clayton Lonetree, a Marine guard recruited by the KGB, hadn't yet been transferred to Vienna when Mr. Yurchenko made that statement.  But Felix Bloch had been there for years.  Scientists at the National Aeronautics and Space Administration said they have produced a high-speed circuit using high-temperature superconductors that may drastically shrink the size of communications satellites and improve their performance.  High temperature is relative where superconductors are concerned.  The NASA circuit works at a frosty minus-320 degrees Fahrenheit.  But that is enough of an improvement, compared with past superconductors, so that researchers can cool the device with liquid nitrogen rather than liquid helium, which is costlier and more difficult to handle.  Kul Bhasin, a space-electronics researcher at NASA's Lewis Research Center in Cleveland, said the circuit could become part of future generations of satellites that operate at ultra-high frequencies, called K-band.  These frequencies would let satellites process data at much faster rates and handle many more customers than conventional satellites.  Mr. Bhasin said the superconducting circuit would enable satellite makers to reduce the size of certain filters from several yards in length to the size of a thumbnail.  Size is critically important in the satellite business, because launch costs are so high.  Smaller satellites can use smaller and less expensive rockets.  In addition, Mr. Bhasin said the circuit might be used in radar-imaging satellites to reduce the size of space antennas.  The military uses radar satellites to track targets through clouds and at night.  Resolution of radar antennas is related to their size, and shrinking an antenna could theoretically improve its ability to see small objects.  Mr. Bhasin said the superconductor circuit was made from a material called yttrium barium copper oxide.  Superconductors conduct electricity with no resistance and therefore with no loss of power.  But until recently, the materials had to operate at such low temperatures that they had to be cooled with expensive liquid helium.  A spate of discoveries raised hopes that superconductors soon would require little cooling and would spawn fabulous devices such as magnetically levitated trains.  But the optimism has faded recently, as researchers have come to appreciate how difficult it is to produce practical superconductors.  Mr. Bhasin said satellite circuits could become one of the first applications of high-temperature superconductors.  Workers are testing the mettle of the Chinese government on another front far from Tiananmen Square.  The site: CitiSteel USA, a steel mill on the shores of the Delaware River in Claymont, Del.  The facility was purchased last year by the Beijing government-owned China International Trust & Investment Co. in its first U.S. manufacturing venture.  The firm envisioned taking the former Phoenix Steel Corp. -- a twice-bankrupt idled steelmaker founded in 1783 -- and raising it, like the legendary bird, from the ashes.  And the streamlined plant, with $18 million of updated equipment, is churning out steel plate used for building bridges and construction vehicles.  But now, the project with backing from afar is running into some local problems.  About 750 members of the United Steelworkers union are expected today to picket the Chinese Embassy in Washington to protest what the union says are unfair hiring practices.  That complaint also is being investigated by the National Labor Relations Board.  In addition, the Delaware Senate has passed a bill to revoke a waiver that allows the plant to operate in an environmentally protected coastal zone where heavy manufacturing typically is prohibited.  Both the union and some state lawmakers contend CitiSteel went back on a promise to give preference in hiring to former Phoenix Steel employees.  They point out there are only 45 former union members among the concern's 175 hourly workers.  State Sen. Robert I. Marshall says that promise, made in 1988, helped persuade him to lead the fight to allow CitiSteel to reopen the plant in the coastal area.  He cites comments made to lawmakers last year by an attorney representing one of the Chinese investors.  The lawyer said that "in opening this plant, it is their intention to utilize those former workers who have the skills and can be the most helpful in getting the plant open."  Now, Sen. Marshall is sponsoring the bill to revoke the environmental exemption by Jan. 1 unless CitiSteel makes a goodfaith effort to hire former Phoenix employees.  "They violated the spirit of what the Delaware Legislature did to provide them with an opportunity to buy and operate the plant," he says.  The revocation, however, must pass the Republican-controlled House, and this may be difficult in a state known for laissez-faire relationships between companies and government.  For his part, CitiSteel President James Hasson says "there was never a commitment to bring back former employees as a total staff of the plant."  Moreover, the investor who made the promise to hire former Phoenix Steel employees pulled out of the project the day after the environmental waiver was granted.  Nevertheless, CitiSteel recently sent registered letters to former employees inviting them to apply for certain starting positions, and Mr. Hasson says the company is committed to hiring 25 more former Phoenix Steel employees.  Michael Locker of the New York consulting firm Locker Associates Inc. says it's a case of the union using new methods -- embassy protests and appeals to state lawmakers -- to get employers to recognize what the union believes are legitimate rights.  "Somebody who is a foreign investor and more sensitive about the public profile will be more impacted by that pressure," he says.  Lynn Williams, president of the United Steelworkers, says the union is doing "everything it can" in the CitiSteel case.  "We're committed to the struggle to try to ensure that former employees have an opportunity to keep their jobs when their companies are sold or recreated," he says.  The complaint of discriminatory hiring, filed with the regional office of the NLRB, has been sent to Washington.  Norman Hayman, staff representative for the United Steelworkers in the Delaware district, says that if the NLRB doesn't agree, "there's always a possibility we could organize the new workers."  Regardless, he says, the case isn't good for the Chinese.  "This is their first manufacturing venture here," he says.  "They say they're serious about expanding, and it can't help to have a real ugly situation starting out."  Masoud Muktaripidar pointed to a thin gray blanket folded into a neat rectangle on the floor.  "There is my place," said the 38-year-old prisoner, who is serving a 14-year sentence in Evin, Iran's most notorious jail.  His blanket is lined up alongside those of 13 other prisoners who share a cell measuring about 15 feet by 15 feet.  Down the hall, the late shah's brother, Hamid Reza, occupies a similar space.  In what appears to be part of an effort to soften Iran's harsh image in the West, foreign reporters yesterday toured areas of Evin, a vast fortress-like compound perched on the city's edge.  Iran has come under heavy fire from human-rights groups such as Amnesty International for the execution, torture and incarceration of political prisoners.  In the last year, large numbers of executions have been reported.  Iran says those sentenced to death are drug dealers, but opposition groups and Western diplomats say political prisoners have been killed as well.  At the same time, large numbers of long-term prisoners have been pardoned and released.  "They are cleaning up the jails," says a Western diplomat in Tehran, "releasing as many as they can and shooting the ones they see as too dangerous to let go."  Journalists first toured an empty cell block from which, officials said, all prisoners had recently been released.  A few tattered sports pin-ups of swimmers and soccer players still decorated the pale-blue cell walls, along with Koranic verses urging the reader to follow the right path.  The cells, carpeted and well-lit, used to accommodate members of prohibited groups such as the People's Mujahedeen and the Tudeh, or Communist Party.  "You call it political prisoners, we call it terrorists," an official of the Ministry of Islamic Guidance said.  At the "center of education and production," a vast air-conditioned workshop full of sewing machines and shoe-making benches, prisoners in blue uniforms stitched shirts and hammered at leather loafers.  Valolapour Hashem took a few minutes away from his cutting bench to tell how he arrived in Evin, convicted of spying for Israel.  The 30-year-old deserted from the Iran-Iraq war in 1987 and made his way through Iraq to Jordan.  Trying to swim to a cargo ship in the Gulf of Aqaba, he was picked up by Israeli troops and, he says, jailed and deported.  "I did something wrong," he says.  "But I hope they will give me an amnesty."  Mr. Muktaripidar shares the hope.  He has served eight years of his sentence for allegedly possessing a gun and sympathizing with the pre-revolutionary government of Shapour Bakhtiar.  Conditions, he says, aren't bad in this special wing where most of the inmates have recanted their ideologically unacceptable views.  The cells have television and prisoners are free to play soccer in the courtyard or ping pong inside.  Some work six hours a day for wages in the prison workshop, while others study English from a well-thumbed copy of the American Heritage Dictionary.  Mersud Hojian shares the cell because he once supported the Mujahedeen, a group of Islamic leftists who initially supported the revolution but later became its most violent opponents.  Mr. Hojian says his views changed gradually in jail.  "It's a process -- it's not that a man comes here and then becomes another man suddenly," he says.  He denies torture played any part in the change.  He knows of torture in the prision "as a rumor, yes; as a fact, no."  Not all prisoners are political.  Two brothers, Sayed and Reza Louie, are serving a six-year sentence for trying to cross the border illegally into Turkey on the way to join family members in the U.S.  Journalists weren't shown the execution yard at Evin, where more than 100 people are said to have been shot in a single day during the revolution's early turbulence.  Instead, walking through grape arbors and tomato patches, they saw a prison far less austere than many in the West.  But the image-building effort was shattered when a Danish newspaper reporter, Kurt Lyndorff, suddenly was grabbed by a prison official.  Yelling in Farsi, the man thrust him into an empty cell and started beating him.  Officials from the Ministry of Islamic Guidance, who had accompanied the journalists on the tour, quickly intervened.  But the reporter was bloodied in the encounter.  The prison worker claimed he had asked the reporter for identification; the reporter said he hadn't understood the request because it was made in Farsi.  Either way, the violence of the outburst against a foreign visitor raised disturbing questions about treatment of the Iranian prisoners.  Your "Women of Wall Street Bare Their Assets" article (July 17) was interesting, but is a subject about supervision, management or even business strategy.  Yet it appeared under the heading of Leisure & Arts.  It's very bold of the Journal to define the participation in pornography as an arts or leisure activity.  That notwithstanding, there is a business dilemma raised here.  A Wall Street woman should not fear losing her job for posing nude for Playboy, or any similar media, as long as she never has to deal with customers or other employees.  The firm shouldn't be held hostage to what can only be inconsistent customer responses to this woman.  And with employees' reactions, the woman has crossed the line from a woman with skills to a disruptive employee.  If these ladies of the '80s really wanted to prove they could pose and still keep their jobs, they could have used a more creative approach.  Each woman could have posed without permission or announcement and also insisted that their employer be kept anonymous.  Then if confronted by management about the impropriety of it all, they could respond with a question: "Did you or someone you know see me?"  Joe Stafford  Dallastown, Pa.  ---  To me, the subject reeks of sexual discrimination.  It's considered OK that men are encouraged to buy Playboy, to visit a Playboy Club or resort, to buy a book from its book club, to own shares of its stock.  But it's not OK for women who identify where they work to pose for Playboy in varying stages of undress?  That's pretty bizarre.  Does a man lose his job or get demoted when there is publication of his cheating on his wife, being drunk in public, using drugs or any other socially not-too-acceptable activity that brings unwanted attention to his employer?  How about publication of his political or religious beliefs that may differ from those of his employer?  If a man believes the act of a female employee voluntarily appearing nude or semi-nude is unacceptable, and a fireable offense, can he make the same decision without censure for firing a woman who, in print, professes her atheism, belief in abortion, love of a certain brand of cosmetics fragrance, scotch or vodka?  The only questionable activity of these women was not getting written permission from their employers to use their companies' names.  Ritasue Siegel  New York  {First of a Series}  MCLEAN, Va. -- In America's nightmare of drugs, the most tragic victims are our children.  I know.  In this quiet, well-to-do suburb of Washington, D.C., my teen-age son, Ryan, became trapped by drugs starting at about age 12 -- while he still was playing Little League baseball.  With his sunny smile, big brown eyes and impish wit, Ryan was a free-spirited charmer who could make you laugh.  A voracious collector of baseball cards, he would tell me he could name every batting champion back to the 1960s, "you know, the ancient days of baseball, when you were still young, Dad."  Now, his laughter is gone.  Because of drugs, he is dead.  And every day, my heart breaks a little more.  Ryan's death, like countless others, isn't officially recorded in the nation's rising drug toll.  On the night of Oct. 1, 1987, at age 16, he drove his tan Mustang off a street in nearby Vienna, Va.  He inexplicably fled the minor accident and ran a half-mile down the road, where he was bumped by a car.  Even though a passing motorist tried to restrain him, Ryan, with a crazed look in his eyes and a sudden strength far beyond his small size, broke away and ran down a hill and onto a busy expressway; he was hit head-on and killed instantly by a van that didn't stop.  Tests showed no evidence of drugs.  But he was speeding from the home of a drug dealer.  We later learned that, earlier the same day, he had obtained elsewhere three "hits" of LSD, a hallucinogen that can cause panic and that often doesn't show up in tests.  One way or another, drugs took my only son.  The only reason my family is now reliving our nightmare in print is the hope that it might save one young person who thinks he or she can control their drug use -- and one family from the pain we will always feel.  In opinion polls, drug use constantly ranks as one of America's top concerns.  "It is foremost on parents' minds," says Lee Dogoloff, executive director of the American Council for Drug Education.  "Drug and alcohol use is the thing most likely to wrest their child from them before that child reaches adulthood."  What is frightening as a parent is that children have an amazing ability to hide even extreme drug and alcohol abuse until it is almost too late.  We didn't find out about Ryan until he was 14.  And the extent of his use was far beyond our worst fears.  In a paper I discovered only recently, Ryan wrote during a rehabilitation program in early 1986: "I used cocaine a lot.  It started out as a weekend use, but soon I had or tried to have it daily.  I used PCP {an hallucinogen} about 2 or 3 times a week.  I used hallucinogens all the time, such as acid, mushrooms, peyote, ecstasy and mescaline.  I used LSD about 300 times."  The omnipresent drug was marijuana.  It started Ryan on his downfall and was always the drug he went back to.  He never meant to get hooked.  But for reasons nobody yet knows, some people have a predisposition or vulnerability to drug abuse.  "For such kids," says Dr. Frederick K. Goodwin, head of the U.S. Alcohol, Drug Abuse and Mental Health Administration, "even a first use of alcohol or an illicit drug may be an irrevocable step, leading to serious substance abuse."  In the suburbs of America, both drug use and the violence related to it are often hidden.  Ryan was coming from the home of a drug dealer who for years had corrupted and molested youths who feared for their lives if they exposed him.  After Ryan's death, several young people courageously came forward.  In 1987, the man was arrested and charged with statutory rape and selling drugs to minors.  He will never go to trial.  Around Christmas of that year, he killed himself by placing a plastic bag over his head and suffocating.  His death also isn't counted as drug-related.  I will never fully know why Ryan got involved in drugs.  In my view, there is still a dangerous myth that good kids from good families don't do drugs.  Children are vulnerable no matter who they are or where they live.  My son had his problems, but he was a sensitive, caring and unforgettable young man.  Ryan Glenn Shafer came into our lives on May 27, 1971, when my wife, Barbara, and I adopted him in Prince George's County, Md.  He was two months old, and Barb cradled him on her lap as we drove to our home in Laurel.  We issued a press release: "R&B Shafer Inc. announces a major expansion."  In 1976, we moved along with our daughter, Katie, two years younger than Ryan, to McLean, in Fairfax County, Va.  Barb chose for the most part to forgo a full-time job and threw herself into school and community volunteer work involving our children.  I got involved too, helping to coach most of Ryan's baseball teams.  Ryan grew to be a fun-loving boy with wide and intense interests.  His sense of humor charmed his friends and adults.  In his first year at Longfellow Intermediate School, he became the first seventh-grader ever voted "Joe Cool."  When a mother was informed of this choice, she said, "Why, of course.  He is Joe Cool."  Despite his glibness, we knew Ryan had been troubled by low self-esteem and by difficulty in school. (We now know that both are early warning signs of a child at risk of drug use.) What we didn't know was that he had begun experimenting with drugs as early as the sixth grade.  We were going through the typical stages of parents of drug-abusing adolescents.  The first stage is abject ignorance.  Back in 1983, we never suspected that drug use was possible with our pre-teen: He was way too young.  In fact, these days, drug-using youths on average begin at about age 12.  We began to notice personality changes -- hostility, rebellion -- but they seemed the normal changes we had seen in our friends' teen-agers.  The next step is denial.  Ryan's actions worsened, but we didn't accept what we know now were warning signs: use of eye drops to cover up red eyes from smoking marijuana; incense burning in his room to mask the odor; calls from friends whom we hadn't met; trouble at school; money missing from around the house.  By the time Ryan reached ninth grade in 1985 and began McLean High School, he no longer could hide his troubles.  He began cutting classes -- a common tipoff to drug use.  By the time the school called us, he had missed nearly two dozen classes and was failing everything.  We found that school officials at that time didn't know much more about drugs than we did.  The school did guide us to a local physician, Dr. Warren Klam, who has treated hundreds of adolescents.  Ryan began urine tests for drugs, or, as the kids call them, the "whiz quiz."  Ryan, as drug abusers do, denied drug use.  "You don't trust me," he self-righteously protested.  The tests showed "low positive" marijuana. (They would have been "high positive" but Ryan told us later that after giving me a specimen while I observed, he later would sneak into our bedroom and water it down.) Actually, he had been cutting classes to smoke marijuana daily.  Next came minimization.  Thank God, it was "only" pot.  In fact, today's marijuana can be a deceivingly damaging drug for young people, and, in the case of heavy use, can cause short-term memory loss and long-term health problems.  Some strains are 25 times more powerful than a decade ago, says the American Pediatrics Association, which adds: "Marijuana is no longer the 'harmless little giggle' referred to by John Lennon in the 1960s."  Pot and alcohol can also be gateways to more serious drugs.  By now, Ryan was long past the experimental stage and into planned use.  As Joyce Tobias, a registered nurse, explains in her booklet, "Kids & Drugs," in this stage "attitudes change and what was once unacceptable behavior is now cool and acceptable.  Unexplainable mood swings begin, including withdrawal, anger and aggression.  Verbal abuse toward parents, profanity and rebellious attitudes become a constant friction point between parent and child."  As he moved into the third stage, chemical dependence, Ryan's problems took control of our family.  Drugs changed him into a person we didn't recognize -- lying, shouting, scheming, manipulating.  My wife and I alternated between anger over his actions, uncertainty over his seemingly persuasive insistence he was innocent, and frustration over our inability to resolve the situation.  As the turmoil took its toll on our family, we argued over the proper course.  When a child is on drugs, the traditional tools of trust and discipline no longer work.  It was time for professional help.  In January 1986, we put Ryan into the Arlington (Va.) Hospital's six-week, residential Adolescent Treatment Program.  He had hit bottom and was ready to accept treatment.  Drug use was overwhelming his life, but he still hid the full extent from us.  The night before he went into treatment, he sat calmly watching television.  Later he told us he was on an LSD "acid trip" and saw snakes coming out of the TV set.  The intake tests revealed the frightening extent of his drug use.  He was part of the "sicker, quicker generation" of young people known as "garbage heads" who heavily abuse both drugs and alcohol.  Ryan's drug of choice was LSD, which causes vivid hallucinations.  Fellow residents dubbed him "blotter boy" because he had used LSD impregnated on blotter paper, and sold like sheets of stamps for as little as $3 to $5 a hit.  We discovered the limits of drug testing.  LSD is detectable only in special tests, if at all.  Cocaine remains in the system only about two to three days.  Marijuana stays in the system about 30 days and, thus, is the most likely to be detected.  Barb and I attended parent-counseling sessions.  We learned that, like us, most parents had no idea of their children's heavy drug or alcohol use until the youths could no longer hide their dual lives.  Some of the parents were strict, some were lenient, all were caring.  There is no magic bullet of parenting against drugs.  They also were middle-class parents, most of whom had insurance.  Six weeks at Arlington cost more than $12,000.  Elsewhere, treatment programs can cost $30,000 or more.  The poor must go to limited public facilities, which in most areas have waiting lines.  The Arlington Hospital program, like most drug-treatment programs, is patterned after Alcoholics Anonymous, emphasizing a support group and education on how alcohol and drugs destroy the body.  In a dormitory-like setting, Ryan dove into the program with gusto.  He won over counselors and parents with his personality.  When he was free of drugs, we got our real son back.  He told us about his drug use; how he had slipped out of his bedroom window at night to buy drugs; how he had started taking drugs to impress older friends, who at first gave him drugs for free; how he couldn't stop without help.  He returned home in time for his 15th birthday in March 1986.  As part of the treatment, he attended 15 weeks of after-care five days a week.  He also was required to go to 90 meetings of Alcoholics Anonymous or Narcotics Anonymous in 90 days.  He did so with enthusiasm, he dropped drug-using friends, and it seemed our troubles soon would be behind us.  We placed him in a small Northern Virginia school, Enterprise, for troubled youths.  The school had only about a dozen students.  He got off to a fitful start, but by his 16th birthday in 1987, Ryan, now a 10th grader, was doing great.  His drug tests were clean.  His grades were the best ever.  A dedicated teacher helped raise his reading level, damaged by pot use, to 12th-grade level.  He won school awards for "funniest," "best personality" and "most supportive."  He got his driver's license, worked part-time and had a lovely girlfriend.  He was a joy.  Then, suddenly, the old signs began reappearing.  His grades began slipping; he began spending money excessively.  His behavior deteriorated.  A test showed signs of marijuana, probably laced with PCP. School officials told us what we knew: Ryan had to go into another rehab program.  We were crushed.  In June of 1987, he entered a new 10-week outpatient program at Arlington Hospital.  As he progressed, his tests showed no drugs, but we were troubled.  This time his personality didn't change back.  He remained abusive and temper prone.  Yet, he never got totally out of control.  After an outburst, he would apologize.  We believe he truly wanted to stop using the drugs that had consumed him.  In a note he wrote in the summer of 1987 thanking us for putting him in treatment, he said: "For the first time in a long time I am very happy with my life.  I really don't want to lose what I have just because I want to smoke pot."  Then the situation took a dark turn.  At Alcoholics Anonymous, Ryan claimed to have found a "sponsor," a recovering addict with longer sobriety whom he could call whenever he felt his own resolve weakening.  Inadvertently, we eventually discovered that the supposed sponsor was a man whom Ryan had mentioned briefly and forbiddingly regarding his earlier drug use.  According to some of Ryan's friends, the man may have attended AA meetings as a way to recruit young people.  The man, 30 and single, was a shadowy figure who had befriended youths and who had been suspected of providing drugs to kids at his home for several years in McLean and, later, in Vienna, Va.  Ryan apparently met the man, a telephone company employee, while in junior high school, when he went to his house with friends, and had become a regular visitor.  Exactly how the relationship resumed later still isn't clear.  We forbade Ryan from seeing the man, but he did so anyway.  Events moved quickly amid the resulting turmoil.  For the first time, Ryan talked about committing suicide.  The next day, in early August, he was ejected from the rehab program after testing positive for marijuana.  In a frantic day, we checked residential programs around the country.  Springwood Psychiatric Hospital 30 miles away in Leesburg, Va., had one bed open.  We could bring him that night.  This time Ryan, angry and frightened, resisted.  We got him to Springwood, where doctors told us he was in a deep depression.  Therapy indicated that at least one factor in Ryan's low self-esteem was subconscious feelings of rejection for having been put up for adoption, feelings he never expressed in our many talks on his adoption.  He eventually was diagnosed as manic depressive, suffering the wide mood swings of a bipolar disorder.  It isn't known whether drugs caused his problems, or whether he used drugs to self-medicate.  Tests at Springwood showed no extensive recent drug use and Ryan this time didn't have withdrawal symptoms, but with LSD there aren't any.  We wonder now if he may have fooled everyone all along.  Once again, he responded to treatment.  His mood swings could be stabilized with lithium and other medicines.  After six weeks, in early September, we took him home.  He was accepted at Fairfax County's special education school.  Ryan seemed free from drugs and more like his old self.  He closely followed the news and discussed the Supreme Court nomination of Robert Bork with more facts than even his father, the journalist, was up on.  Correcting me, he would quip: "I think I know a little bit more about Supreme Court nominations than you do."  His medicine made him tired, and he often went to bed early.  One night in late September, I looked in his room as he was falling asleep in bed and said, "I love you, Ryan."  He picked his head up, smiled and said softly, "Thanks, Dad."  Within the week, he was dead.  The fatal accident occurred at about 8:30 p.m. on Oct. 1, just as Barb and I were returning from an open house at Ryan's new school, enthusiastic about his prospects there.  Until midnight, all we could find out from the police was that he had run from his car and hadn't been heard from.  Finally, at Fairfax Hospital, we were ushered, for privacy, into an empty storeroom by a young Virginia state trooper, who began in police jargon to tell us "there has been an accident."  What he was struggling to say hit us like a jolt of electricity: Ryan was dead.  The terror that ripped through my body was overwhelmed by a wrenching reality: that I would never hold my little boy again.  Soon came a numbness that has never totally gone away.  It is true that if your child dies, a part of you dies with him.  Publicly, Ryan's death wasn't considered drug-related, but we made a decision to talk about the real cause.  Acting on our pleas, the state police pursued the probe that resulted in the drug dealer's arrest.  He was charged with distributing marijuana and other drugs to minors.  He also was charged with the statutory rape of a 13-year-old girl and with soliciting sex from a 14-year-old boy.  Our main concern after Ryan's death was the psychological impact on our daughter, Katie, now nearly 16.  Katie has never used drugs and has dealt with the loss of her brother by counseling others against drug use.  Despite a recent federal survey showing a decline in drug use among high school seniors, nearly one in two seniors says he or she has tried an illicit drug.  The agency also didn't survey those who have dropped out of school.  The key to saving lives is early intervention, during the one to three years that young people typically hide their drug use.  "What I see often," says Dr. Klam, the specialist in adolescent care, "are parents who wait until there is a crisis before they act.  If you feel in your heart something isn't right, it's better to get that kid in for an evaluation."  The only real solution is prevention -- keeping kids from ever trying drugs in the first place.  Drug education -- as early as elementary school -- is vital, and it should include parents and teachers.  For Ryan, it is too late.  On Oct. 7, 1987, I drove with my wife and daughter to a cemetery near our home.  Just over 16 years before, Barb had carried our new son home on her lap.  This day, she carried the urn containing his ashes.  Now we visit Ryan's grave and we weep, and we ask, Why?  ---  @ Possible Early Warning Signs  @ Certain behavior may indicate a child is involved with drugs or alcohol:  -- Abrupt change in mood or attitude  -- Sudden decline in attendance or performance at work or school  -- Sudden resistance to discipline at home or school  -- Impaired relationship with family or friends  -- Ignoring curfews  -- Unusual flare-ups of temper  -- Increased borrowing of money from parents or friends; stealing from home, school, or employer  -- Heightened secrecy about actions and possessions  -- Associating with a new group of friends, especially those who use drugs  Source: Department of Health and Human Services  Your June 28 page-one article "Put Aside the Tuba, These Folks Insist Polka Has Panache" accurately described the polka dance scene as it exists in Chicago today.  If The Journal wants to live up to its reporting fairness doctrine, you also should report on the other end of the polka spectrum, the Eastern-style polkas.  Chicago-style polkas are identified with the slow "oom-pah-pah" polka for members of the older generation.  They prefer the "one-and-a-two" beat.  You'll find this in Florida, too.  The Eastern polka dancers -- New York, New Jersey, Connecticut, Massachusetts and Pennsylvania -- on the contrary find the Chicago beat too sleepy.  Eastern polka fans and some Californians prefer a much-faster polka.  Not only is there a significant difference in "Chicago Style" polkas as compared with the "Eastern Rite" polka, but the band leaders of the East seldom are recognized by the International Polka Associations and probably never will be.  Polka fans have been slammed long enough and too often depicted as "beer, brats and bellies."  Cover an Eastern-style polka dance and listen to the tempo.  It's lively, upbeat -- and most important today -- good clean fun]  James W. Mullen  Bergenfield, N.J.  Regarding your July 25 World-Wide news column: I was really shocked when I got to the item about the situation in Soviet Georgia.  You mentioned the events in the republic's Baltic Sea region in Abkhazia.  You must have meant the Black Sea, not the Baltic.  The Baltic Sea is in the northwestern part of the U.S.S.R.; Abkhazia is in the southwestern part.  This is tantamount to mixing up Texas with the state of Washington.  Your error is a fresh example of how important it is for the people of our two countries to know more about each other, including such details as each other's geography.  Don't you think this would serve, along with innumerable other things, more accurate reporting?  Alexander Malyshkin  Senior Information Officer  Soviet Embassy  Washington  Re Amity Shlaes's July 10 article, "Germany: Echoes of Empire," in which she refers to "Otto Hapsburg, an official heir to the throne of the defunct Austro-Hungarian Empire": His Imperial and Royal Highness, the Archduke Otto von Hapsburg, is not "an official heir" to the "Austro-Hungarian Empire."  He is the eldest son of His Imperial and Royal Majesty Charles I of Austria and IV of Hungary.  As such, he is recognized by thousands of people as de jure Emperor of Austria and Apostolic King of Hungary.  His Imperial and Royal Highness is a European Peoples' Party (Christian Democratic) member of the European Parliament representing Bavaria.  He is also the president of the International Pan-European Union, an organization dedicated to a united Europe, free, Christian and conservative, from the Atlantic to the Urals.  Jovan Weismiller  The Monarchist Alliance  Lawrence, Kan.  Fasten your seat belts.  The much-heralded "soft landing" may include some hard knocks -- not just in the economy, but at the White House.  Economic growth so far this year has skidded to a 1.7% annual rate.  And the Federal Reserve's latest forecast suggests that growth will slow further, hovering between 1% and 1.5% through the middle of next year.  That's just the sort of "soft landing" many economists and Wall Street investors hope for.  But behind that benign-sounding expression lies a painful truth: Even a soft landing -- with its benefits of avoiding both a recession and a surge in inflation -- would inflict a lot of pain.  It could throw half a million people onto the unemployment rolls, according to Data Resources Inc.  It could cut $30 billion out of corporate profits.  And it could shave $800 off the annual income of the average American family.  And just as important to President Bush, such a slowdown could quickly balloon the budget deficit by as much as $25 billion, threatening his "read my lips" campaign pledge against a tax increase.  For the White House, in short, the Fed's projection isn't good enough.  With midterm congressional elections approaching and other pressures mounting, the administration needs more than a soft landing.  It needs a perfect landing.  "You're going to see increasing tension between the administration and the Federal Reserve," says William Niskanen, the president of the CATO Institute in Washington.  "This will jeopardize Bush's whole budget strategy."  Already, the tensions are evident.  In public comments, White House officials have studiously avoided criticizing the Fed.  Aware of the political sensitivities involved, Fed Vice Chairman Manuel Johnson and other administration allies have told the White House that public pressure only makes it harder to get the Fed's independent-minded regional-bank presidents to go along with the president's wishes.  But in private, relations between Fed Chairman Alan Greenspan and Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady, in particular, have been severely strained by Mr. Brady's continual prodding for easier credit, officials say.  Michael Boskin, the chairman of the President's Council of Economic Advisers, enjoys better rapport with the Fed chairman but has also kept the heat on.  President Bush himself has also weighed in with the Fed chairman on several occasions, meeting with him in the Oval Office and gently urging an easier credit policy.  If the economy slows further, the tensions are bound to multiply, and the closed-door skirmishes may turn into open battle.  "It may become necessary in the future to go public," one administration official confides.  The Bush team has made no secret of its view that a Fed-engineered soft landing isn't necessary to keep inflation under control.  The administration's current forecast shows real growth softening only slightly, to a 2.6% pace next year, and then returning to 3%-plus in subsequent years.  Mr. Boskin says such a forecast is "consistent with stabilizing, and eventually falling, inflation."  And Budget Director Richard Darman insists that "neither a recession or a soft landing is inevitable."  But in the battle over economic policy, the Fed holds most of the cards.  Administration officials have little power to influence the economy over the next year and a half, but the Fed can do a great deal by manipulating short-term interest rates.  If the central bank is determined to slow economic growth to less than 2%, it can.  Indeed, many economists believe that the Fed's tight-money policies earlier this year have already set the stage for not just a soft landing but a full-fledged recession.  And at least one Fed official agrees.  "The next six months or so are cooked," says Fed Governor Martha Seger, who has tended to favor an easier monetary policy than most other governors.  "It's going to be very difficult to land the aircraft in a nice, gentle way.  Instead, we may take a wing off."  Right now, one thing that seems clear is that the economy is slowing.  In the second quarter, growth hit its lowest level in nearly three years.  And while the White House ponders the effects on its revenue forecasts and on the 1990 congressional elections, the "soft landing" already looks like anything but to many Americans.  "We're not going to have a recession in the technical sense, but it's going to be very unpleasant for certain key sectors and key companies," says Walter Joelson, the chief economist at General Electric Co.  "For many, many people, it will feel like a recession."  The auto and home-building industries have already been hard hit.  Mary Rider, whose Oldsmobile dealership just outside Richmond, Va., began liquidation proceedings July 12, says as far as she's concerned, the economy is in a recession.  "I've been in this business for 17 years," she says, "and I remember what it was like during recessions in the 1970s and early 1980s. . . .  The whole scene over the last year is that people are just not buying.  To get a car sold is like pulling teeth.  And it's getting progressively worse."  For home builders, says Geoffrey Brunning, an Atlanta contractor, "It's terrible.  It seems to me like a very hard landing.  I think we may have broken the undercarriage."  Hand-lettered signs posted by homeowners in Atlanta tell the story: "Owner must sell. . . .  Desperate. . . .  Will consider any offer."  And as some major employers begin to retrench, the secondary effects are already taking hold.  In Framingham, Mass., the closing of a General Motors factory this week has deprived the town of more than 1,500 jobs.  "They were by far the largest employer," says Edgar Gadbois, the town administrator.  "And it does have spillover effects.  Our local revenues are already beginning to decline.  We have fewer building permits.  There's definitely a slowdown."  The term "soft landing" is a recent invention.  Economists argue about what it means and whether it has ever happened in the past.  The closest parallel, says Roger Brinner of Data Resources, occurred in 1967, when the economy slowed down significantly but avoided a downturn.  During that Vietnam War period, defense spending helped bolster the economy, Mr. Brinner contends -- just as continued growth in exports, he believes, will help the economy in the coming slowdown.  But in the end, when it comes down to distinguishing 1% growth from a mild recession, "you'd be straining at gnats to tell the difference," says Robert Black, the president of the Richmond Federal Reserve Bank.  However, to an administration facing automatic Gramm-Rudman spending cuts and Democrats intent on making the economy a political issue, every percentage point of growth counts.  And the maneuvers that spell the difference between the Fed's forecast and the administration's occur mostly inside the Fed's marble headquarters in Washington.  Fed policy makers started pushing up interest rates in the spring of last year to head off rising fears of inflation and to cool a rapidly growing economy.  They worried that as unemployment dropped and factory operating rates rose, the economy would quickly run out of growing room.  Between March 1988 and May 1989, the central bank's credit squeeze pushed short-term interest rates up more than three percentage points.  In early June, however, the Fed reversed course.  After a harsh internal debate against the backdrop of a slowing economy, policy makers voted to ease their grip on credit.  They eased again in early July and then again just last week.  Now, the key interest rate on federal funds, the rate at which banks lend reserves to each other, has dropped to about 9% from 9 3/4% in May.  Because the effects of the Fed's actions usually take months to work their way through the economy, the economic outlook for the next six months has largely been determined by credit-policy moves already taken.  Similarly, the current easing probably won't have much effect until 1990.  "Whatever we do now," Ms. Seger says, "I don't think it will affect the rest of the year very much."  In the past, episodes of rising interest rates have often been followed by recessions.  The usual sequence of events: As the economic expansion ages, inflation begins to accelerate.  The Federal Reserve responds by pushing up rates to rein in inflation.  But, unable to foresee the future, the Fed makes a "mistake," pushes too far and squeezes the economy into recession.  This time, however, a surprisingly diverse group of economists believes that the all-too-familiar story may not repeat itself.  "I don't see the concatenation of things we usually see before a recession," says Paul McCracken, an economist at the University of Michigan and a former chairman of the Council of Economic Advisers.  He notes in particular that business inventories, which often build up as over-optimistic businessmen stock up at a business-cycle peak, "don't seem to be all that much out of line with sales."  That's significant, he says, because high inventories often cause businessmen to cut off new orders at the onset of a recession, deepening the slide.  In fact, some analysts believe that the economy may be less prone to recessions than in the past.  For one thing, "inventory swings are much less important in the economy than they used to be," Mr. Niskanen says.  Two major reasons: the increasing importance of service industries, which don't have large inventories, and the improved, computerized techniques of inventory management, which may help companies avoid excessive buildups.  Fed Governor Wayne Angell also argues that global competition makes recessions less likely.  "The U.S. economy today is characterized by industries and firms that can no longer plan as if they are dominant leaders in those markets," he says.  "It has become a world marketplace."  The result, Mr. Angell contends, is that companies that would have cut output in reaction to a downturn 10 or 20 years ago now will cut prices instead.  So, the downturn may be gentler and its effect in controlling inflation greater.  Regarding your July 19 Asides, "A Routine Outrage":  I believe this editorial did an excellent job of stripping away the rhetoric that surrounded the debate on H.R. 1056.  I opposed it on the grounds that environmental cleanups on defense bases will not be aided by the waiver of federal sovereign immunity, but rather will be hampered by a mad dash to the courthouse by the 50 states and local agencies.  The Defense Department's carefully researched worst-first schedule of site cleanups will be destroyed by a crazy quilt of local litigation.  Each state, without any national view or concern about its neighbors, will try to get to the scarce funds before anyone else, whether its site is in a threatening situation or not.  The administration and many of my Senate colleagues have expressed disapproval of the measure.  I hope that they, with the sentiments of a vocal majority of Americans, will vote down this legislation and allow the cleanups to continue.  Rep. Richard Ray (D., Ga.)  Chairman, Environmental Restoration Panel  House Committee on Armed Services  Washington  ---  The editorial suffers from the very thing the piece accuses Congress of -- a lack of understanding of the issue.  Your contention is that requiring federal installations to comply with hazardous- and solid-waste laws, as every business and unit of state and local government must, somehow will wreak havoc on the federal budget.  That argument simply won't wash and it even has been discarded by most opponents of the bill in question.  Your contention that the legislation will cost "tens of millions of dollars" is simply unsupportable.  States have had the ability for years to assess administrative fines and penalties against federal facilities under the Clean Water and Clean Air acts, and the record shows that states have acted responsibly and reasonably in exercising that authority.  They will do so, also, under the hazardous- and solid-waste laws.  Passage of the legislation will, however, allow them to gain the attention of federal authorities and bring about compliance with these environmental laws for the protection of their citizens.  Had states been able to invoke sanctions against federal polluters years ago, we might not be facing the massive cleanups of the Energy and Defense departments facilities at the present time.  Relatively nominal fines designed to bring about compliance with environmental laws could have saved the hundreds of billions of dollars that may be required to clean up facilities because unresponsive federal operators were not willing to observe the law.  Jim Jones  National Association of Attorneys General  Boise, Idaho  Friday, July 28, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2% to 11%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 9% high, 8 7/8% low, 9% near closing bid, 9 1/8% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.: 8.625% 30 to 44 days; 8.50% 45 to 59 days; 8.40% 60 to 89 days; 8.25% 90 to 119 days; 8% 120 to 179 days; 7.625% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000: 8.75% 30 days; 8.60% 60 days; 8.50% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.50% one month; 8.44% two months; 8.40% three months; 8.20% six months; 8.13% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market: 8.70% one month; 8.55% three months; 8.35% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.70% 30 days; 8.53% 60 days; 8.35% 90 days; 8.18% 120 days; 8.02% 150 days; 7.95% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 8 13/16% to 8 11/16% one month; 8 3/4% to 8 5/8% two months; 8 11/16% to 8 9/16% three months; 8 9/16% to 8 7/16% four months; 8 9/16% to 8 7/16% five months; 8 1/2% to 8 3/8% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 8 7/8% one month; 8 3/4% three months; 8 5/8% six months; 8 7/16% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 14%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, July 24, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 8.09% 13 weeks; 7.73% 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 9.65%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 9%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par) 9.54%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.60%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 8.96%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  Thrift industry officials are bracing for a massive restructuring of the savings-and-loan industry, as the big bailout package nears completion, possibly by the end of the week.  If the bill becomes law in the form approved by House and Senate negotiators last week, it would tighten the lending and accounting restrictions to which thrifts must adhere, while at the same time expanding ways for thrifts to become banks or to be purchased by banks.  "It opens the door for the financial marketplace to accelerate the melding of the banking and thrift industries," said thrift consultant Bert Ely of Alexandria, Va.  But the bill must clear a huge political hurdle that looms this week over how much of the $166 billion -- $50 billion to close or merge sick thrifts, plus more than $100 billion in interest -- will be included on the federal budget.  House and Senate negotiators shrugged off a veto threat and rejected the administration's elaborate plan for raising and spending the funds.  The Bush plan would use industry bonds to raise the $50 billion, which wouldn't be included on the federal budget and, therefore, wouldn't increase the budget deficit.  However, the $100 billion in interest on the bonds, which would be paid mostly by taxpayers, would be included on the budget.  But House and Senate negotiators adopted the House financing package, which would have the affect of adding all the spending to the budget deficit.  This plan would ultimately cost about $5 billion less because funds would be raised with less expensive Treasury bonds.  But by being included on the federal budget, Congress would have to pass a waiver to the Gramm-Rudman deficit-reduction law -- a step the administration is trying to avoid.  The Senate may take up the bill, which is back in both chambers for final consideration, as early as Thursday.  Sen. Phil Gramm (R., Texas) predicts he has the 41 votes sufficient to quash the House financing plan.  "It won't come to vetoing the S&L (bill)," President Bush said in a news conference Friday, "because we have 40-plus votes in the Senate that, staying firm, will see our proposal prevail."  With Congress set to adjourn next weekend for the August recess -- and to avoid millions of dollars in new thrift losses daily -- a showdown is all but inevitable this week.  Observing that the Senate has waived Gramm-Rudman previously, Sen. Donald Riegle (D., Mich.) predicted that the House plan, which he backs, will stand.  "The iron discipline (of Gramm-Rudman) is built with elastic rubber bands," he said.  Moreover, since the administration prevailed on every other key provision in the bill, a veto may be less likely.  To industry officials, the financing plan is less critical than the overhauled thrift regulations.  In a little-noticed amendment, sponsored by Rep. Mary Rose Oakar (D., Ohio), thrifts would be permitted to switch to bank charters immediately, as long as they continue to pay the higher S&L deposit insurance premiums for five years.  With new, tougher restrictions placed on thrifts, officials are predicting a wave of conversions from thrifts to banks.  "Which charter to be under is the question that is on every management's agenda right now," says Patrick Forte, president of the Association of Thrift Holding Cos.  One reason to consider abandoning a thrift charter is that unless thrifts are able to raise a substantial amount of new capital, they will be restricted from risky activities, such as direct-equity investments.  Moreover, thrifts will be forced to invest more in home mortgages, which expose the industry to increases in short-term interest rates.  "That's not to mention that stockholders and depositors view you as a second-class institution," Mr. Forte says.  Under the bill, thrifts would also lose what was once a vital advantage over banks, access to cheap funds from the Federal Home Loan Bank System, the regional banks that act as sources of funds for thrifts.  Added to dividends that the Home Loan Banks pay to thrifts, the overall cost of funds to thrifts has traditionally been below what banks pay.  But the bill commits a portion of those dividends to a new housing program, and compared with other sources of funds, the Home Loan Bank funds have become less attractive.  "Ten years ago, it was always a better deal to get funds from the Home Loan Banks," says Mark Riedy, president of the National Council of Savings Institutions.  "Now, it's not much of a subsidy."  One key difference between banks and thrifts was preserved under the legislation.  Unlike banks, S&Ls may be acquired by companies that aren't in financial services, including insurance companies and industrial companies such as Ford Motor Co., which already owns several thrifts.  That distinction is likely to remove more of the marginal thrifts from the taxpayer's burden, but is also likely to hasten the end of a separate thrift industry.  Upward Nobility  ("Charisma Is Costly in the Executive Suite." -- WSJ headline)  Executives tend to suffer  If they are charismatic,  And the same applies to those  Who are always enigmatic.  Bossiness, too, is frowned on,  As are those who act the pawn.  The ones who seem to have it made  Are aggressively withdrawn.  -- Joshua Adams.  ---  Safety Catch  "I'm under the gun," we're apt to say  When there's pressure and we take the brunt of it;  But if someone's pointing a gun, I'd rather  Be under it than in front of it]  -- George O. Ludcke.  If President Bush is still having problems with the "vision thing," he may want to look across the street to his budget director, Richard Darman.  In a recent speech, Mr. Darman gave a sweeping diagnosis of the ills afflicting American society and offered the outlines of a vision for the future.  Unlike most people in Washington, the budget director writes his own speeches.  He spends hours turning over phrases in his mind and wakes in the middle of the night to scratch down thoughts on the pad at his bedside table.  His staff says that months before this speech, Mr. Darman had them chasing after tidbits of pop-culture trivia to be used in illustrating his points.  The theme of the speech was that America is suffering from a cultural "now-now-ism" -- a "short-hand label for our collective short-sightedness, our obsession with the here and now, our reluctance to address the future."  The entire nation, he charged, is like the spoiled child in the '50s commercial who screams: "I want my Maypo] I want it NOW]"  The manifestations of cultural now-now-ism, he suggests, are everywhere.  Rising drug abuse is a sign that young people care too much about the next two hours and too little about the next two decades.  The decline in education reflects a society lacking a commitment to future generations.  The nation's economic problems stem from a culture that favors current consumption over long-term savings, and institutions that "feel obliged to chase near-term financial plays."  To Mr. Darman, the "pre-eminent symbol of public policy commitment to the future" is the space program.  He delivered his speech on the 20th anniversary of Neil Armstrong's walk on the moon, and he praised President Kennedy's expansive vision in launching the moon program.  The current generation seems to have lost that vision, he lamented, and "moonwalking" has become a Michael Jackson dance that gives the appearance of forward movement, but is actually a backward slide.  For all its fun metaphors and fine rhetoric, however, Mr. Darman's speech was tarnished by more than a touch of deceit.  The budget director's first responsibility, after all, is the budget.  And the budget's massive deficits over the past decade provide the most brazen symbol of the nation's failure to tend to the future.  So far, neither Mr. Bush nor Mr. Darman has demonstrated a determination to tackle the problem.  Instead, they've joined Congress in seeking ever more artful ways to avoid it by adopting one-time savings and accounting gimmicks.  To be sure, the deficit has declined in the past few years.  But that decline is entirely the result of a rising surplus in the Social Security trust fund.  That money should be invested to help defray the future retirement costs of the baby boomers; instead, it is being used to paper over the deficit.  That's yet-another symptom of Mr. Darman's national now-now-ism.  In his speech, Mr. Darman praised President Bush for his new plan to send men to Mars.  But that announcement was a symptom of the very problem that Mr. Darman decries.  The cost of the program will be some $400 billion over the next 30 years, and the White House hasn't given a hint of where that much money might be found.  At a breakfast meeting last week, Mr. Darman again cited the Kennedy administration as the model.  Taxes, as a percentage of the nation's total output, were lower during the Kennedy years, he argued.  And yet the budget was closer to balance, and twice as much money, as a percentage of GNP, was being spent on space.  If President Kennedy could do it, why can't we?  The answer to that question is found behind the budget numbers.  Spending has soared in the past 2 1/2 decades, from 18.9% of the nation's output to 22.3%.  But all of that can be accounted for by the increase in the two programs that care for the elderly -- Social Security and Medicare.  If you exclude those two programs, the picture looks very different.  Spending is roughly unchanged, while taxes have dropped.  Can we return to Camelot?  The budget numbers make it clear that such a move would require action on one of two fronts.  Either the soaring cost of programs for the elderly must be drastically contained or taxes to pay for the rest of government must be increased.  President Bush and Mr. Darman have pledged to do neither; a politically acceptable solution would probably have to involve some of both.  At the end of his speech, Mr. Darman warned against the dangers of focusing too much on the budget deficit.  "The American Dream," he said, "is not meant to be filtered through green eyeshades."  Fair point.  But the American Dream also shouldn't be offered up as a free lunch.  If the president is serious about his plans for sending a man to Mars, he'd better start thinking of ways to pay for it.  Otherwise, he may start sounding like that kid in the Maypo ad.  ---  @ 25 Years Later  @Percent of GNP  1963 1988  @Total spending .......................... 18.9% 22.3%  @ Social Security and Medicare .......... 2.6 6.2  @ Other spending ........................ 16.3 16.1  @Total receipts .......................... 18.1% 19.1%  @ Social Security and Medicare .......... 3.4 7.0  @ Other receipts ........................ 14.7 12.1  LAURENCE D. ALBUKERK was a partner with Mark Frank in businesses at Washington University in St. Louis.  Mr. Albukerk's involvement wasn't included in a story on student entrepreneurs in an earlier edition.  (See: "Enterprise: Student Entrepreneurs Find Road to Riches on Campus" -- WSJ June 23, 1989)  From an interview with former New Yorker Irving Kristol in the July issue of The Washingtonian:  Q.  What have you learned about how Washington works?  A. I've learned about the importance of staffs and the less formal network of decision-making.  This is something people outside Washington can't appreciate.  Most decision-making is done by staffs.  I had never thought of assistant secretaries in Cabinet departments as being of any importance.  It turns out that they are important.  I've also learned that Washington is a cruel town.  New York is cruel in a financial way; Wall Street fires people right and left.  But they can always come back and get other jobs.  They haven't lost anything permanent.  In New York, people pursue money, which is not a zero-sum game.  No one has to lose money for you to make money.  Everyone can make money.  The thrust in Washington is power, which is part of a zero-sum game.  One accumulates power by taking it from someone else, who loses it.  That makes for viciousness.  New York is ruthless but not vicious.  In Washington, someone who gets cut off at the knees can never come back.  Poor John Tower can't come back.  If he had been the head of a Wall Street firm that went bust, he could return.  This makes Washington a very cruel town for people who fall out of favor with Congress or the executive or the media.  They can't come back.  THE MONKEY BUSINESS yacht is for sale at a price of $1.7 million.  The price was misstated in the Washington Wire.  (See: "Washington Wire: A Special Weekly Report From The Wall Street Journal's Capital Bureau" -- WSJ July 28, 1989)  Socanav Inc., backed by the Quebec government's pension-fund agency, made a formal 1.33 billion Canadian dollar (US$1.12 billion) offer for Steinberg Inc., a large real-estate and food-retailing concern about 20 times Socanav's size.  But the success of Socanav's bid -- seemingly assured when plans to make an offer were announced three weeks ago -- is far from certain.  Socanav, a small shipping firm, failed to match a sweetened offer by Oxdon Investments Inc., a Toronto group including Unicorp Canada Corp. Socanav is offering C$75 a Steinberg common share and C$51 a Steinberg Class A share.  Socanav's bid is conditioned on holders tendering at least 90% of each class of shares but that condition may be waived.  The bid expires Aug. 22, unless extended.  Oxdon, of Toronto, raised its bid by about C$50 million Thursday and is currently offering C$53 a Steinberg Class A share, up from C$50 a share.  Oxdon left its C$75-a-share offer for Steinberg common unchanged.  Oxdon's bid is conditioned on holders tendering at least 90% of each class of shares but that condition may be waived.  Oxdon's revised bid expires 10 days after it is mailed to holders, which was to be done Friday.  By making its formal offer before July 31, Socanav exercized an exclusive option to cause a Steinberg family group to tender its 52% voting stake in Steinberg to Socanav's bid.  Socanav insists this means Oxdon's bid is doomed.  But if Oxdon acquires at least 33.3% of Steinberg's non-voting Class A shares it can block Socanav from taking Steinberg private even if Socanav has voting control.  A bidder needs at least 66.6% of each class of shares to take a company private or effect a restructuring in Quebec.  "This now boils down to a super poker game," said one analyst, who asked not to be identified.  Socanav also failed to line up outside private financing, damaging the credibility of its bid, analysts said.  Despite three weeks of trying, Socanav couldn't secure C$330 million in financing from private lenders.  Socanav said it is "confident" it will obtain the money but if it doesn't, it said the government pension-fund agency -- Caisse de Depot et Placement -- will provide the C$330 million.  Except for less than C$50 million provided by Socanav Chairman Michel Gaucher and his partner Louis Rochette, Caisse de Depot and another Quebec government agency are already providing all of the remaining financing for the bid.  Socanav is also still at odds with Steinberg's Quebec union, which continues to back Oxdon's bid, to the dismay of Quebec Premier Robert Bourassa.  He helped put together the Socanav-Caisse bid at least in part to protect Steinberg's employees from Oxdon.  "Robert Bourassa has egg all over his face," one analyst said.  Mr. Bourassa is widely believed to be on the brink of calling a provincial election and after initial cheers the Socanav bid isn't drawing much praise.  The Steinberg situation has become "absurd" wrote Alain Dubuc, chief editorial writer for the influential Montreal daily La Presse, adding that Caisse de Depot's decision to back Socanav is "surprising" and "incomprehensible."  When Socanav and Caisse de Depot first announced plans to make a bid for Steinberg Mr. Bourassa was eager to take partial credit.  Now a spokesman for Mr. Bourassa carefully points out that the semi-autonomous Caisse de Depot "is very jealous of its power and doesn't always tell (the government) its plans."  CONNER PERIPHERALS Inc. said it filed a registration statement covering its previously reported plan to offer to the public 6.3 million shares, of which four million will be new and 2.3 million will be sold by certain holders.  The San Jose, Calif., disk drive maker has about 36.2 million shares outstanding.  Compaq Computer Corp. intends to sell about one million of its 13.6 million Conner shares.  Proceeds from Conner's offering will be used for capital expenditures and general corporate purposes.  Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. heads the underwriting group.  Municipal bonds are popular with conservative investors, those who want decent returns and security and those who just hate to pay taxes.  But munis also have a darker side that may come as a surprise to some of these folks.  While many individual investors who buy or sell municipal bonds just take whatever deal their brokers offer, trading is actually about as simple as haggling in a crowded bazaar.  Municipal bond prices can vary enormously from one merchant to the next.  Prices frequently depend on how well the dealer knows the investor, the size of the transaction, the type of bond and how much business the dealer expects from the customer in the future.  The gap between what an investor pays for a bond and what that bond would fetch if it were immediately resold can be large.  This doesn't mean investors should simply avoid municipals.  Many people have had years of happy returns from municipal bonds, and munis are one of the few remaining investments that generate tax-free income.  But investors planning to go into municipal bonds, as well as bondholders who want to get out before their bonds mature, should be aware of the dangers.  Those who still want to proceed may want to take a few tips from municipal bond specialists about how to avoid getting soaked in the souk.  Finding a good price can be tricky when buying or selling just about any type of bond, but pricing is especially dicey in the $765 billion municipal bond market.  Even the pros have trouble keeping up with the nearly 50,000 state and local governments and municipal authorities that issue tax-free bonds and the approximately two million issues outstanding.  If anything, the problem is getting worse, not better, some money managers say, particularly for individual investors with small blocks of bonds.  "It's wild," says Gail P. Seneca, senior vice president for investments in the private banking division at Wells Fargo Bank in San Francisco.  "Municipal bond pricing can be completely off the wall."  When Wells Fargo wanted to sell Kansas City, Kan., bonds with a face value of $100,000 this year for a client, the bank asked nine dealers for bids.  The offers it got ranged from $90,872 to $94,774 -- a difference of $3,902.  Chase Manhattan Bank's U.S. private banking division called 11 bond dealers this year to sell $250,000 of New York State Dormitory Authority bonds on behalf of a client.  Bruce A. Whiteford, head of the fixed-income department at Chase's private banking unit, says the high bid was $221,025, and the low was $209,072.  That's a difference of $11,953.  Some municipal bond dealers insist that such gaping price differences are unusual.  But several money managers say similar cases are popping up with increasing frequency.  In part, that's because many securities firms have pared trading operations or abandoned the municipal market altogether.  At the same time, tax-law changes have made it less attractive for many institutional investors, such as banks and insurance companies, to buy tax-free bonds.  Analysts say that has left the municipal market increasingly dominated by individuals who frequently don't realize the importance of shopping for the best price.  All of this leaves a very practical question for people attracted by the well-known allure of municipal bonds: How can the little guy possibly get a fair price?  Municipal bond specialists offer the following suggestions for individuals who'd like to even the odds:  Get professional help.  For investors with less than $25,000, and those who may need to sell their bonds before maturity, many advisers say to forget individual bonds.  Instead, they say, small investors should buy through mutual funds and unit investment trusts.  "You can be penalized very heavily for selling small amounts of bonds," says S.E. Canaday Jr., a vice president at John Nuveen & Co., which offers unit investment trusts and mutual funds.  "Many major firms won't bid at all on amounts under $100,000."  The drawback to the trusts and funds, though, is that the fees they impose cut into an investor's return.  Buy new issues and hang on.  Prices on new issues tend to vary less from dealer to dealer than do prices on older bonds traded in the "secondary," or resale, market.  Holding on to them until they mature eliminates resale problems entirely.  To increase the chance that an investor can actually hang on until maturity, municipal specialists recommend bonds that come due in less than seven years.  The difference in yield between such intermediate-term bonds and those with longer maturities is relatively small.  For those who think they may need to cash a bond before maturity, municipal specialists suggest large new issues of state and local governments that sell bonds frequently.  The reason, they say, is that it's easier to sell such issues in the secondary market.  For example, many New York, Florida and California bonds trade actively, but a $500,000 issue by a small water and sewer district may not trade for months.  Get several quotes.  When buying or selling, don't be content with just phoning national brokerage firms such as Merrill Lynch and Shearson Lehman Hutton.  Sometimes smaller regional firms will provide significantly better prices on issues they specialize in.  A few examples: Lebenthal & Co. and Samuel A. Ramirez & Co., both in New York; Tucker Anthony in Boston; Legg Mason Wood Walker Inc., a unit of Legg Mason in Baltimore, and Stone & Youngberg in San Francisco.  When selling, don't talk only to the dealer who sold you the bond.  Even dealers who value your business highly may not have a ready buyer for the bond you want to sell and thus won't offer as high a price as some other dealer who knows where to resell the bonds in a hurry.  Do your homework.  "If you present yourself as a bozo who doesn't know anything, you're at risk of getting ripped off by the broker," says Glen T. Insley, fixed-income director at One Federal Asset Management in Boston.  "But if you present yourself as being willing to check the price or having a knowledge of what the price should be, and you make it clear you're looking to develop an ongoing client relationship with the broker, then you have a better chance" of getting a good price.  ---  Friday's Market Activity  The bond market hit a minor milestone as yields on long-term Treasury bonds fell below 8% to their lowest levels in more than two years.  The yield on the benchmark 30-year bond ended at 7.98%, the lowest closing yield for the bond since April 8, 1987, according to Technical Data Global Markets Group.  The bond's price was quoted late at 109 31/32, up 15/32 from late Thursday.  The finish below 8% is expected to stoke the already raging bullish sentiment in the market, bond traders say, as will fresh evidence of a moderating U.S. economy and expectations that the Federal Reserve will ease credit policy further.  The tone in the market "seems to suggest that people believe the rally will continue and yields will continue to fall," says Joel Marver, chief fixed-income analyst at Technical Data.  All eyes, he says, are on the bond futures market, where contracts are expected to reach new highs this week.  But Norman Robertson, chief economist at Mellon Bank Corp. in Pittsburgh, says the market's strength "is justified only if you think we are in a recession, not a mere downturn."  Whether the economy has entered a recession isn't yet known, although recent data show that economic growth slowed considerably in the second quarter.  Contributing to the market's tone Friday were rumors a National Association of Purchasing Management survey due for release tomorrow will show more weakness.  Traders say there was talk that the purchasing agents' index for July will come in at 45% or 46%, below the 48.8% June level.  An index under 50% implies a slowing economy.  The latest 10-year notes were quoted late in the day at 108 17/32 to yield 7.85%.  The discount rate on three-month Treasury bills was quoted at 7.86% for a bond-equivalent yield of 8.10%, while the discount rate on six-month bills was 7.51% for a bond-equivalent yield of 7.89%.  Other major markets trailed Treasurys:  -- Municipal bonds were unchanged to 1/4 of a point higher.  Among new issues expected to be priced this week is California's $3 billion of 1989 revenue anticipation notes.  -- Corporate bonds closed 3/8 higher.  Some traders say the new-issue market could get busy this week as companies rush to lock in low yields ahead of the Treasury's huge August debt auction.  -- Mortgage-backed bond prices rose slightly.  For example, Government National Mortgage Association 9% securities for August delivery ended at 99 5/32, up 3/32 from Thursday.  Imelda Marcos won notoriety with only 2,700 pairs of shoes, but Alexandra Biryukova took home a cool 1.7 million pairs from London last week.  To be fair, Mrs. Biryukova, a deputy prime minister of the Soviet Union, went to market to put some consumer goods on Soviet shelves.  She also took home 50 million pairs of panty hose, as well as toothpaste, razor blades, cassette tapes, canned coffee, soap and $55 million worth of medicine.  Food labels could be getting an overhaul.  Proposals being drafted by the Food and Drug Administration would make nutritional labeling mandatory, recast the format of labels, make ingredient listings more specific and greatly increase the health claims that can be made on food packages.  Health and Human Services Secretary Louis Sullivan characterized the proposals the FDA is considering as "sweeping."  A formal proposal from the FDA is expected in August, and public hearings would follow.  An FDA spokesman said the hearings will be "a big effort to try and find out what people really want on a food label."  Health officials regard nutritional labeling -- listing such content as vitamins, minerals, fat, sodium and calories -- as the most important change.  Currently, manufacturers aren't required to list the nutritional value of food products unless they make a nutritional claim, such as "high in vitamin C."  The FDA will propose making nutritional labeling mandatory, as well as outline what nutritional information must be included on the label.  "I believe all parties will welcome this initiative," said FDA Commissioner Frank Young.  "Health professionals believe that better information about nutrition will have benefits to health.  And food manufacturers want to . . . be permitted to make greater use of the food label in conveying information about their products."  Food manufacturing trade groups said it was too early to comment on the FDA plans.  The agency said that surveys of what consumers want on labels rank nutrition information second in importance after ingredients.  The FDA could also propose changes in food descriptions.  Labels describe foods in a number of ways, some of them euphemisms made up by manufacturers.  The dogfish, a small shark, is sold as "snow cod," for example.  Packages currently must list ingredients in descending order of predominance.  The FDA is considering requiring manufacturers to list the percentage of each ingredient as well as the specific oil content.  Manufacturers could be given some leeway in making claims for the health benefits of their products.  Claims could range from the benefits of fiber against cancer to the effect of high-calcium foods on osteoporosis, a bone-deteriorating disease.  At present, the FDA generally opposes health claims on food labels.  Nearly all food products except meat and poultry, which are regulated by the Agriculture Department, would be affected by changes in the labeling regulations.  Congress already has a jump on making changes in nutritional labeling.  This week, the House Subcommittee on Health and the Environment is expected to propose legislation that will toughen label requirements.  FREDERICK'S OF HOLLYWOOD Inc., Los Angeles, declared a 3-for-2 stock split, while maintaining the current per-share cash dividend rate.  The specialty retailer said holders will receive one additional share for each two shares they already own.  The shares will be distributed Sept. 27 to holders of record Aug. 28.  Frederick's said it intends to continue to pay cash dividends at the rate of five cents a share semi-annually, which would represent a 50% increase after the stock split.  The stock split, which increases the number of shares outstanding to about 3.7 million, is designed to enhance the marketability of the stock, Frederick's said.  Honda Revs Up  A Hip Cycle Campaign  HONDA MOTOR Co., hoping to recruit a new generation of motorcycle riders, is making a big push to overcome cycling's black-leather-jacket stigma.  Like other motorcycle makers, Honda's U.S. division has been fighting sharp declines in motorcycle sales and the image problem that just won't go away.  Sales of motorcycles, scooters and all-terrain vehicles have dropped 45.6% since 1984, according to the Motorcycle Industry Council.  About 710,000 units were sold in 1988, down from 1,305,000 units in 1984.  Motorcycle makers say the sales decline is due in part to the industry's heavy reliance on advertising in magazines that appeal to cycle enthusiasts but don't reach the mainstream public.  To try to change the demographics, Honda is spending $75 million.  Central to its marketing campaign is the introduction of a new touring motorcycle called the Pacific Coast, the establishment of rider education centers and fresh advertising.  The company is going for the young and hip, with ads in magazines like GQ and Esquire and on television shows like "thirtysomething" and "L.A.  Law."  In 1979, the average motorcycle rider was 25 to 29 years old; today the average age is 35 to 40.  The latest Honda ads invite consumers to "Come ride with us."  That may sound familiar to consumers with long memories.  The strategy, Honda readily admits, is similar to its 1950s campaign that boasted, "You meet the nicest people on a Honda," and successfully attracted a new group of riders back then.  In one of the new TV ads, actress Courteney Cox of NBC's "Family Ties" promotes responsible riding and recommends proper safety gear and clothing.  Another ad features Larry "Bud" Melman, David Letterman's late-night sidekick.  "This is an invitational program introducing people to a side of motorcycling they may have not seen or thought about before," says Ray Blank, assistant vice president at American Honda.  Other motorcycle makers aim to draw a new breed of customer, too.  Says Bob Moffit, a vice president at Kawasaki Motors Corp. U.S.A., "We are trying to focus more on the experience of motorcycling and not dwell so much on the hardware."  Green Products Sprout  In North America  GREEN PRODUCTS are being introduced in North America at a fast clip, growing from only 55 in 1985 to an estimated 706 by the end of 1989, according to Marketing Intelligence Service in Naples, N.Y.  Green products are promoted as "environmentally friendly," and marketing experts say the green trend, which is well under way in Europe, is just now taking off in the U.S. and Canada.  Procter & Gamble Co., for example, has started selling Spic 'n Span in a plastic bottle that can be recycled.  But most of the green products are coming from smaller companies.  Melitta U.S.A., the Cherry Hill, N.J., maker of coffee makers and filters, recently introduced Natural Brown filters made from natural unbleached paper pulp.  Poly-Tech Inc., Minneapolis, is marketing Ruffies, biodegradable trash bags, and ISE of America Inc., Lakewood, N.J., is selling eggs in clear plastic cartons that can be recycled.  ISE is promoting the eggs as the ones in "the honest egg carton."  "Smaller North American manufacturers are discovering that the conservationist ethic sells new products," says Richard Lawrence, president of Marketing Intelligence.  Ailing Hospital Ads  Need Intensive Care  CONSUMERS have a lot to say about hospital advertising -- and most of it isn't very nice.  Useless, boring, unclear and uninformative are just a few of the adjectives people came up with when interviewed for a study on hospital marketing.  The study by Consumer Network Inc., Philadelphia, found that more than eight out of 10 respondents are turned off by "mushy" hospital advertising slogans.  One theme, "We Care," received especially negative reactions from skeptical consumers.  Just a few years ago, advertising was foreign terrain to most hospitals.  But today, 91% of all U.S. hospitals have marketing programs, spending a total of $1.6 billion, according to Consumer Network.  About $500 million of that goes for advertising.  But along the way, hospitals got wrapped up in image advertising that missed the mark with consumers, the study says.  Consumers are most interested in ads with information on prices, number of hospital beds and specialized medical services.  Some hospital advertising executives agree that marketing remedies are needed.  "There is a lot of learning to do before we consider ourselves sophisticated marketers," says Neal Westermeyer, vice president at Humana Inc., a large hospital chain based in Louisville, Ky.  "I don't think we do a good enough job researching how to identify the real target groups for the marketing of distinctive services."  Odds and Ends  EVER WONDER what happens to the holes in the middle of Life Savers candy?  Well, now you can buy them.  RJR Nabisco Inc. will test market Life Savers Holes in limited areas starting in November. . . .  How a man shaves may be a telling clue to his age.  According to a survey by Mediamark Research Inc., use of disposable razors is heavy among 18- to 24-year-olds, razor blades are particularly popular among 45- to 54-year-olds, and electric razors are the top choice of men 55 and up.  FIRST NATIONAL Corp., San Diego, Calif., a bank holding company, said it doubled its semi-annual cash dividend to 10 cents a share and declared a 10% stock dividend on its common stock, payable Aug. 24 to stock of record Aug. 10.  Once, the chance to gaze at the mountains jutting from swirling mists here might have been a cause for envy among friends and neighbors.  For Edward Blondski and his family, however, the sentiment was more like pity.  "Our friends said, 'We'll send flowers for your coffin,'" says the 46-year-old machinist from Buffalo, N.Y.  He and his family came to China under duress: Though martial law had been declared in the country's capital, and soldiers were in the streets, the Blondskis' tour operator wouldn't refund the $15,000 for an 18-day trip booked a year earlier.  "Our friends thought we were foolish to go," says Mr. Blondski.  But the Blondskis had the last laugh.  "Everywhere we went we were treated like VIPs," he says.  Hotel rooms were filled with flowers and fruit.  Attendants rushed to offer tea and hot towels.  As one of the few American tours still traveling in China just a few weeks after the bloodshed in Beijing, Mr. Blondski says his group was filmed by Cable News Network and interviewed by Chinese television crews in Beijing.  ". . . and in Wuxi, Suzhou and Guilin," interrupts his 12-year-old daughter Christine.  "Isn't it awesome?"  Such red-carpet treatment is all part of the Chinese effort to lure back the well-heeled tourists who once arrived in droves on airplanes, slept in luxury hotels, traveled in cars and sprinkled money, like spring rain, into a parched economy.  "Tourism Brings Prosperity and Progress" reads a sign, in English and Chinese, at the gate to the tombs of 13 Ming Dynasty emperors outside Beijing.  Specifically, tourism brought hard currency, $2.2 billion worth last year, or about 2% to 3% of the country's foreign exchange income.  In l988, there were about 300,000 U.S. tourists in China, or about 16% of total foreign tourists.  But this year, the tourist season in China ended before it had really begun.  The tanks and gunfire in the nation's capital routed not only students from the Square, but tourists from their beds.  Panic-stricken travelers fled for the borders -- and with them, an estimated $1 billion.  Now that the tanks have pulled out, China's tourism authorities have offered to guarantee the safety of visitors who return.  Industry officials are wining and dining travel agents in Beijing and Hong Kong.  Luxury tourist hotels are offering $59.99 specials on hotel rooms that once fetched up to $100.  Chinese officials are stressing that things are back to normal and that China is fun again.  But it's an uphill battle.  Beijing is still under martial law, and still a site only for the stouthearted.  Red banners float from luxury hotels: "Respect the People's Liberation Army," they read, in Chinese.  "Oppose bourgeois liberalism."  The streets are quiet, but soldiers still stand on street corners gripping AK-47 assault rifles.  At night, they check cars for fugitives.  One day recently, they chased a busload of Japanese tourists, and detained two of them briefly.  The problem: taking pictures in Tiananmen Square.  "You're nervous in Beijing and you just want to get out, but otherwise you're comfortable," says Mr. Blondski.  Fear and politics are keeping tourists away.  At the Great Wall Sheraton Hotel in Beijing, Victor Kimura, director of sales promotion, flips through facsimile messages from America.  Up to 90% of would-be travelers say they don't want to support the Chinese government by spending money there, one tour operator writes.  Writes another operator, who is planning just two tour groups in 1990, instead of the 14 previously scheduled: "It will take longer than we thought to make (travelers) forget the whole thing."  Northwest Airlines has had a 78% drop in bookings to China.  "Our long-range bookings aren't climbing briskly," says a Northwest spokesman.  "Tourists will have to have their confidence restored before they flock back."  Before the demonstrations in Beijing, to be a tourist in China was to be the kind of masochist who goes to Times Square on New Year's Eve, or hopes to buy Superbowl tickets the day of the game.  Trains in China regularly pulled away from stations with 200% of their seats full.  In many cities, hotel rooms couldn't be had for love or money.  Now, in hotel hallways and restaurants the air conditioning is turned off and lights are turned down to save money.  Some hotel rooms lack toilet paper, towels and soap; few guests are expected, so rooms aren't made up.  Tourist sites are nearly deserted.  Not only foreign, but Chinese tourists have been scared into staying home.  Here in Guilin, which has, perhaps, the most romantic topography in China, the 80 to 90 tour boats that used to ply the Li River daily have dwindled to just three.  For a change, sightseers can actually see the sights.  Just outside Beijing, an hour-and-a-half-long walk along the normally packed Great Wall turns up just four Western faces and only small clumps of Chinese travelers.  The vendors here who once charged picture-takers for the privilege of photographing them with their camels are all but out of business.  Their photogenic camels are lying down.  In Canton, there isn't any wait for the restrooms at the China Hotel, where the minibuses that cross the boarder carrying day-trippers from Hong Kong routinely stop.  Drinkers in the cocktail lounge of the White Swan Hotel, which overlooks the Pearl River, drink alone.  One American traveler, on a repeat visit to Xian, reported finally being able to see the famous terra cotta soldiers, and not the back of some fellow traveler's head.  Personal attention abounds.  As the only two people in one tour who didn't cancel their trip through southern China, Christopher and Gerdy Gouw of Lehighton, Pa., have a guide all to themselves, a young man who hangs morosely on the railing of a Li River sightseeing boat.  "It's like a private tour," says Mrs. Gouw happily.  But mostly the travelers who remain are adventurers and students, what one hotelier calls "soldiers of fortune."  Alonso Gonzalo, a 24-year-old student from Spain, and Marilyne Surita, 25, from France, were in Inner Mongolia when the tanks rolled into Beijing.  They proceeded on to the capital anyway and stayed for more than a week.  They weren't afraid, and didn't see any reason to leave.  They didn't spend much money either, though.  Their total tab for a two-month trip spent staying in Chinese hostels, eating in street stalls and traveling fourth class: $500 U.S. apiece.  Including souvenirs.  In an attempt to lure back bigger spenders, China's tourism officials and hoteliers are turning to their neighbors.  Some of the first invited back to see the situation were Taiwanese tour operators.  Taiwan has only recently begun allowing its citizens to return to visit friends and family, and the drive to see the Motherland is still strong.  The tour operators are just as eager to persuade their customers.  Suchart Morakotdacho, with Hengchiang Tour and Travel Service Co. in Bangkok, is videotaping peaceful scenes in Beijing, Nanjing Suzhou, Shanghai, Guilin and Canton to show back home.  Pacific Delight, which bills itself as the U.S.'s biggest packager of tours to China, offers 94 tours, of which 60% involve China.  Though Lythia Rousseas, a marketing associate with the firm, says the company expects its schedule to be off about 20% from last year, "for those who still want to go, we will still be going."  Even in the streets, people are doing their part.  Outside the Seven Star park, in Guilin, many of the metal stalls from which vendors sold mock People's Liberation army hats, T-shirts and replica opium pipes are empty; vendors have turned back their licenses, unable to pay the 200 yuan -- about $54 -- monthly rental.  A group of four men at one stall plays cards to while away the time.  "Welcome back the foreigners," one cries.  "Foreigners are great.  They spend money."  GREAT COUNTRY BANK said directors raised the quarterly 10% to 27.5 cents a share from 25 cents, payable Sept. 30 to stock of record Aug. 31.  The Astoria, Conn., bank cited a "solid earnings performance."  At May 31, it had 2.2 million common shares outstanding and about $429 million of assets.  BIOMAGNETIC TECHNOLOGIES Inc. said it began an initial public offering of 1.5 million common shares at $9 each, or a total of $13.5 million.  All of the shares are being sold by the San Diego-based company, which makes a medical diagnostic device.  PaineWebber Inc. is managing the underwriting group.  The offering has a 15% overallotment option.  Emotions are running so high on Wall Street these days that the slightest hint of trouble at a company can send its shares plummeting.  The anxiety is especially evident in the arguments that have erupted lately among securities analysts over the outlook for MCI Communications, a longtime glamour stock.  A number of analysts argue that the market overreacted when Merrill Lynch analyst Joseph Bellace told clients recently he expects MCI's growth rate and operating profit margin to decline in the next several quarters.  He reduced his rating on the giant telecommunications concern's stock to "neutral" from "above average."  The stock promptly dropped 1 5/8 last Monday to 35 5/8 on heavy volume.  Since then, however, the stock has rebounded to 39 7/8.  "I think MCI is dirt cheap," says Edward Greenberg of Morgan Stanley.  He scoffs at any suggestion that the company -- which earlier reported that second-quarter profit more than doubled on a 31% revenue increase -- might be reversing course.  "Of course MCI's growth is slowing," Mr. Greenberg says."But that's already built into the consensus earnings estimates.  You can't expect the company to keep growing at the current rates forever."  Mr. Bellace says he didn't expect his remarks to be controversial.  He points out that he didn't change his earnings estimates and says he remains positive on MCI in the long term.  "I just wanted to deliver the message to clients that MCI is in a transition phase," he says.  "The response has been too emotional."  His comments certainly seemed to provide the banana peel for MCI's already stumbling stock.  In all, the stock price fell 4 1/4, or 10.7%, during five sessions.  Several factors were at work.  Robert Morris III, a San Francisco-based Goldman Sachs analyst, said some investors scrambled to take profits on MCI's stock, which has gained an astonishing 76% since the end of 1988.  Lap Lee of Salomon Brothers speculates that some professional traders also sold shares after analysts failed to provide a boost for the stock by raising earnings estimates.  Although MCI shares have recovered since then and rose 1/2 Friday, no one is contending that MCI's revenue and earnings growth won't cool from their sizzling pace of recent years.  From a loss of $498 million in 1986, MCI sprang back to post a profit of $346 million last year.  Revenue in that period ballooned 43% to $5.14 billion.  Operating-profit margins jumped from 5.9% in 1987 to 15.9% in this year's second quarter.  But analysts expect those margins to widen at a slower pace in the next 18 months.  Messrs.  Lee and Morris remain bullish on the company, however.  They haven't budged from earlier estimates, which MCI doesn't dispute, that the company will earn between $2.30 and $2.40 a share this year and between $3 and $3.30 a share in 1990.  If those projections are on target, MCI's net income will still be growing at a double-digit pace, and some analysts expect its earnings and revenue to grow faster than the average of the companies in the Standard & Poor's 500 index.  S&P last week cited MCI's "rapidly improving cash flow" in upgrading its subordinated debt to triple-B from double-B-plus.  With mighty American Telephone & Telegraph as a competitor and United Telecommunications' US Sprint making inroads, MCI can't rest on its laurels.  Last December, AT&T and Sprint beat out MCI for shares of a big contract to overhaul the federal government's telephone system.  Morgan Stanley's Mr. Greenberg says, "Come the early 1990s, AT&T will become a more effective competitor.  Taking market share from them will be tougher."  AT&T is definitely on the mind of Daniel Akerson, MCI's chief financial officer, who says confidently that MCI can continue to strip market share from AT&T in the business, residential and data services markets.  His weapons: new products and services, along with continuing improvements in MCI's telecommunications systems.  "When we were spending billions in 1983 and 1984 on our telecommunications network, people thought we were crazy," he says.  "But that strategy is starting to bear fruit."  He says MCI hasn't run out of steam.  He says revenue rose 32% in the first half despite a 6% general price decrease in the industry.  Without the price cut, he says, revenue would have been up almost 40%, "and that's indicative of the strength of the company."  He says some analysts have "misinterpreted the fundamental trends underlying the company."  ---  MCI Communications  (OTC; Symbol: MCIC)  Business: Telecommunications  Year ended Dec. 31, 1988:  Revenue: $5.14 billion  Net Income: $346 million; $1.23 a share  Second quarter, June 30, 1989:  Per-share earnings: 56 cents vs. 21 cents  Average daily trading volume:  1,794,737 shares  Common shares outstanding: 254 million  ---  Friday's Market Activity  The Nasdaq Composite Index edged up 0.34 to 452.82 on volume of nearly 129 million shares.  Reflecting the market's biggest issues, the Nasdaq 100 Index rose 0.78 to 426.29 and the Nasdaq Financial Index improved 0.76 to 444.80.  Sun Microsystems slid 1 1/2 to 14 3/4 on volume of seven million shares.  It said it will report a substantial loss for its fourth quarter, which ended in June.  But the selling didn't spread to other technology stocks that had been getting hammered in the past week.  In addition to MCI's gain, for example, Apple Computer rose 1/8 to 39 3/8.  Shares of McCaw Cellular, which has offered to buy LIN Broadcasting for $110 a share, tumbled 1 3/8 to 38, while LIN slipped 1/2 to 109 5/8.  Merger talks between the two cellular communications concerns continue to be stalled.  Two new issues were actively traded.  Newbridge Network closed at 11 1/2, up from its offering price of $10.50.  A total of 3,750,000 shares was offered by the maker of digital networking products.  Eagle Food Centers closed at 20 1/4, up 1/4 from the price at which it offered 3.7 million shares.  H.M.S.S. gained 1 3/4 to 29 1/2, and another provider of home health care therapy, New England Critical Care, rose 2 1/8 to 35 3/8.  Argonaut Group surged 2 7/8 to 60 7/8 after the insurance holding company declared an initial dividend of 25 cents a share and authorized the purchase of as many as two million of its common shares.  Psicor jumped 2 to 12 1/2 despite reporting that it earned 13 cents a share in its third quarter compared with 15 cents a share a year earlier.  An article in Business Week magazine said the company's cardiovascular technology and services are increasingly in demand because of the growing number of heart operations and acquired immune deficiency syndrome cases.  ACTING AS ONE'S OWN criminal lawyer could be risky in the Lone Star State.  A jury in Conroe, Texas, imposed a 99-year prison sentence on a 41-year-old construction worker who decided to defend himself against felony charges of driving while intoxicated.  The defendant, Robert Byrd of Cut and Shoot, Texas, had declined a court-appointed lawyer.  He also refused a plea bargain calling for a five-year prison term, choosing instead to try his case before a jury.  "I've never heard of anything like it in this area," said James Frazier III, an assistant district attorney in Conroe, about 40 miles north of Houston.  "It's an attention getter."  Mr. Frazier said that the lack of counsel may have hampered the defendant's case, but that he believes the jury was more likely influenced by the defendant's criminal record.  Mr. Byrd had two prior misdemeanor DWI convictions, making him subject to felony prosecution for the third.  He also had two previous felony convictions, for aggravated robbery and for burglary and theft.  A third felony conviction carries an automatic penalty of 25 years to 99 years, or life.  The judge did name an attorney to stay with Mr. Byrd as an observer, in case he was needed, but the defendant didn't use him, Mr. Frazier said.  ---  A TOBACCO FIRM CAN BE SUED even if a smoker favored another firm's brand.  The Texas Supreme Court refused to hear an appeal by six major cigarette makers, apparently clearing the way for trial of a case brought by the family of a woman, a longtime smoker, who died of lung cancer.  The relatives are suing the companies and their trade and research groups, even though the woman didn't smoke their brands.  The suit was filed by I.D. Rogers and the two surviving children of Mr. Rogers's wife, Marjorie, who had smoked regularly since she was 16 and died in 1983 at age 57.  It named as defendants R.J. Reynolds Tobacco Co., Philip Morris Inc., Brown & Williamson Tobacco Corp., Lorillard Inc., Liggett & Myers Tobacco Co., Liggett Group Inc., and American Tobacco Co., which made the brand Mrs. Rogers smoked.  It also named the Council for Tobacco Research-U.S.A. and the Tobacco Institute.  Alleging a conspiracy to promote smoking and suppress information linking cigarette smoking to cancer and other problems, the plaintiffs contend Mrs. Rogers probably would have quit smoking, except for the actions by defendants.  The suit seeks unspecified damages for fraud and negligence, and asks that the defendants be held jointly and separately liable.  A trial judge had said the case could proceed against American Tobacco, but not against the defendants whose cigarettes Mrs. Rogers didn't smoke.  These other defendants contended, among other things, that a manufacturer's duty to warn of any dangers extends only to actual users of its product.  Last October, a state appeals court in Beaumont disagreed, saying effective advertising by one manufacturer could influence someone to smoke a different brand of cigarettes.  Earlier this month, the state's supreme court refused to review the ruling.  ---  DIAL M-A-T-T-R-E-S-S but drop the last 'S' and don't call toll-free.  A panel of the Second U.S. Circuit Court of Appeals ruled that Dial-a-Mattress Franchise Corp. can claim the exclusive right to the word "mattress" as a telephone number, even though the company wouldn't be able to claim trademark rights to the word.  The court said a competitor's use of a toll-free number spelling out the same word was unfair competition to Dial-a-Mattress, which has used the number for local calls in the New York area for 13 years.  The appeals court said the increasing use of such numbers as a marketing technique "has spawned a new issue for litigation in the field of unfair competition."  The court ruled that a company doesn't lose the right to protection from a confusingly similar telephone number just because the number spells out a generic term.  The court upheld a federal judge's preliminary injunction prohibiting Easy Bed Inc. of Deer Park, N.J., from using the toll-free number in the New York area.  Dial-a-Mattress's attorney, Arthur L. Plevy, said his client is seeking to have Easy Bed barred from using the number anywhere in the U.S.  Easy Bed's owner, Anthony Page, who has been in the bedding business for six years, said he plans to appeal the decision.  ---  EXPANSION IN TEXAS: On a hiring binge in Texas, Weil, Gotshal & Manges is adding two partners and a senior associate at its Dallas office to establish a mergers and acquisitions practice there.  The partners are Lawrence D. Stuart Jr., 45 years old, a senior partner at Dallas-based Johnson & Gibbs, and R. Scott Cohen, 35, also a partner there.  The associate also is from Johnson & Gibbs.  The move by the 500-lawyer New York firm continues a rapid expansion of its Texas operations, which began in 1985 with a four-lawyer Houston office.  Weil Gotshal now has 80 lawyers in Texas, including 60 in Houston and 20 in Dallas.  The auto industry's sales slowdown and uncertain outlook are undermining demand for factory machinery.  Orders for U.S.-made machine tools in June dropped 38% from an unusually strong 1988 month, mainly because of order postponements by the auto industry, according to machine tool executives.  Other manufacturers continue to order machine tools at a fairly good rate, industry executives say.  June orders for the complex machines that shape metal parts dropped to $238 million from $382.8 million a year earlier, but were up 16% from May's $205.3 million, according to the NMTBA -- The Association for Manufacturing Technology, a trade group based in McLean, Va.  "Our automotive orders dropped off sharply about six weeks ago," says Neil P. Coughlin, vice president, sales and marketing, for Kingsbury Machine Tool Corp., Keene, N.H.  He says auto companies are postponing orders for equipment to make engines, transmissions and other power train parts while they reassess production plans.  At some other machine tool builders, the drop in orders from auto and auto parts concerns occurred even earlier, pushing machine tool orders for the second quarter down 29% from a year earlier, according to NMTBA figures.  Auto power train parts provided the machine tool industry's best market in 1988 and early 1989.  Members of the American Machine Tool Distributors' Association, Rockville, Md., said their June sales were up 1.1% from a year earlier, but have declined each month since a March peak.  The distributors, who handle foreign as well as U.S.-made machines, are less dependent on autos because the auto makers buy most of their equipment directly from manufacturers.  Orders at U.S. plants for lathes, machining centers, milling machines, grinders, boring mills and other machines to shape metal by cutting fell to $156.2 million in June, down 35% from a year earlier's $238.4 million, NMTBA said.  June orders for metal-forming presses and other machines to shape metal with pressure were $81.9 million, 15% higher than the average of the previous 12 months but down 43% from a spectacular $144.5 million in June 1988.  Machine tool industry executives aren't terribly upset so far.  "We're pretty optimistic about the outlook for the remainder of the year, despite the mixed signals on the economy," says Daniel J. Meyer, president, Cincinnati Milacron Inc., the industry's largest producer.  "In the past month, business has been looking better than it did earlier this year," he says.  "Aerospace, heavy machinery and general manufacturing all are ordering."  Cross & Trecker Corp.'s orders continue to run ahead of a year earlier, says Walter J. Aspatore, president of the Bloomfield Hills, Mich., concern.  "We have had good orders for machining centers, lathes, flexible manufacturing systems and measuring equipment."  So far, few auto plant equipment programs have been canceled.  And machine tool builders figure U.S. auto companies have no choice but to buy equipment to increase productivity and make their cars more competitive.  But orders could be postponed into 1990 or later.  The economic slowdown engineered by the Federal Reserve Board to curb inflation has had a greater impact on the auto industry than on most of the rest of the economy; sales for the year to date are down 6.5% from a year earlier in spite of expensive sales promotions.  Many auto executives expect even softer sales in the 1989 second half.  And the auto industry's lower sales, profits and cash flow are only part of the problem, machine tool executives say.  Auto makers also are re-examining plans for 1992 engines and transmissions because it appears that federal fuel economy regulations will be tighter than auto executives expected.  Some muscle cars may have to be deferred or eliminated from the lineup, replaced by less exciting vehicles that deliver better mileage.  In addition, it is becoming increasingly clear that there's excess capacity in the U.S. auto industry.  Japanese producers are rapidly expanding U.S. production capacity, and U.S. auto demand isn't likely to rise rapidly enough to absorb the output of those factories on top of Big Three production.  The likely result: General Motors Corp., Ford Motor Co. and Chrysler Corp. will have to scale back production in the early 1990s.  Kingsbury's Mr. Coughlin is hopeful that the auto makers' uncertainty about what models will be needed in 1992 will result in higher orders for flexible production systems that his company offers.  Meanwhile, machine tool production continues unabated, as producers work off sizable backlogs.  Shipments in June totaled $327.6 million, NMTBA said, up 53% from $214.1 million a year earlier.  Shipments for the first half rose 41% to $1.51 billion, leaving June 30 backlogs at $2.17 billion.  ---  @ Comparative new orders for metal-cutting machines:  @ Jun. 1989 May 1989 Jun. 1988  @ Domestic ...... $120,350,000 $138,100,000 $210,650,000  @ Foreign ......... 35,800,000 9,800,000 27,700,000  @ Total .......... 156,150,000 147,900,000 238,350,000  @ Six month total for 1989: $1,059,400,000; for 1988: $1,342,750,000.  @ Metal-forming machine orders:  @ Domestic ....... $72,850,000 $49,850,000 $134,600,000  @ Foreign .......... 9,000,000 7,500,000 9,850,000  @ Total ........... 81,850,000 57,350,000 144,450,000  @ Six month total for 1989: $429,700,000; for 1988: $467,750,000.  @ Comparative shipment of metal-cutting machines:  @ Domestic ...... $199,850,000 $145,400,000 $116,000,000  @ Foreign ........ 35,900,000 13,000,000 16,800,000  @ Total .......... 235,750,000 158,400,000 132,800,000  @ Six month total for 1989: $1,059,750,000; for 1988: $657,200,000.  @ Metal-forming machine shipments:  @ Domestic ....... $70,100,000 $74,100,000 $69,250,000  @ Foreign ......... 21,750,000 8,250,000 12,000,000  @ Total ........... 91,850,000 82,350,000 81,250,000  @ Six month total for 1989: $445,800,000; for 1988: $410,450,000.  The latest rationalization for opposing William Lucas is this: Yes, he may have great experience in law enforcement, worked his way through law school, won election and re-election, administered a county larger than most states and lived an exemplary life.  But he flunked his orals.  In particular, he was unable to answer when Wisconsin Senator and constitutional scholar Herbert Kohl asked the lollapalooza, "How do you distinguish between the two, and how would you make a judgment on the difference between de facto and de jure, as the Supreme Court has commented?"  So now Mr. Lucas is being hung for the deadly phrase, "I frankly do not understand the rest of the question."  This seems to us a perfectly intelligent commentary on the Senator's prose, but the lawyers at the Washington Post and so on profess to take it as proof that a 61-year-old lawyer had never encountered the terms de facto and de jure.  Give us a break.  Mr. Lucas's other great mistake is said to be confusing two cases.  Ted Kennedy was reading questions from his staff-prepared script, and Mr. Lucas answered as if responding on the Grove City case when the question was about the Bob Jones University decision.  The exchange amounted to two brisk sentences.  Senator Kennedy didn't seem to care because he didn't even follow up; it wasn't in his script.  On rereading, Mr. Lucas played the wrong cassette, which in spontaneous and open-ended hearings can happen to anyone.  In fact it also happened to Arlen Specter, supposedly the Senate's great constitutionalist, who confused two cases in asking questions of Mr. Lucas.  Of course, to take all this seriously you have to believe that qualifications are really the issue in the Lucas assault.  But word-slips and the like are mostly excuses for folks who have to be on the "right side" of civil-rights issues.  In fact, this exercise is all about destroying a man, especially a black man, who doesn't walk in lock step to the agenda of the civil-rights establishment.  Ralph Neas and the elite's other lobbyists see a black man thinking for himself, and they can't abide it.  The Senate Judiciary Committee was supposed to vote last week on Mr. Lucas, but it delayed the vote until tomorrow.  Senator Alan Simpson noted that this would give his accusers enough time to "get out and gin . . . up" more innuendo.  They quickly obliged with a letter from Michael Sussman, an NAACP lobbyist, that Mr. Lucas had telephoned the Justice Department to urge it to drop a 1980 lawsuit charging Birmingham, Michigan, with Fair Housing Act violations.  The story was leaked to reporters late Thursday afternoon, making it difficult to rebut and difficult for Mr. Lucas to get out his denials.  Mr. Sussman later said he hadn't received the call himself, but his supervisor had.  Reached by AP, the supervisor said he couldn't remember any such call from Mr. Lucas.  Denials, of course, never quite catch up to the smears.  We suppose high-minded apologists can hide behind pieties about "experience" if they want to, but realists know a lynching when they see it.  Congress has now approved a bailout for the savings-and-loan issue, but risks a veto over where to enter the money on the federal books.  President Bush should indeed veto the mess, sending both Congress and the Treasury back to get something that will solve the problems that made the bailout necessary.  On the narrow financing issue, Treasury Secretary Brady wants the new Resolution Funding Corp. (RefCorp.) to be a "government-sponsored enterprise" (GSE), raising its proposed $50 billion to clean up the wreckage outside the federal budget.  Conferees instead bought the Democratic proposal to put the $50 billion on budget over three years but left outside the Gramm-Rudman deficit limits.  The Democrats argue that off-budget financing would cost more, but Mr. Brady surely is right that they're also seeking a precedent for sneaking other spending outside the Gramm-Rudman restrictions.  The ultimate agenda here is an effort to break George Bush's no-tax resolve.  The Treasury, though, has not been entirely forthright either.  It insists that RefCorp. will not be open-ended like Ginnie Mae and the other GSEs that have so rapidly expanded taxpayer credit-risk exposures.  However, it's closed-ended only if you believe that $50 billion will handle the cleanup, and no one much believes that.  Moreover, the Treasury likes to say that the industry itself will be responsible for the $50 billion principal, whereas taxpayers will pay only the interest.  In fact, the industry's contribution will be a few billions to buy zero-coupon Treasury bonds, which will mushroom to $50 billion over 30 years or so.  Will redemption of those bonds by the Treasury truly represent "industry financing"?  Some bookkeeping legerdemain would be forgivable if the bill actually did anything to prevent another S&L mess.  But to regard its "tougher" capital requirements as a deterrent to misdeeds, you have to agree that the initial standard -- 1.5% of assets and an ability to count mortgage-service contracts and good will as "capital"is in fact "tough."  To believe that regulation is going to have more muscle, you have to ask then why the conference, after an hour's debate, agreed to retain as a top regulator Danny Wall, who was minding the store when all the merchandise was being shoplifted.  The reason was his support by Senator Alan Cranston, who provided the key vote on the funding issue, and who was one of five Senators leaning on regulators to go easy on the now-bankrupt Lincoln Savings & Loan.  Congress also added some truly ludicrous provisions, products of Washington mysticism.  Thrifts must cut back holdings of high-yield bonds -- eventually to zero, though diversification is the essence of safety.  In any event, junk bonds are pure gold compared with some of the development schemes they were investing in.  The thrift industry also will have to put more money into "low-cost" housing.  So we "help" sick thrifts by making it tougher for them to make money.  Somehow Washington has spent months on the S&L bailout without even addressing the issue of what caused the problem, let alone how to solve it.  The thrifts had an undiversified portfolio of fixed-rate mortgage loans, but could lend long and borrow short because of the advantage Uncle Sam gave them over banks in a regime of regulated interest rates.  The onset of inflation undermined this cozy business, spurring money-market funds and other instruments that paid savers what their deposits were worth.  This threatened to drain the thrifts dry unless they were deregulated and allowed to pay market interest rates.  If thrifts had to pay more interest, obviously they had to earn more on their investments.  So they plunged into risky investments, principally commercial real-estate development.  Real-estate developers around the country recognized their piggy banks, and had the political clout to move Congress.  So Rep. Fernand St Germain boosted deposit insurance to $100,000, creating a whole new industry of brokered deposits.  With taxpayers taking all the risk, the greater a thrift's irresponsibility the greater its potential rewards.  And Rep. Jim Wright, Senator Cranston and others leaned on regulators to make sure they didn't clip the wings of highfliers.  So taxpayers are stuck with a $250 billion cleanup cost, enough money to finance capital improvements for the nation's public schools for the next 20 years.  The quick solution to the S&L problem would be to start withdrawing federal backing for deposits.  This need not hurt the "small savers" wept over by politicians.  Small savers don't maintain multiple accounts of $100,000 each.  But it certainly would make it harder for S&Ls to get easy money, and thus harder for developers to use thrifts as piggy banks.  That's why it isn't in the bill.  Surely it's clear by now that the real problem lies in the political system.  But Congress, with little serious resistance from the Bush administration, is doing once more what it did in thrift-reform bills in 1980, 1982 and 1987: pretending to solve the problem while pouring yet more money into the trough.  What we have here is merely a bailout, not a fix.  It deserves not only a veto but also a trip back to the drawing boards.  Bruce A. Baird, the prosecutor who was instrumental in negotiating Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.'s recordbreaking settlement with the government, will resign soon to join the Washington, D.C., law firm of Covington & Burling.  Mr. Baird has presided over some of the largest securities fraud cases ever in his two years as head of the commodities and securities fraud unit of the U.S. attorney's office in Manhattan.  Among the investigations he has supervised are the cases against Princeton/Newport Limited Partnership, now before a jury, and against Michael Milken, the former Drexel junk bond chief indicted last March.  Mr. Baird, 41 years old, confirmed that he plans to leave.  "After nine years as a prosecutor and the end of a round of investigations, it seemed like a good time to go on to the next challenge," he said.  Russel Carpenter, a partner at Covington & Burling, said that Mr. Baird would be joining that firm Oct. 1.  He added that Mr. Baird would join as "of counsel," a salaried position, but that he might become a partner in the future.  Covington & Burling, he said, usually chooses partners from within its own ranks of associates rather than hiring from the outside.  At the 250-lawyer firm, Mr. Baird will handle white-collar crime cases, making the typical ex-prosecutor's shift from the prosecution to the defense side.  Mr. Baird began talking with Covington & Burling about two months ago.  Charles M. Carberry, a partner at Jones, Day, Reavis & Pogue who preceded Mr. Baird in his current post at the U.S. attorney's office, praised Mr. Baird's performance.  "He did a very good job and he certainly was diligent," Mr. Carberry said.  Mr. Baird, who joined the U.S. attorney's office in 1980, made a name for himself in 1986, when he led the racketeering and conspiracy case against Carmine Persico and eight of his associates.  That victory is said to have incapacitated New York's Colombo organized crime family.  Mr. Baird was head of his office's narcotics unit when former U.S. Attorney Rudolph Giuliani selected him to succeed Mr. Carberry as head of the securities fraud unit in 1987.  The Wisconsin-born Mr. Baird has gotten much attention in the past two years for spearheading prominent securities fraud cases.  Among those indicted and prosecuted on his watch were Florida financier Paul Bilzerian, Lisa Jones, a former Drexel trading assistant, and GAF Corp. Mr. Bilzerian and Ms. Jones were convicted, but the GAF case has resulted in two mistrials.  Mr. Baird hasn't always been well-liked by defense lawyers with whom he has dealt.  Some complain that Mr. Baird is much too rigid, treating prosecution with too much zeal and seeming to enjoy playing the role of bad cop.  In negotiations, he is not one to favor compromises, defense lawyers say.  Last year, Jack Arsenault, who represents a defendant in the Princeton/Newport case, accused Mr. Baird of attempting to bludgeon his client into testifying against others by charging him with racketeering.  Mr. Arsenault said Mr. Baird told him that if Paul Berkman, a Princeton/ Newport managing director, was willing to "cooperate, fine," but if not, "we are going to roll right over you to get where we want to go."  Mr. Baird denied having made such a statement.  But he is well aware that he is not the best-liked prosecutor, and he is quick to brush off harsh criticism by saying it goes with the territory.  U.S. Attorney Benito Romano said, "Bruce has been at the forefront of our recent assault on fraud and racketeering in the securities industry, and the office will truly miss his leadership."  Mr. Baird will be succeeded by Alan M. Cohen, 39, who has been chief of the office's organized crime unit.  SmithKline Beecham PLC's celebration didn't last long.  Many investors were excited about SmithKline Beecham because of anticipated gains from combining sales forces and possibly $600 million in savings from trimming duplicative functions.  But only hours after the merger of Philadelphia's SmithKline Beckman Corp. and London's Beecham Group PLC was completed last week, the pharmaceutical maker faced new pressures.  The merger agreement between Bristol-Myers Co. and Squibb Corp. likely will give SmithKline Beecham much fiercer competition in the critical U.S. market, especially for antibiotics.  For SmithKline Beecham, simply being bigger no longer may be enough since Bristol-Myers and Squibb will be bigger still.  And cost-cutting suddenly seems a less compelling reason for the merger.  "People will turn to the next question: What kind of real momentum will be created by the combination of these businesses?" asks David MacCallum, a New York pharmaceutical analyst for San Francisco brokers Hambrecht & Quist Inc.  "I don't think there's anything those two organizations will do that will create significant momentum for the top (sales) line."  Making the marriage work "is a major undertaking" and will take some time, said Robert Bauman, SmithKline Beecham's chief executive, in an interview at the group's London headquarters.  "We are trying to move quickly," the former Beecham chairman added.  "If we don't, we will lose some of the momentum."  Mr. Bauman, an ever-optimistic American, foresees "a large amount of savings" by next year, from both increased marketing clout and reductions in staff and plants.  He expects SmithKline Beecham's pretax profit will grow more than 15% a year -- faster than either partner could have grown alone.  The merger of SmithKline and Beecham, completed last Wednesday, created a health-care giant with $6.3 billion in yearly sales and interests in such other areas as over-the-counter drugs, animal health-care products, clinical laboratories and health-related consumer products.  With a combined U.S. sales force of 1,900, SmithKline Beecham will begin selling Augmentin, a leading Beecham antibiotic, in September, Mr. Bauman said.  A similar joint promotion will start soon after for SmithKline's anti-ulcer drug Tagamet, a blockbuster that faltered in the face of intensifying competition last year.  But Augmentin may have to compete hard against two faster-growing antibiotics backed by the bigger marketing power of a combined Bristol-Myers Squibb, says Erling Refsum, a drug analyst at London's Nomura Research Institute.  Another industry analyst, citing Tagamet's flat sales in the first half, questions the wisdom of "putting more marketing muscle behind an ailing product."  Complicating the new company's U.S. challenge, two Beecham drugs could win marketing approval in the next few months.  Both the heart-attack medicine Eminase and the anti-arthritis compound Relifex would run up against entrenched rivals.  Especially with arthritis remedies, drug makers only excel if they spend a lot of money, says Eile Gibson, a vice president of Merrill Lynch International Co. in London.  "And if (SmithKline Beecham) are on a cost-cutting program, how are they going to be able to do that very well?"  SmithKline Beecham will trim production and administrative personnel rather than salespeople or scientists, Mr. Bauman replied.  "There's going to a substantial amount" of jobs lost, "but what exactly that will be I don't know."  Staff cuts and plant closings may prove touchy and timeconsuming -- especially if the health-care giant aims to eliminate 11,000 of its 55,000 employees, as some analysts predict.  Unions vow to delay the pruning process through protracted negotiations.  If the cost cutting slows, SmithKline Beecham "might have to pull back on promotion (spending) to maintain short-term earnings," says Jo Walton, an analyst at Shearson Lehman Hutton Securities Ltd. in London.  "That would damage their longterm prospects."  There's another danger.  The trans-Atlantic marriage may spark a corporate-culture clash between commercial-minded Beecham scientists and more academic-minded SmithKline ones.  Key researchers would quit, impeding the pace drug research.  "That's a risk.  I accept that," Mr. Bauman said.  Even so, he insists, "I think this will be a very good mesh."  Two high-profile reports on July activity dominate the economic statistics this week -- the purchasing agents' index, due out tomorrow, and Friday's employment data.  The reports come at a time when the economy's pace is again under intense scrutiny as some economists worry that risk of recession has replaced inflation as the chief potential peril ahead.  "The purchasers' report is going to be a major focus of attention," said David Resler, chief economist at Nomura Securities International, New York.  The puchasers' index "has proven to be a fairly good indicator of what happens to employment and that's probably the single most important information we get on the economy," he added.  In between the purchasers' report and the jobs data, the government will release a half-dozen other series, including June's leading economic indicators index.  That index could add to recession fears if it declines, as expected.  A drop in the government's chief economic forecasting tool would mark the fourth decline in five months.  A rule of thumb among economists holds that three successive declines in the index signal recession.  Other reports due out this week include June data on construction spending, factory orders and new home sales as well as July figures on car sales and chain store sales.  The employment report's most telling information on the "recession scenario" will be the level of manufacturing jobs rather than the total employment numbers, Mr. Resler asserted.  "If we see a decline -- and we expect to see one -- it's not going to bode well for the economy," he added.  The weekly statistics on new jobless claims have been rising in recent weeks and auto makers have announced production cutbacks, both foretelling lower employment levels.  The consensus view on civilian employment figures is that about 155,000 new jobs were created in July, keeping the unemployment rate unchanged at 5.3%, according to MMS International, a unit of McGraw-Hill Inc., New York.  In June, 180,000 new jobs were created.  Mr. Resler, who has had a possible recession in his forecast for some time, said the odds of one are increasing.  "At the beginning of the year, I thought there was a one-in-five chance of recession.  Now it's closer to 50-50 within a 12-month period," he said.  He and others will also be watching the purchasers' index for signs of weakness.  In June, the purchasers' index dropped below 50% for the second month in a row, indicating the economy is contracting.  Richard D. Rippe, economist at Dean Witter Reynolds Inc. in New York, doesn't see recession in the near future.  But he, too, will be watching the purchasers' data and the jobs figures with interest.  "What we'll be looking for in those reports is whether the current weakness is continuing or if it has intensified a little bit," Mr. Rippe said.  He added that "a little bounce (upward) in either report wouldn't be enough to signal a trend change."  "Although (the two reports) aren't closely linked, they're conveying the message that the labor market is softening a little bit," he said.  Still, it would take an "extremely low job growth number -- say 50,000" to persuade Mr. Rippe that the data are suggesting recession.  As for the leading indicators, due out Thursday, the consensus view calls for a dip of 0.2% on the heels of a 1.2% decline in May.  Economists said the July auto sales figures, also due out Thursday, could be significant.  The already-released 10-day totals for July turned a little more optimistic at mid-month, causing analysts to wonder whether cutbacks have already brought inventories more in line with demand.  June construction spending, due out tomorrow, is expected to slip 0.2% after a 1.3% increase in May.  And June factory orders, also due out tomorrow, are expected to increase by 0.3%, following a 2.5% decline in May.  New home sales are expected to increase by about 0.8% in June, although the range of expectations swings widely from a drop of 3.2% to an increase of 4.4%.  ---  @ Closely Watched Reports  @ Statistics Released in the Week Ended July 28  @ CHANGE  @ (from prior  @ TOTAL period)  @Money supply  @ M1 -- Week ended  @ July 17 (in billions) $777.5 -$1.6  @ M2 -- Week ended  @ July 17 (in billions) $3,123.7 -$4.7  @ M3 -- Week ended  @ July 17 (in billions) $4,009.1 -$1.1  @Real GNP  @2nd qtr., preliminary,  @annual rate (trillions) $4.124 +1.7%  @Personal Income  @June, annual rate  @(in trillions) $4.407 +0.3%  @Personal consumption  @June, annual rate  @(in trillions) $3.441 unch.  @Savings rate  @June, change in  @percentage points 5.9% +0.5  @Durable goods orders  @June (in billions) $124.10 +0.3%  @New jobless claims  @Week ended July 15 354,000 +5.7%  @Auto sales  @Mid-July total  @vs. year-ago 221,231 +1.5%  @ Statistics to Be Released This Week  @Construction spending (Tues.)  @June  @Purchasing Managers' Index (Tues.)  @July  @Manufacturers' orders (Tues.)  @June  @Manufacturers' shipments (Tues.)  @June  @New home sales (Wed.)  @June  @Index of leading indicators (Thurs.)  @June  @New car sales (Thurs.)  @July  @Chain store sales (Thurs.)  @PaineWebber Index, July  @Unemployment rate (Fri.)  @July  @Employment, payroll (Fri.)  @July  @Money supply  @New jobless claims  NCNB Corp., stepping up its aggressive acquisition strategy in Texas, agreed to buy the remaining 51% of NCNB Texas National Bank from the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp. for $800 million.  The super-regional bank holding company, based in Charlotte, N.C., had said it would accelerate its plans to acquire all of NCNB Texas, which it shared in a partnership agreement with the FDIC.  The move, analysts said, will help distance NCNB from the federal agency, a relationship that has been viewed as hindering NCNB in its acquisition efforts.  NCNB's chairman, Hugh L. McColl Jr., said the company now will focus on consolidating the Texas operation and take advantage of the large number of insolvent banks and thrifts in the state to make further purchases.  "I see some $80 billion in Texas deposits changing from weak hands to strong hands," Mr. McColl said.  "So, for the next year or two, that's where we'll be."  NCNB shares closed Friday at $53, up $1, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  Since late April, when NCNB dropped its takeover bid for Atlanta-based Citizens & Southern Corp., its stock price has jumped 40%.  To finance the NCNB Texas purchase, NCNB will put up $480 million.  Of that, $410 million will come from the recent issue of 8.7 million new shares, and $70 million raised from other equity in the past year.  The FDIC will finance the remaining $320 million.  In effect, Mr. McColl said, NCNB "is paying roughly 9% to buy a bank that is yielding a 22% return on equity."  Mr. McColl added that acquiring the balance of the bank "sooner, rather than later," also reduces the cost.  Under its five-year agreement with the FDIC, NCNB would have had to pay an increasingly higher price for NCNB Texas's shares each year.  The planned purchase, which is expected to close within 10 days, comes only a year after NCNB struck a lucrative deal with the FDIC to buy the remnants of failed First RepublicBank Corp. of Dallas.  The initial pact called for the FDIC to assume all of the costs and losses for a $5 billion pool of bad loans and foreclosed real estate at First RepublicBank.  NCNB also obtained a guarantee from the government to limit NCNB's losses for two years on the good loans it kept.  Moreover, a special tax ruling from the Internal Revenue Service allows NCNB to use the losses from the pool of bad assets to shelter taxes on the FDIC assistance and profits generated by the good side of the bank for several years.  "The earnings from Texas have been very powerful," Mr. McColl said.  "It just makes sense to take (100%) for our shareholders, rather than turn any of it over to the FDIC."  In the first half, NCNB Texas contributed $39.6 million to NCNB's firsthalf earnings.  The parent company's net income totaled $167.3 million, or $1.82 a share -- a 29% jump from $129.3 million, or $1.53 a share, a year earlier.  NCNB's move also will help the company edge away from the FDIC, a partnership that has come under some criticism.  Citizens & Southern, for example, charged NCNB with using federal assistance to help launch its hostile takeover bid last spring.  More recently, NCNB's relationship with the FDIC may have hurt the company in its bid to acquire the failed banks of Dallas-based MCorp.  Banking analysts said the FDIC would have caught considerable political flak if it had awarded yet another Texas banking prize to NCNB only one year after the company won First RepublicBank.  "This clears the decks" for NCNB, said Richard Stillinger, an analyst with Keefe, Bruyette & Woods Inc. in New York.  Returning to Moscow this summer after nearly a year's absence was like being hit in the face with a pie filled with shards of glass.  What I saw and heard -- pessimism, despair, discontent and even fear -- was new and cut deep.  I'd expected the economic situation to be bad.  Consumer goods and basic foodstuffs have always been in short supply.  But there was a fresh and palpable desperation in the eyes of my friends when they spoke of the economy.  "We live like animals," said one, referring to endless hours spent foraging in the shops for available foods.  Even well-to-do officials with fancy apartments and high-ranking posts muttered "disastrous" when asked to evaluate their predicament.  And then there's the shortage of tea.  White-aproned workers at public eating places shrugged their shoulders and shook their heads when asked for a glass.  The home-grown tea crop was squandered, I was told, by poor agriculture.  After years of overuse, the fields rebelled.  I'd also expected complaints about Mikhail Gorbachev, whose promises of reform had yet to improve my friends' daily lives.  I underestimated, however, the extent of the disaffection.  "He's more popular in the West than he is here," one acquaintance said.  Even Communist Party members who, just one year ago, were effusive in their praise of Mr. Gorbachev now evaluated the man more doubtfully.  "What is the goal of perestroika?" asked one party member, an attorney and one-time Gorbachev enthusiast.  "It is to improve our standard of living.  If Gorbachev can't achieve that -- and he hasn't -- he and his reforms mean nothing."  It was Mr. Gorbachev's performance at the recent Congress of People's Deputies that hurt his standing most among Moscow intellectuals.  "He controlled the Congress like a masterful politician," said one journalist.  "But there were no results, particularly with respect to the economy.  And it was the economy that we hoped the Congress would come to grips with."  A defense lawyer complained that the key government officials appointed by the Congress, such as the prime minister and chief prosecutor, were incumbents who retained their positions of power.  "How," he asked, "can I trust the chief prosecutor to treat my clients fairly when it was this same man whose career began and flourished during the corrupt pre-Gorbachev years, the so-called era of stagnation?"  "The Congress," another acquaintance concluded, "shuffled the cards but failed to deliver a new deck."  Crime was on the minds of Muscovites as never before, an unexpected byproduct of Mr. Gorbachev's reforms.  Racketeers demand protection money from private cooperative business enterprises.  Prostitutes blanket the tourist hotels in open connivance with police, who appear to share in the proceeds.  Bribery, it's said, is as prevalent as ever.  And people fear for their personal safety on the city's streets.  "I don't understand it," said Arkady Vaksberg, legal correspondent for Literaturnaia Gazeta.  "Glasnost has triggered a rise in crime.  It has made people less fearful, more bold.  Some express themselves with words.  Others, with knives."  "We are warned to walk our children to school because it is not safe," a father of two told me.  "We are advised not to ride in elevators alone."  Most striking of all, and most disturbing, were reports that anti-Semitism is on the rise.  At first I reacted skeptically.  After all, relations with Israel are improving and emigration is at record levels.  But I heard stories of widespread anti-Semitism so often and from so many sources that I left Moscow convinced of their veracity.  In Pushkin Square in central Moscow in early June, a group of young thugs assaulted a man because he "looks Jewish."  The police broke it up without arrests.  Jewish families that had never considered emigrating, have now applied for exit visas fearful, they say, for their safety.  A Jewish attorney predicts Jews will be blamed for causing the country's economic mess.  "The simple people will point to the Jews.  It was the Jews, they'll say, who brought us the revolution.  And it is the Jews, they'll say, who control the state and bring us the current disaster."  A cab ride seems to confirm the prediction.  The driver is asked about the country's economy.  He embarks on an anti-Jewish tirade.  "They brought us the revolution," he says.  "They're to blame."  An American embassy official reports that he, too, has heard reports of growing anti-Semitism.  He says he has obtained a copy of Nina Andreevna's latest article, which, he says, has been submitted to Nash Sovremennik, an anti-reform literary journal.  Ms. Andreevna is the Leningrad teacher whose publications reputedly have the backing of Egor Ligachev, Mr. Gorbachev's main rival.  The U.S. official says Ms. Andreevna blames the "Zionists" for the nation's problems.  We wonder whether the piece will see the light of day and if so, what the future will hold for Soviet Jews.  A Jewish friend recounts an anecdote.  The year is 2000.  A lone man stands before the closed doors of the Soviet visa office, waiting in vain for permission to emigrate.  A pedestrian approaches.  "Are you a Jew?" the pedestrian asks.  "No," the man says.  "I'm an idiot."  The implication: The Jew was a fool because he didn't emigrate in 1989 when emigration was possible.  What makes the current bout of anti-Jewish sentiment in Moscow especially frightening is its concurrence with unbridled ethnic unrest across the country, from the Baltic republics to the Caucasus and Central Asia.  As national minorities voice continuing displeasure with the Kremlin, Russian chauvinism is likely to rear up in response.  What my Jewish friends fear most is being crushed in the fray.  ---  Mr. Rand, a journalist at the Kennan Institute, is completing a book on the Soviet criminal justice system.  Anti-abortion politics involves a lot more than battling abortion.  Although the Supreme Court's recent decision to limit the right to abortion is the biggest anti-abortion victory, it isn't the only one.  Anti-abortion forces are blocking medical research that might help infertile couples and people suffering from incurable diseases, influencing appointments at the Department of Health and Human Services, and successfully campaigning to limit federal assistance for family planning.  "Federal policy has moved consistently in our direction, of course not as quickly as we would like," says Douglas Johnson, legislative director of the National Right to Life Committee.  "The pro-life movement remains vigilant about measures that expand abortion rights," he says.  As a result, anti-abortion activists carefully monitor medical-research policies and federal health programs they think might allow or encourage abortions.  "They have been all over the place and in many ways quite destructive," says Jeannie Rosoff, president of The Alan Guttmacher Institute, a family-planning research group.  Right now, anti-abortion groups are fighting to broaden restrictions on medical research.  Responding to pressure from anti-abortion forces last year, HHS blocked the National Institutes of Health from funding research on fetal-tissue transplants.  Researchers want to explore suggestions that the implantation of small amounts of fetal tissue could help treat diseases such as Alzheimer's disease, Parkinson's disease and diabetes.  "But we're not going to get that unless we can study fetal tissue," says Dr. Tamela Davis, a professor of pediatrics at Case Western Reserve Medical School in Cleveland and the president of the American Federation for Clinical Research.  HHS is reviewing a National Institutes of Health recommendation that the funding suspension be lifted.  But the decision will be sensitive for HHS Secretary Louis Sullivan, a doctor who has allied himself with anti-abortion positions but who says he has "reservations about any blanket prohibition on medical research."  Anti-abortion groups vow to fight any effort to allow such research and say they will ask the White House to overrule Dr. Sullivan if he resumes funding.  "In our view it would be insane for the federal government to embrace any policy which assumes a large supply of dead fetuses.  From an administration that wants to ban all abortions, that would clearly be inconsistent," Mr. Johnson says.  Although disturbing to medical researchers, this position doesn't stir much public opposition.  "If you're talking about fetal research to young women who are concerned about whether they can get abortions, it seems pretty remote," Ms. Rosoff says.  Some elements of the anti-abortion movement also are opposing federal funding for research on in-vitro fertilization.  They complain that fertilizing ova outside the womb and then reimplanting an embryo often leads to the destruction of embryos.  Federal funding of IVF research has been stalled for nearly 10 years by a bureaucratic Catch-22: All research must be cleared by a government ethics advisory board, but the panel was abolished in 1980, leaving no way to authorize projects.  Last year the Reagan administration announced plans to revive the panel, but nothing has happened yet.  As a result, the federal government still can't fund research that may offer hope to the nation's 2.4 million infertile married couples.  All the research is private.  Opposition from anti-abortion groups also is preventing a joint House-Senate panel called the Biomedical Ethics Board from getting off the ground.  Formed in 1985 to issue reports on the implications of human genetic engineering and guidelines for federally funded fetal research, the panel hasn't yet started its work.  Last year Congress gave a two-year extension to the panel, which is aiming to produce its two reports, plus a third on the withdrawal of nutrition and hydration from dying patients, in 1990.  But the panel doesn't have a chairman or enough money and may miss its deadlines again.  And anti-abortion forces are blocking appointments at HHS. Earlier this year they prevented Robert Fulton from taking a high post there after charging that he hadn't responded properly to reports of infant euthanasia in an Oklahoma hospital.  Mr. Fulton, formerly the director of human services in Oklahoma, strongly denies the charges.  Government-funded family-planning services, provided under Title 10 of the Public Health Service Act, also bothers the anti-abortion movement.  Dr. C. Everett Koop, the anti-abortion surgeon general, argues that more sex education and birth control are needed to combat abortion.  "If you want to get rid of abortions, you better get rid of the reason for them -- unwanted pregnancy," he explains.  But sex education and birth control are sensitive issues for the anti-abortion movement.  While the National Right to Life Committee doesn't take positions for or against birth control and sex education, other anti-abortion groups contend that the programs often lead to an increase in pregnancies.  "The more money that goes into Title 10, the more teen-agers get pregnant," argues Michael Schwartz, an anti-abortion activist at the Free Congress Foundation.  Ms. Rosoff charges that the anti-abortion movement "basically has overlooked anything that makes sexual behavior less dangerous.  They want to make sure that no sex takes place outside of marriage."  Politics and budgetary austerity have limited Title 10 funding to about $140 million a year for several years.  As a result, Faye Wattleton, president of the Planned Parenthood Federation of America, says 65% of the women eligible for the services can't receive them.  The program primarily serves low-income women; about a third of those who receive family planning and contraceptive services through the program are adolescents, according to HHS.  The department has issued guidelines that prevent the approximately 4,000 family-planning clinics supported by the program from promoting abortion as a method of planning, but family-planning groups are challenging the guidelines in court.  ---  Alan L. Otten contributed to this article.  ---  @ Teen-age Pregnancy and Abortion  @Rate per 1,000 women, 1985  @Pregnancies  @ Under 15 years old ................................ 16.6  @ 15 to 19 years old ................................ 109.8  @Abortions  @ Under 15 years old ................................ 9.1  @ 15 to 19 years old ................................ 43.8  @Source: The Alan Guttmacher Institute  President Bush and lawmakers on Capitol Hill are pressing Exxon Corp. to live up to its public commitments to clean up the Alaska oil spill, even if work extends into next year and beyond.  The federal government wants Exxon to continue voluntarily shouldering the expense of the Valdez oil spill.  A memo by the Exxon's spill manager raised doubts about the company's intentions after mid-September, when it will wind down its operations because of weather.  "I don't want to see Exxon prematurely leave the scene or prematurely fail to live up to the firm commitments they made," Mr. Bush said at a news conference.  If Exxon were to pull out of agreements with the federal government or the state of Alaska, he said, "I would be very much exercised about that and try my best to do something about it."  William D. Stevens, president of Exxon Co. U.S.A., told a House Interior subcommittee Friday that the company will comply with "any reasonable request" made next spring by the Coast Guard, which is in charge of the cleanup.  Mr. Stevens said the memo, which was the subject of the congressional hearing, has been misinterpreted.  Mr. Stevens said he expects Exxon to continue complying with cleanup work ordered by the federal government, but he refused to make "an unequivocal sort of commitment . . . recognizing the vast amount of scientific uncertainty."  Dennis Kelso, head of Alaska's environment office, called Exxon's pledge less than "a bombproof commitment."  He said shoreline that already has been cleaned is being covered anew by oil and he warned that wildlife, beaches and fisheries still face possible contamination.  If Exxon were to refuse to perform work ordered by the Coast Guard, the federal government could pay for the work and take legal action to force Exxon to pay the bill.  However, the Coast Guard hasn't enough money in its accounts to pay for cleanup work.  LEGG MASON Inc. increased its quarterly to seven cents a share from six cents, payable Oct. 16 to stock of record Sept. 19.  Legg Mason, Baltimore, is an investment broker concern.  International banker Edmond J. Safra won a highly unusual public apology from rival American Express Co. after his investigators traced a campaign to discredit him to representatives of American Express.  After the investigation linked American Express to the campaign, Mr. Safra's attorney published a thinly veiled threat in June to seek criminal fraud charges against the travel and financial services giant, before the two sides agreed to a settlement.  The pact also included a pledge by American Express to donate $1 million each to four charities of Mr. Safra's choosing.  The campaign against Mr. Safra apparently influenced the publication of articles in European publications accusing Mr. Safra, who lives in Geneva and controls New York's Republic National Bank and other international banking companies, of such unsavory activities as laundering drug money.  Mr. Safra has won libel judgments over such articles against two French publications.  After Mr. Safra's initial complaint about the campaign went unheeded by American Express, a criminal lawyer hired by Mr. Safra to conduct the investigation turned to an unusual ploy.  Using his regular column in the New York Law Journal, attorney Stanley S. Arkin wrote about a hypothetical case in which fraud charges may be applied to a corporation engaging in such a dirty-trick campaign.  "Spreading false or malicious rumor or flat-out lies" could amount to "criminal fraud," Mr. Arkin wrote in the June 8 column.  In Mr. Arkin's hypothetical example, the multinational company that spreads "disinformation" about a competitor has a chairman who "cherishes his Boy Scout image."  People familiar with the column say this was a deliberate reference to James D. Robinson III, American Express's chairman.  Efforts to reach an editor of the New York Law Journal yesterday were unsuccessful.  Mr. Arkin declined to comment and referred all questions to Mr. Safra's spokesmen.  Shortly after the publication of the column, which American Express officials acknowledge that they saw, American Express began an internal investigation and hired two prominent outside lawyers to handle the case.  Subsequent negotiations resulted in the settlement, which included an exchange of letters between Mr. Safra and Mr. Robinson.  "Your reputation as a pre-eminent banker has been achieved with enormous effort over a lifetime, and so I appreciate even more how painful it must have been for you to endure these baseless attacks," Mr. Robinson said in his letter to Mr. Safra, which was made public Friday.  American Express has declined to say whether any senior officials of the company had been aware of the campaign, which Mr. Robinson called an "unauthorized and shameful effort" on the part of "certain persons acting on behalf of American Express."  Mr. Robinson did write to Mr. Safra that he has informed "key officers" of American Express that such dirty tricks aren't acceptable.  Sources close to American Express said the company is still in the process of investigating who is responsible internally for dispersing the negative material about Mr. Safra.  Mr. Safra, who specializes in handling the money of wealthy individuals, sold American Express one of his former banking companies, Trade Development Bank, in 1983 for $520 million plus the assumption of $30 million in debt.  Mr. Safra agreed to manage the bank for American Express.  Mr. Safra chafed under the corporate structure of American Express, however, and he resigned as chairman and chief executive officer of American Express International Banking Corp. at the end of 1984.  Mr. Safra then turned his attention to his other principal holding, Republic New York Corp., of which he owns 21%.  It is the parent of Republic National Bank of New York.  Republic National acquired the London-based bank-note business of the American Express banking unit before Mr. Safra left American Express.  As part of that purchase, Republic agreed not to compete with the American Express bank in the lucrative Swiss banking market until 1988.  What Republic did do, however, was begin hiring international bankers away from American Express, ending up with as many as 23 American Express bankers over the next four years.  The exact number is in dispute.  In 1987, Republic applied for a banking license in Switzerland.  Fearing that wealthy clients would desert it, American Express formally opposed Republic's Swiss license application, which was granted in early 1988.  American Express also hired an investigator to gather information on Mr. Safra.  American Express officials say the investigator was supposed to see if Mr. Safra or Republic were violating the non-compete agreement.  In 1988, the first of a series of negative articles about Mr. Safra began appearing.  In January of that year, an Italian magazine linked Mr. Safra to illegal money laundering.  In the summer, similar articles appeared in Peruvian and Mexican newspapers, and in the fall, several such stories appeared in the French publication Minute, according to French court documents.  In late 1988, Mr. Safra hired Mr. Arkin, a criminal lawyer who has represented several defendants in the Wall Street insider trading scandal.  Mr. Arkin employed as many as 10 people in his investigation of the news stories, which included the surreptitious surveillance of some American Express employees, according to people familiar with the case.  In the middle of March, Mr. Safra called American Express's Mr. Robinson to complain about what his investigators believed was American Express's involvement in some of the negative news stories about him.  The two met in Mr. Safra's New York apartment, where Mr. Robinson said he would be "dumbfounded" if American Express had any involvement in circulating innuendo about the banker.  Mr. Robinson said he then asked about a half dozen senior American Express executives about Mr. Safra's allegations and was told there was nothing to them.  Mr. Robinson said that when he called Mr. Safra to tell him that, Mr. Safra told him he was being misled by his American Express staff members.  Mr. Robinson said he then asked Mr. Safra for any specific information that he had, but that he wasn't given any.  Following the publication of Mr. Arkin's law-journal column, Mr. Robinson directed his general counsel, Gary Beller, to conduct a second investigation.  Mr. Beller retained two outside lawyers, John Martin of Schulte, Roth & Zabel, a former Manhattan U.S. Attorney, and Kenneth Bialkin of Skadden, Arps Slate Meagher & Flom.  American Express concluded that its operatives had been involved in a campaign to discredit Mr. Safra.  Company officials found at least one article that they believed their operatives had influenced, people familiar with the American Express investigation said.  Stories about Mr. Safra's alleged money-laundering ties and other unsavory allegations have continued to circulate as late as this month, but it is unclear just how much of the content of the articles was influenced by material gathered and dispersed by those working for American Express.  On July 3, for example, Philippe Mottaz, a Washington-based reporter for Swiss television, reported in a broadcast that he had obtained a secret U.S. Drug Enforcement Agency report linking Mr. Safra with the laundering of drug money.  Mr. Mottaz said he had obtained an American Express-prepared report on Mr. Safra while doing his research but that he didn't use information from American Express in his story.  A DEA spokesman couldn't be reached yesterday.  A spokesman for Mr. Safra said the banker denies any involvement with laundering drug money.  The agreement announced Friday was the result of about 12 meetings between lawyers for American Express and Mr. Safra.  People familiar with the talks say Mr. Safra's representatives wanted American Express to take responsibility for planting all the negative articles that have been written about Mr. Safra recently but that American Express balked.  The letters exchanged between Mr. Robinson and Mr. Safra were both pointed and personal.  Mr. Robinson wrote, "While I believe in vigorous competition, there is no room in our organization for actions which could cause unjustified harm to a competitor.  Therefore, I want to apologize to you and your organization."  Mr. Safra, on his behalf, responded, "I believe you had no personal involvement in or knowledge of the false rumors and innuendoes about me and Republic National Bank of New York."  The four charities that will receive $1 million each from American Express are: United Way of America, Anti-Defamation League of B'nai B'rith, Hopital Cantonal de Geneva and the International Red Cross.  A worker in my plant, a man I will call Joe Davis, recently earned his high school equivalency certificate.  Not so unusual, you say; a lot of young people discover they can't get a good job without a diploma of some kind.  That isn't the case with Mr. Davis.  He has held a good job for more than 25 years.  But he also couldn't read this article, or anything more complex than a comic book, before he returned to the classroom.  Mr. Davis is one of approximately 20 employees at Ingersoll-Rand's Athens, Pa., plant who earned equivalency credit during the past year.  They completed their high school work through a special program designed to help workers cope with plant modernization, a program that made stepping stones of words and sums that once were stumbling blocks.  The program, operated by Penn State University's Institute for Research in Training and Development, began in 1987 after Ingersoll-Rand decided to modernize its Athens plant, the primary manufacturing location for the company's Power Tool Division.  Parts of the plant had been in operation for more than 100 years, and it was in many respects typical of older factories found throughout the Northeast.  Ingersoll-Rand made a commitment to the community and to employees by keeping the plant going, realizing at the same time that changes were necessary.  When we reviewed the alternatives, we decided that to keep our business competitive, we would have to upgrade our equipment.  Our employees historically have operated conventional machine tools -- cranks, dials, buttons, etc. Now, as a result of upgrading to numerically controlled machinery, they have to be capable of performing computer set-ups, interacting with the controls of this new technology and integrating these abilities with their regular work teams.  Production methods went from the traditional assembly line system to cellular manufacturing.  Workers are grouped in cells of 20 individuals, and each cell handled similar manufacturing functions, regardless of product.  The operation is fully computerized.  Traditionally, companies in this position hire people with specific skills for specific jobs for a short term.  If and when their skills are no longer needed, those people often are let go.  However, that cut-and-dried approach fails to take into consideration intangibles such as pride of workmanship, loyalty and good work habits.  Rather than hire new, already qualified workers, we decided to retrain current employees.  Most had long service with the company.  They were familiar with our products, with customer complaints and compliments and, most importantly, with the plant's long-established culture.  These attributes cannot be instilled through a training seminar.  Having thus decided to commit ourselves to the retraining of current employees, we invited professors and graduate students from Penn State's University Park campus to visit the plant and test the skills of our hourly workers.  This was the first step of a five-year program, co-sponsored with the State of Pennsylvania's Ben Franklin Partnership.  The researchers concluded that training should take place on two levels: basic skills (reading, writing and arithmetic), and floor skills -- skills employees would need in the day-to-day operation of computerized equipment.  Those enrolled in the program's small classes, start with basic math before moving on to algebra.  Reading assignments also increase in difficulty during the 15- to 24-month learning cycles.  Employees like Joe Davis can go on to earn their graduate equivalency diplomas.  Associate's degrees also are offered in the fields of electrical and mechanical technology.  The results have exceeded expectations.  The Penn State program helped Ingersoll-Rand to profit from plant modernization, since computerization keeps costs down and products priced competitively.  But it did so while giving veteran workers increased pride and a greater feeling of self-worth.  We also have retained dedicated, proven employees.  The employees' response to the program is overwhelmingly favorable: 99% of those eligible volunteered to participate.  And many don't stop with the basics.  For example, some, having learned algebra, asked to move on to geometry.  Since the inception of the retraining program, our employees have spent more than 27,000 hours in the classroom.  The magnitude of this number certainly demonstrates the commitment our employees have made, because approximately 50% of those hours were on the employees' own time.  Gerald Chandler, who is a machine operator on our night shift, states: "I do not mind that the refresher training was on our time . . .  I never had a chance to take algebra or advanced math in high school."  Plant electrician David Shanks says: "I certainly had some misgivings . . .  I had been out of school for over 20 years. {But} I have decided to take advantage of the program, as I do not wish to be left behind my peers.  Advancement and merit should come to those who earn it, not those who are next in line."  The plant isn't the same place it was before the summer of 1987.  Not only do the employees feel better about themselves, but the program has been an eye-opener for their supervisors, as well.  For example, not long ago management scheduled a plant open house.  The workers basically told us, "It's our show.  We'll handle it."  They did -- for the first time ever without managerial support -- and made quite an impression on the several thousand people who attended.  Now other Ingersoll-Rand plant managers are looking at the Athens plant to see whether a similar program can help them.  According to plant manager Mark Amlot, "If anybody's looking for particulars, he can always ask someone like Gerald Chandler or David Shanks."  ---  Mr. Sheedy is manager of human resources at Ingersoll-Rand's Athens, Pa., plant.  More than half the men arrested in 14 major cities who volunteered for drug testing were found to have ingested at least one drug, the Justice Department said yesterday.  The highest percentage of drug use, 82%, was found in Philadelphia, followed by San Diego, with 80%, according to the Drug Use Forecasting study by the National Institute of Justice.  The testing ran from October through December 1988.  "There should be no longer any question as to how much of a catalyst for crime the lust for illegal drugs has become in America today," Attorney General Dick Thornburgh said in a statement.  "Drug users and traffickers will beat, rob and kill anyone for drugs and profits."  The tests checked for the presence of cocaine, marijuana, opiates, PCP, amphetamines, Darvon, Valium, methaqualone, methadone and barbiturates.  After Philadelphia and San Diego, the cities with the highest percentages of men arrested who tested positive for drug use were New York and Chicago at 78%; New Orleans, 75%; and Portland, Ore., and Birmingham, Ala., 70%.  Rounding out the list were Detroit, 69%; Cleveland, 68%; Dallas and Phoenix, Ariz., 57%; St. Louis, 56%; and Kansas City, 54%.  Washington, D.C., which didn't test for the presence of marijuana, had 68% test positive for at least one of the other drugs.  Among women tested, those found positive for drug use ranged from a high of 80% in San Diego to a low of 45% in St. Louis, the report said.  In the previous three-month period, July through September, the percentage of men who tested positive for at least one drug was highest in Chicago, with 85%, followed by San Diego, 83%; Philadelphia, 79%; Portland, 76%, and Miami and Birmingham, 75% each.  In the current reporting period, only about one-fourth of those arrested, tested and interviewed said they needed drug or alcohol abuse treatment.  "This suggests the need for improved supervision, monitoring, or court-mandated requirements for arrestees to stay off drugs and get treatment," said James K. Stewart, director of the National Institute of Justice.  The report indicated a spread in the use of cocaine.  It also found that about one-fourth of those tested in 13 cities said in interviews they had injected drugs, and that in some cities the rate was much higher.  "This suggests that many criminal suspects are at a risk for hepatitis, HIV infection or developing AIDS {acquired immune deficiency syndrome} -- and they are very likely to spread these diseases to the general population," Mr. Stewart said.  The following were among Friday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ CORPORATES  Southern Bell Telephone & Telegraph Co. -- $300 million of 8 1/2% debentures due Aug. 1, 2029, priced at 96.10 to yield 8.856%.  The issue is noncallable for five years and was priced at a yield spread 87.5 basis points above the 30-year Treasury bond.  Rated triple-A by Moody's Investors Service Inc. and Standard & Poor's Corp., the issue will be sold through underwriters led by Morgan Stanley & Co.  The issuer is a unit of BellSouth Corp.  ITT Financial Corp. -- $100 million of 8 3/8% senior notes due Aug. 1, 1995, priced at 99.90 to yield 8.396%.  The notes are noncallable and were priced at a yield spread 75 basis points above a six-year Treasury security (estimated between the five-year and seven-year Treasury notes).  Rated single-A-1 by Moody's and single-A-plus by S&P, the issue will be sold through Morgan Stanley & Co.  The issuer is a unit of ITT Corp.  Kay Jewelers Inc. -- $100 million of 12 7/8% senior subordinated notes due Aug. 1, 1999, priced at par.  Rated single-B-2 by Moody's and single-B-plus by S&P, the issue will be sold through Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.  @ MORTGAGES  Federal National Mortgage Association -- $300.1 million of Remic mortgage securities being offered in 10 classes by Salomon Brothers Inc. Yields range from 8.49%, a spread of 75 basis points over one-year Treasurys, to 10.36%, a spread of 220 basis points over 20-year Treasurys.  The offering, Series 1989-52, is backed by Fannie Mae 9 1/2% securities.  Separately, Fannie Mae issued $300 million issue of Remic mortgage securities in nine classes through First Boston Corp.  The offering, Series 1989-53, is backed by Fannie Mae 9% securities.  @ EUROBONDS  Daio Paper Corp. (Japan) -- $150 million of bonds due Aug. 17, 1993, with equity-purchase warrants, indicating a 4 3/8 coupon at par, via Yamaichi International Ltd. Guaranteed by Nippon Credit Bank.  Each $5,000 bond carries one warrant, exercisable from Sept. 1, 1989, through Aug. 5, 1993, to buy company shares at an expected premium of 2 1/2% to the closing share price when terms are fixed Aug. 3.  The company also issued 100 million marks of bonds with equity-purchase warrants, indicating a 1 3/4% coupon due Aug. 17, 1994, at par, via Deutsche Bank.  Guaranteed by Long-Term Credit Bank of Japan.  Each 5,000 mark bond carries one warrant and one certificate for four warrants, exercisable from Sept. 1, 1989, through Aug. 10, 1994, to buy company shares at an expected premium of 2 1/2% above closing share price when prices are fixed Aug. 3.  Each 50,000 mark bond carries one certificate for 50 warrants with same terms.  Nippon Stainless Steel Co. (Japan) -- $100 million of bonds due Aug. 17, 1993, with equity-purchase warrants, indicating a 4 3/8% coupon at par, via Yamaichi International Ltd. Guaranteed by Sumitomo Bank.  Each $5,000 bond carries one warrant, exercisable from Aug. 30, 1989, through Aug. 10, 1993, to buy company shares at an expected premium of 2 1/2% to the closing share price when terms are fixed Aug. 3.  Kingdom of Belgium (sovereign) -- 300 million marks of floating-rate notes due Aug. 22, 1999, paying 1/8 point under the six-month London interbank offered rate, priced at 100 1/4, via Morgan Stanley G.m.b.H.  Callable from Aug. 22, 1994, at par and on every interest payment date thereafter.  Kasai Kogyo Co. (Japan) -- 50 million Swiss francs of notes due Aug. 16, 1993 with equity-purchase warrants, indicating a 2 5/8% coupon at par, via Handelsbank NatWest NV. Guaranteed by Kyowa Bank.  Exercisable from Sept. 1, 1989, to July 29, 1993.  Terms fixed Aug. 3.  Callable for tax reasons from Aug. 16, 1990, at 101 1/2, declining 1/2C annually.  Sakai Chemical Industry Co. (Japan) -- 120 million Swiss francs of privately placed convertible notes due Sept. 30, 1994, with a fixed coupon of 0% at par, via Credit Suisse.  Put option on Sept. 30, 1991, at a fixed 108 3/8 to yield 3.857%.  Each 50,000 Swiss franc note is convertible from Sept. 4, 1989, to Sept. 16, 1994.  Terms fixed Aug. 3.  Council of Europe (agency) -- 15 billion pesetas of 11 3/4% "Matador" bonds due Sept. 18, 1996, priced at 101 3/8 to yield 11.83% less full fees, via Banco Bilbao Vizcaya.  Fees 1 3/4.  Cie Francaise des Petroles/Total (France) -- 500 million French francs of 8 5/8% bonds due Aug. 24, 1993, priced at 101 1/2 to yield 8.66% less full fees, via Credit Lyonnais.  Fees 1 5/8.  Hearst Corp., making official what had been an open secret for months, said it put the financially troubled Los Angeles Herald Examiner on the auction block.  The company didn't specify an asking price for the morning daily, but speculation has been that Hearst is seeking upward of $100 million.  Lazard Freres & Co., a New York investment-banking firm, has been retained to receive and evaluate any offers.  The Herald Examiner's circulation of about 238,000 daily and 183,000 on Sundays makes it the 42nd-largest newspaper in the country.  It has steadily lost circulation, however, to the much larger Los Angeles Times and the growing Daily News.  The Herald Examiner is believed to have been unprofitable for at least the past decade.  In a terse statement Friday, Robert J. Danzig, vice president and general manager of New York-based Hearst Newspapers, praised the Herald Examiner's news staff.  But "continuing our ownership of the Herald Examiner is not compatible with the strategic direction of our newspaper company," Mr. Danzig said.  Neither he nor other Hearst officials could immediately be reached to elaborate or to say what would happen if Hearst can't find a buyer to its liking.  Herald Examiner managers will continue their attempt to structure an employee buy-out of the paper led by John J. McCabe, chief operating officer, and convert it to a tabloid.  Of all the arguments that have been advanced for and against a flag-burning amendment, the most persuasive, in my opinion, is one offered by Patrick Buchanan and William F. Buckley.  Both columnists have suggested that such an amendment should be adopted as a means of telling the Supreme Court it has gone too far.  Their proposal has been denounced by civil libertarians as being at once frivolous and a grave departure from the American Way, but in fact court-bashing by amendment is a hallowed tradition in America, almost as old as the court itself.  Indeed, one-fourth of all the amendments that have been adopted since the Bill of Rights were framed to overturn specific Supreme Court decisions, and hundreds of others for the same end have been proposed unsuccessfully.  The game began at the beginning, with the court's very first major decision.  In the 1793 case of Chisholm v.  Georgia, two South Carolinians sued the state of Georgia on behalf of a British subject, and the court ruled in favor of the plaintiffs.  Amid an enormous popular outcry, an amendment was introduced to deprive the federal courts of jurisdiction in suits brought against a state by a foreigner or a citizen of another state.  The proposal was passed by the necessary two-thirds majority of Congress in 1794 and ratified as the Eleventh Amendment four years later.  As if insufficiently chastened by that experience, the Supreme Court in 1803 handed down its celebrated decision in Marbury v.  Madison, in which for the first time it declared a congressional enactment unconstitutional.  Though the case is conventionally cited as having established the principle of judicial review, it did not at the time establish much of anything except that the justices had best watch their steps.  President Jefferson was infuriated and called for the popular election of justices who would serve limited terms.  The members of his party in Congress had what they thought was a better idea, namely to purge the bench by the impeachment process.  They did impeach Justice Samuel Chase but failed to obtain a conviction in the Senate, whereupon Virginia Rep. John Randolph, who had managed the prosecution, proposed a constitutional amendment making federal judges removable by the president on application of a simple majority of both houses of Congress.  That failed passage, as did upwards of 30 similar amendments, but the Supreme Court got the message: It did not venture to strike down another act of Congress for more than half a century.  The court did, during the long tenure of Chief Justice John Marshall (1801-1835), strike down a number of state laws, the states being less formidable adversaries than Congress.  Though the states generally tended to ignore the court's orders, the decisions elicited repeated proposals to alter the Constitution.  That was among the many reasons that 1,300 amendments were introduced in Congress during the Constitution's first hundred years.  One of the more interesting came from President Andrew Jackson.  Angered by the tenor of Marshall's rulings, and believing (as Jefferson had) that the presidential veto, not court decisions, was the proper instrument for defending the Constitution, he called for de-fanging the jurists by establishing two Supreme Courts -- one for the states east of the Appalachians, one for those to the west.  It was under Marshall's successor, Jackson-appointee Roger Brooke Taney, that the court again dared to declare an act of Congress unconstitutional.  This was the infamous Dred Scott decision (1857), which held, among other things, that blacks were not and never could become citizens of the U.S., even if they were free.  Most Southerners were jubilant, most Northerners outraged.  Abraham Lincoln spoke for the rank and file of the nascent Republican Party when he voiced the hope that the ruling might be reversed, inasmuch as it had been decided by a five-to-four vote.  No one considered trying to overturn it by amendment, however, for the southern states had enough votes to block such a maneuver.  But the South was soon to secede.  After the Civil War triumphant northern radicals could and did force civil rights amendments through Congress and the states, and the first sentence of the Fourteenth Amendment explicitly overruled the Dred Scott decision.  The next amendment adopted to overturn a Supreme Court decision was the Sixteenth.  In 1895, though it had previously upheld the constitutionality of a federal income tax levied during the Civil War, the court ruled in Pollock v.  Farmers' Loan and Trust that such taxes were unconstitutional.  Almost immediately an amendment authorizing income taxes was introduced, only to be defeated.  Thirty-three subsequent efforts failed, until finally, in 1909, the proposal cleared Congress.  Four years later it had been ratified by the requisite three-quarters of the states.  On several occasions the mere threat of amendment has stimulated the court to rethink its direction.  During and shortly after World War I, the court struck down a pair of congressional enactments designed to prevent the exploitation of the labor of children.  More than 50 separate amendments were introduced to grant Congress the power to regulate or prohibit child labor; in 1924 an amendment for that purpose passed both houses.  Twenty-eight states had ratified when, in the late 1930s, the Supreme Court made the amendment irrelevant by reversing its stand.  A similar fate befell the court's innovations in the field of foreign relations.  In 1920 it decreed that treaties need not be constitutional and could, in fact, override the Constitution.  A decade and a half later it declared that executive agreements had the constitutional force of treaties.  This meant that the president could bargain away the rights of Americans simply by agreement with another head of state.  Franklin Roosevelt did precisely that, turning over to Stalin the assets of Russian emigres who had become U.S. citizens; the court approved the action.  After the war, the court went so far as to invalidate a California law on the ground that it violated Article 55 of the UN charter.  In response, Sen. John Bricker of Ohio introduced the Bricker Amendment, which would effectively have annulled all these rulings.  The amendment failed in Congress by one vote; but the call was close enough that the court found it prudent to stop hearing cases on foreign relations and direct its attention elsewhere.  The most recent constitutional override of a decision of the Supreme Court came as something of an anti-climax to many years of politicking.  Back in 1937, in the case of Breedlove v.  Suttles, the court upheld a poll tax, despite arguments that it was "patently a device of disfranchising Negroes," in violation of the Fifteenth Amendment.  Bills and amendments to outlaw the poll tax were introduced in every session of Congress for the next 25 years.  Then the Twenty-fourth amendment was passed by Congress and was ratified in 1964.  By that time, however, only two states were actually affected, since all the others had already abolished poll taxes.  Now we come to the flap over the flag.  Whatever the substantive merits of the proposal to remind the court once again who is boss, it cannot be said that to do so would be un-American.  It is as American, as mom, apple pie, and -- well, the flag.  ---  Mr. McDonald is a professor of history at the University of Alabama.  Miller & Rhoads Inc. filed for bankruptcy-law protection after a plan to sell two department stores fell through, causing its financing plan to collapse.  The Richmond, Va., retailer had arranged new financing with GE Capital Corp., its largest secured creditor and a unit of General Electric Co., New York.  But that financing as well as agreements with creditors depended on the sale of the stores, the company said.  The company's troubles stem partly from debt taken on during a leveraged buy-out in September 1987 by Philadelphia real estate developer Kevin F. Donohoe, his partners and Miller & Rhoads managers.  Such buy-outs, in which small groups of investors rely heavily on debt financing for acquisitions, have pervaded retailing.  But "obviously we had not anticipated the downturn that hit the retail industry over the past 1 1/2 years," Mr. Donohoe said Friday.  He and his partners own 83% of the company.  The buy-out of Miller & Rhoads was valued at $57 million, all but about $1 million of it borrowed money, a company spokeswoman said.  In the filing for reorganization under Chapter 11 of the federal Bankruptcy Code, the company listed $94.5 million in assets and $103 million in liabilities.  Under Chapter 11, a company seeks court protection from creditors while it develops a plan to pay its debts.  The spokeswoman said GE Capital, which had helped to finance the buy-out, supported the filing.  GE Capital officials couldn't be reached for comment.  Mr. Donohoe had sought to combine Miller & Rhoads with another East Coast chain.  But he was unsuccessful in an effort to acquire Woodward & Lothrop, a Washington-based retailer.  Miller & Rhoads has 15 stores in Virginia and North Carolina.  In addition, Miller & Rhoads last fall started putting more emphasis on upscale merchandise, a switch its management now calls a mistake.  According to Mr. Donohoe, Miller & Rhoads had agreed to sell one shopping-mall store in Roanoke, Va., and another in Lynchburg, Va., to Stone & Thomas Inc., a Charleston, W.Va., chain.  But, he said, other "anchor stores" in the malls used certain operating agreements to block the sales.  He said Miller & Rhoads still hopes to be able to sell the stores and to expand.  John E. Stokely, the company's president, said 25 managers will be laid off in a cost-cutting move.  But he said wages and benefits won't be cut for remaining employees and that for customers, "it's business as usual at all Miller & Rhoads stores."  During periodic get-togethers over the past three years, Richard L. Gelb, chairman of Bristol-Myers Co., and Richard M. Furlaud, chairman of Squibb Corp., half-seriously entertained the notion of merging the two companies.  That the chief executives of two of the larger and most successful companies in the pharmaceutical industry would even toy with the idea of joining forces is a measure of the challenges each felt his company faced in discovering and marketing new drugs.  But the timing for a merger wasn't right.  First, Squibb was divesting a major division, then the stock-market crash hurt the companies' shares, and, all the while, Mr. Gelb was recovering from stomach cancer diagnosed in 1986.  Then, at a meeting on June 20, when Mr. Gelb, fit and with the cancer in remission, raised the merger issue again, Mr. Furlaud told him to "put together some numbers."  They met again at Mr. Furlaud's Manhattan apartment on Central Park South on July 14, and within several days, decided to cobble the deal announced Thursday in which Squibb shareholders will receive tax-free stock valued at about $12.1 billion.  As previously reported, Squibb shareholders will receive 2.4 shares of the new Bristol-Myers Squibb Co. for each share of Squibb, which will come from the issuance of 233 million new shares of Bristol-Myers common stock.  The companies said the merger would create the world's second-largest drug company, after Merck & Co.  The deal was done quickly because of the friendship and mutual respect between the two men.  They are the longest reigning top executives in the drug industry, with 38 years of corporate leadership between them.  The two are similar: straight-forward, competitive, athletic, and about the same age.  Mr. Gelb is 65, and Mr. Furlaud is 66.  Over the course of their long talks, each had discovered that the other's company could help solve the vexing problems they both faced in their need to expand rapidly research and marketing operations.  "Everyone calls their own merger a 'perfect fit,'" an ebullient Mr. Furlaud said in a telephone interview over the weekend from his Long Island beach house.  "But this is truly a marriage made in heaven.  There has never been an opportunity like this in the history of the drug industry."  Many in the industry agree.  "I don't think big, per se, is beautiful, but this is a very logical move," said James Burke, chairman and chief executive officer of Johnson & Johnson until earlier this year.  "The new company will be a tough competitor."  Mr. Burke and others are wowed by the price of what is clearly viewed as an acquisition by Bristol-Myers.  "I don't know if the price makes sense, but it's probably what had to be paid to keep other companies out," said Mr. Burke, who remains on the Johnson & Johnson board.  The deal finally came about because Mr. Furlaud realized that his fast-growing company was beset by a troubling paradox.  Squibb's profits were booming on the $1 billion-a-year sales of its heart-disease drug, Capoten, and the company had several exciting cardiovascular drugs in the research pipeline.  But to maintain its growth, the company would have to bring out the new medicines quickly and to invest heavily in areas of basic research, such as molecular biology and brain chemistry, where it had little expertise.  Squibb executives figured the company would have to increase personnel in research, development and marketing by 22% to 22,000 in five years.  At the same time, Squibb had to keep up its profits and stock price if it were to fend off an unwanted takeover.  Squibb was an attractive target for a foreign drug maker seeking a U.S. presence.  In the months before the June meeting, Mr. Furlaud saw evidence that Squibb's challenges were becoming more daunting.  Squibb had been looking unsuccessfully for a suitable company to acquire to bolster its operations.  Also, several competitors had set up deals to market prescription drugs for sale to consumers, an area Mr. Furlaud knew would become increasingly important, but one in which Squibb has no presence.  Bristol-Myers is one of the country's biggest sellers of consumer-health products.  Discussions with Squibb's top researchers "made me realize the extraordinary investment we had to make in basic biomedical research to keep abreast breaking science," Mr. Furlaud said.  He said advances in genetics, nervous-system studies and immunology are racing ahead of many companies' ability to keep pace.  Mr. Gelb, meanwhile, was increasingly interested in Squibb's strong lineup of cardiovascular drugs in development.  In early 1986, he asked James Robinson, chairman and chief executive officer at American Express Co., to set up a meeting with Mr. Furlaud.  Mr. Robinson is on Bristol's board, and Mr. Furlaud serves on the American Express board.  Bristol-Myers was also in a transition.  The company is slow-growing, but it's a solid performer, cash-rich from sales of consumer goods such as baby formula, Bufferin aspirin and Clairol hair products.  In the 1970s, the company became the country's premier marketer of cancer drugs, but other research was unimpressive.  In the early 1980s Mr. Gelb pushed through a major program to beef up research.  Analysts give Bristol-Myers credit for producing a stream of experimental drugs for Alzheimer's disease, senility, stroke and learning problems.  But no big-selling drug is expected to emerge from Bristol-Myers labs soon, and the company's marketers were hungry for new products.  Bristol-Myers is especially interested in Squibb's experimental drug Pravachol, an anti-cholesterol medicine, which analysts believe could be a $1 billion-a-year product.  Bristol-Myers' anti-cholesterol drug Questran is well-known to doctors, but it's being overtaken by Merck's Meavcor.  Expected sales from Pravachol and several other heart-disease, anti-viral and dermatological drugs, are expected to give Bristol-Myers the bridge it needs until its own research pans out.  The companies also believe that when they are combined, the companies' various labs will enjoy a critical mass necessary for cross-breeding ideas.  "A lead in cancer research can produce an important anti-viral drug if you have breadth of research," Mr. Furlaud said.  "The merger gives us that."  Meshing the research and marketing operations will be Mr. Furlaud's job as president of the new company.  Messrs.  Gelb and Furlaud are near retirement, but both said they will stay on four or five years to oversee the merger.  Colleagues say the two have a good chance of pulling off the merger since both men built their companies over the past 20 years with acquisitions.  Mutual friends say the men were attracted to each other due to their similar values.  "The two Dicks are wonderfully warm people, genuinely kind men," said John D. Macomber, a Bristol-Myers director until recently.  But industry people say the two men are tough adversaries.  Insiders said Mr. Gelb was especially gratified to win over Mr. Furlaud since several other companies were also wooing the Squibb chairman.  Indeed, the two men appreciate each other's competitiveness.  Mr. Gelb tried out for the javelin event in the 1948 Olympics, and he won the Bing Crosby Pro-Am Golf Tournament in 1978.  He said he is proudest of his fight against cancer.  "I missed my May {1986} board meeting, and I didn't miss another after that," he said.  Analysts said they expect the two men to step aside in 12 months to 18 months if the merger goes smoothly.  The deal, for instance, makes Mr. Furlaud a rich man on paper.  His 250,000 shares of Squibb common will be worth more than $27 million at the current market price.  Several men are expected to compete for the new company's top spot.  Squibb's president Jan Leshley, 47 years old, and Bristol-Myers's senior vice president Wayne Davidson, 57, are thought to have the inside track since each run his company's drug operations.  Other possibilities include Bristol-Myers' other senior vice president, Charles Heimbold, 55, and Kenneth Weg, 52, Squibb's vice president of international operations and a former Bristol-Myers executive.  Now on a roll, highflying cable entrepreneur Ted Turner has been publicizing a turnaround at Turner Broadcasting, which nearly sank a couple of years ago after buying MGM/UA.  Mr. Turner even is touting Turner Broadcasting stock on the company's popular Cable News Network: A giant chart shows the stock shooting higher and higher.  Although the company's cable operations are going gangbusters, its finances are still shaky.  It has a big task ahead -- to refinance $1.3 billion of long-term debt.  Investors say Mr. Turner should strike while he's hot.  A refinancing will come "as and when our objectives can be met," says Chris Becken, Turner Broadcasting's treasurer.  Like many fast-growing issuers of high-yield junk bonds, Turner Broadcasting has lived hand-to-mouth.  It has a black hole where shareholders' equity should be, and a jerry-built debt structure that regularly must be rejiggered.  In the next few years, 60% of its debt falls due.  Turner Broadcasting's debt, with big payments due every couple of years, offers insight into the junk-bond world.  It shows how risky borrowers get squeezed and must regularly return to investors, asking to swap older securities for new ones.  If business is bad, investors pull the plug; if it's good, borrowers get better terms.  "Financial restructuring . . . will continue to be a key element of the Turner fundamental outlook," says Drexel Burnham Lambert, the company's longtime adviser, in a recent bullish report on Turner Broadcasting.  Drexel probably will orchestrate the refinancing.  Many Turner Broadcasting securities are time bombs, set to explode in 1991 and 1993.  If they aren't paid or swapped for other securities, they could jeopardize the company's turnaround.  These include securities whose interest rate gets jacked up automatically over time to exorbitant levels.  In 1988, CNN issued $150 million of preferred shares that carry an annual 11.5% dividend.  But in 1991, the dividend rate vaults to 21.5% annually.  CNN's preferreds don't pay cash dividends but accrue them, so the total amount owed rises to $215 million by 1991.  Then, in 1993, $800 million of Turner Broadcasting's junk falls due.  This sum also must be paid or refinanced.  In addition, the company issued junk with a 14% coupon that might be swapped for other securities, investors say.  The bonds are costly, and they and other loans have covenants that limit cash dividends.  The company has to issue common shares every year to pay dividends on some Turner Broadcasting preferred issues.  Right now, Turner Broadcasting isn't under the gun.  It can pay its 1990 bond maturity of $110 million with asset sales and temporary bank borrowings.  Last December, it got its first sizable credit line from commercial banks.  But the company needs to cut financing costs and extend debt payments by issuing convertible securities or new junk bonds, investors say.  With Mr. Turner riding high, they think he could also get longer-term bank loans, which are cheaper than junk bonds.  From 1988's low of 7 1/2, Turner Broadcasting's more actively traded Class B common shares have zoomed to 46 7/8 Friday.  The company's junk bonds have rallied, knocking their yields down to around 11.50%, from more than 13%.  Mr. Turner's stake in the company now is valued at about $1.6 billion.  He has 43% of the common shares and some 60% of the votes.  The Class A shares have five times the voting power of the Class B shares.  Mr. Turner is cashing in about a million of his Turner Broadcasting shares, analysts say, to pay for a ranch in Montana.  The executive wasn't available for comment.  Mr. Turner has a good story to tell.  The company's new TNT entertainment network is a big hit.  CNN and the WTBS "superstation" both earn more from operations than the ABC and CBS television networks combined, says Dennis Leibowitz, a Donaldson Lufkin & Jenrette analyst.  Ed Joyce, former CBS News president, thinks CNN, which is expanding overseas, could become a news-gathering powerhouse like Reuters.  After years of red ink, Turner Broadcasting will soon report a net profit for its second quarter ended June 30.  And it predicts 1989 earnings from operations of roughly $200 million.  In some past years, investors doubted it would survive.  Now, "If you're talking about valuable scarce assets in media, Turner represents one of the best remaining independent companies," says Karen Firestone of Fidelity Investments, a longtime Turner Broadcasting shareholder.  Critics say "increasing-rate" paper such as CNN's preferreds is an investment banker's delight because it must be refinanced, creating fees for Wall Street firms.  CNN issued preferred shares to pay older Turner Broadcasting increasing-rate notes; their interest rate topped 17% by the time they were paid.  Drexel won't comment.  But Turner Broadcasting's Mr. Becken says CNN's preferreds provided equity and saved the company money, because they don't require cash dividend payments.  Turner Broadcasting paper wasn't popular after 1986, when it paid $1.3 billion for MGM/UA and its film library.  "It was a big undertaking for a company our size," Mr. Becken says.  At the company's recent annual meeting, Mr. Turner indicated he might make acquisitions.  While Mr. Becken says there's nothing on the horizon, it would make sense to add another cable network or film library, says analyst Mr. Leibowitz.  Some investors think Mr. Turner might like to buy the 43% Turner Broadcasting stake held by cable operators who in 1987 bailed the company out of trouble.  These heavyweight investors, including Tele-Communications and newly merged Time Warner, earlier this year stopped Mr. Turner from buying Financial News Network.  Time Warner has indicated its 17% Turner Broadcasting stake, which it values at $650 million, could be sold, though analysts think that's unlikely.  Tele-Communications has first call on Time Warner's holding but won't say if it would buy it -- or sell its own stake back to Turner Broadcasting.  "Our primary objective is to maintain a strong Turner company that's capable of producing quality cable programming," says Bob Thomson, a Tele-Communications executive.  Fidelity's Ms. Firestone says she won't sell Turner Broadcasting shares despite their run-up.  She thinks the company might fetch a fortune in a takeover.  Some investors think Turner Broadcasting one day might be swallowed by a media giant.  If Mr. Turner stumbles in the international arena, says Mr. Joyce, the former CBS executive, Rupert Murdoch of News Corp. might step in.  ---  Turner Broadcasting  (AMEX; Symbol: TBSB)  Business: Cable TV  Year ended Dec. 31, 1988:  Revenue: $806.6 million  Net loss: $94.5 million  First quarter, March 31, 1989:  Net loss: $421,000* vs. $14.1 million  Average daily trading volume:  12,718 Class B shares  Class B shares outstanding: 24.2 million  *Includes a $3.1 million gain on sale of land.  Wiggin & Dana, the biggest law firm in town, wants someone new to invest its $2.5 million profit-sharing fund.  James P. Owen of NWQ Investment Management Inc. is getting first crack at landing the job, but he rates his chances as mixed.  "These guys are Harvard and Yale conservative," Mr. Owen says just before making his sales pitch to the lawyers.  "I grew up in Kentucky, and I have a Southern twang.  I have on a Bijan suit that they'll hate, and I'm from an LA firm, which to these guys is la-la land.  So we'll see."  In the fiercely competitive world of money management -- where few managers outshine the pack for long -- salesmanship, clothes, accents and patter can tip the balance between landing and losing an account.  Enter Mr. Owen: a "rainmaker," one of a breed of polished salesmen who drum up accounts for money management firms.  "The business of money management is not managing other people's money; it's the business of getting other people's money to manage," says money management consultant Budge Collins.  George Hambrecht, another industry consultant, says, "It's gotten to the point to where the marketing is up to 75% of the business equation."  Highly successful money managers have doubled as polished salesmen for a long time.  Witness John Templeton and David Dreman, among others.  But such combination investment-and-marketing gurus are rare; many top stock and bond pickers loathe having to become involved in selling their services, and are happy to turn over the chore to professional salesmen.  Salesmen such as NWQ's Mr. Owen.  After stints in advertising and several securities firms, Mr. Owen took his big career gamble in 1982 by joining fledgling NWQ, formed a few months earlier by two insurance company portfolio managers. (The firm's name comes from "northwest quadrant," jargon in the investment management business for firms producing high returns with low risk.) The gamble proved a winner.  NWQ has ballooned from less than $100 million under management to $2 billion today.  Well-known in the industry for a soft-spoken though persistent sales approach, Mr. Owen is credited with putting NWQ on the map.  NWQ's investment record has been good, but "without marketing, the firm today would be about half its size," says David A. Polak, NWQ's founding partner and investment head.  For his efforts, which also include keeping current clients informed and happy, the 48-year-old Mr. Owen earns nearly $2 million a year.  That allows him to indulge what he calls his one "vanity" -- shopping regularly at the New York and Beverly Hills branches of Bijan, a reservations-only clothing boutique where ties are priced at $175 and coats run $2,000.  Mr. Owen has little direct role in the investment process.  He usually visits NWQ's Los Angeles office one day a month, though he talks by phone daily with Mr. Polak, the investment head.  Mr. Owen operates out of his Denver home to cut flying time to reach scattered sales prospects.  He enjoys his independence.  "It would have never worked if I was in LA," he says.  "I'm a loner, not a team player."  Mr. Owen is religious about cultivating the media.  Several reporters at this newspaper, for instance, have quoted him frequently over the years.  He has just written a book about his investment ideas.  And he is tickled to have his house, decorated by his wife, Stanya, an avid antique collector, featured on the cover of a recent Colorado lifestyles magazine.  "If you let me get my foot in the door," he says, "I'll get further than any other guy could.  I always wanted to be at the rainmaker level.  That's what I am: I'm a rainmaker."  His success at NWQ wasn't instant.  At first, he targeted 25 big corporate pension funds he thought promising clients.  But only a lucky few managers get their phone calls answered, much less see the inside of a pension fund executive's office.  Six months of effort landed Mr. Owen a handful of interviews, but no business.  His worst moment came during a presentation to Robert Evans, head of Xerox Corp.'s big pension plan.  Mr. Owen was in mid-sentence when Mr. Evans fell asleep.  "I tiptoed out of the room so as not to wake him up," says Mr. Owen.  "Right then, I said there has to be a better way." (Mr.  Evans recalls meeting Mr. Owen, though he is not sure about the nap.  "Maybe I dozed off.  I don't know," he says through a Xerox spokesman.)  Mr. Owen decided to aim at pools of money between $1 million and $100 million -- often considered not worth the trouble by big-time investment advisers.  NWQ's conservative investment style -- avoiding stocks that swing sharply in price and sometimes shunning stocks for bonds -- clicked with this group.  "Jim found a whole market for us we didn't know was there," says E.C. "Ted" Friedel, another NWQ partner.  In New Haven, Mr. Owen, sitting ramrod straight, makes his pitch before five Wiggin & Dana partners around a conference table.  It's one of about 100 formal sales presentations he will make to prospective clients each year, and one of thousands that competitors at the other 1,500 or so big-time U.S. money managers make annually to pension funds, endowments and, increasingly, to wealthy individuals.  Mr. Owen got his foot in the door at Wiggin & Dana with an introduction from Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. broker Martin DeGennaro.  The law firm is one of Mr. DeGennaro's best clients, not only for the money the lawyers have to invest directly, but for their New Haven contacts. ("There is a lot of old trust money here, and these guys can get you to that as well as anybody," the Shearson broker says.  "In fact, they are the only way to get to it.")  But the partners were unhappy with how their profit-sharing money was doing under a Shearson in-house portfolio manager, and other investment firms caught the scent.  "I knew I had to get on my horse because they are bringing in Merrill Lynch to do a comparative performance evaluation," Mr. DeGennaro says.  Thus the call to Mr. Owen, who often gets leads on sales prospects from stockbrokers serving as "consultants" for clients seeking independent money managers.  For introducing the client and monitoring the account, the broker-consultant shares part of the money management fee or some of the trading commissions generated by the account.  Mr. Owen stresses his firm's conservative investment philosophy and its devotion to client service.  He drops in several references to Gibson, Dunn & Crutcher, a big law firm in California that is a NWQ client, winning nods of recognition.  The session ends without commitments, but there is talk of a follow-up meeting, the best that Mr. Owen had hoped for.  "Your presentation went very well," Mr. DeGennaro tells Mr. Owen in the elevator.  "I know these guys well enough to know."  Mr. Owen is skeptical.  "That's tough work," he says out of earshot of Mr. DeGennaro.  Asked his chances of landing the lawyers' business, Mr. Owen says, "I wouldn't rate the probabilities too high."  Mr. Owen is more upbeat about his next presentation -- to New York accountant Charles J. Brucia, whose clients include show-business executives and rock stars with sky-rocketing incomes.  "Clients listen to their lawyers, but they obey their accountants," observes Pittsford, N.Y., money manager Geoffrey Rosenberger.  "They're in the entertainment business, so there's a connection with LA," Mr. Owen says before meeting Mr. Brucia.  Among NWQ's biggest clients are the pension plans of the Directors Guild of America (for whom NWQ manages $118 million) and the Motion Picture Industry ($97 million), which Mr. Owen says he will make a point of mentioning.  NWQ's conservative investment style strikes a responsive chord with Mr. Brucia, who says he is most comfortable with investing in risk-free Treasury securities.  "Most of my clients are nouveau riches who are scared to death" of losing their capital through bad investments, the accountant explains.  Mr. Owen, relaxed on a couch in Mr. Brucia's office with a foot propped on a glass coffee table, pounds home the safety theme.  The real question, he says, is this: "Do you want spectacular performance, or do you want consistent performance?  No manager can do both."  Mr. Owen makes no promises. ("The mistake that most guys make in this business is that they sell a product that they know they can't deliver," he says later.) But he suggests that NWQ should produce annual returns averaging 12% or more over two or three years.  On the street below the accountant's office, Mr. Owen gushes about how receptive Mr. Brucia was.  "I'd be very surprised if we didn't do business with that guy," he says.  Mr. Brucia, however, isn't so sure.  "He was pretty nice, but there are other money manager types that had a lot more to offer than he did," he says.  The accountant adds that he might recommend Mr. Owen "if we get a client that fits his makeup."  As for the Wiggin & Dana account, the jury is still out on the law firm's choice of a new manager.  "He hasn't been eliminated," Wiggin & Dana partner John Barnett says of Mr. Owen.  The firm has interviewed other candidates, and plans to see still more before reaching a decision.  Mr. Owen is philosophical about it all.  Closing a sale can take several weeks or months, he notes.  Another call is expected to net a $10 million account.  "We didn't get to $2 billion by always striking out," he says confidently.  The New York Stock Exchange listed shares of three companies recently.  Smith Corona Corp., a New Canaan, Conn., maker of typewriters and word processor, started trading with the symbol SCO.  It was spun off from Hanson PLC, which retains a 47.9% interest.  Vivra Inc., San Francisco, started trading under V.  The provider of dialysis services and home nursing was spun off from Community Psychiatric Centers.  Hyperion Total Return Fund Inc., a New York closed-end management investment company that invests in mortgage-backed securities, started trading with the symbol HTR following its initial public offering.  One company will began trading on the American Stock Exchange recently.  Biomagnetic Technologies Inc., San Diego, listed shares under BMT after its initial public offering.  The medical diagnostic research and development company makes biomagnetic imaging systems.  Four companies began trading on the National Association of Securities Dealers' national market system recently.  GZA GeoEnvironmental Technologies Inc., Newton Upper Falls, Mass., started OTC trading with the symbol GZEA.  It provides environmental consulting, remediation and geotechnical services.  Lechters Inc., a Harrison, N.J., specialty retailer, started trading under LECH.  Prime Bancshares Inc., a Decatur, Ga., bank holding company, started trading shares with the symbol PMBS.  Vanguard Real Estate Fund I, a Valley Forge, Pa., real estate investment trust, started trading with the symbol VREOS.  The stock market is skyrocketing, with major stock indexes near or at their alltime highs.  But is there enough fuel to keep prices rising?  Last week, Standard & Poor's 500-stock index set an all-time record, and the Dow Jones Industrial Average, which closed Friday at 2635.24, is less than 100 points shy of its Aug. 25, 1987, record close of 2722.42.  Investors still have vivid memories of what happened the last time prices were this high: The speculative fever that had propelled prices up through the summer of 1987 waned, setting the stage for a two-month decline that climaxed in the October 1987 stock market crash.  But this rally is different.  The rally that began in mid-November last year hasn't shown any signs of the speculation that gripped the stock market in the summer of 1987.  Many investors have been continually surprised as stock prices have steadily worked their way higher, overcoming the worries afflicting the nation's economy since late last year: inflation, high interest rates, slower earnings growth, and now the threat of recession.  And several analysts say there is plenty of fuel left to propel prices higher.  That fuel is liquidity, or the availability of money that can be directed into the stock market.  The equation can be disarmingly simple.  "It's pure supply and demand," says George D. Adler, director of portfolio management at Banc One Asset Management Corp.  "As long as money flows into the market, prices are going to keep going up."  Among the biggest sources of money for stock investment are U.S. institutions and foreign investors.  They have played a big role in driving prices to their current levels, and some analysts think there's plenty more cash left in their hands that is yet to come into the market.  "My sense is that portfolio managers are sitting with higher cash levels than they like as the market is moving higher," says Kenneth Spence, director of the technical analysis group at Salomon Brothers.  "This excess liquidity is what is holding the market up and is also the thing that will continue to push the market higher."  There is some debate about precisely who will really be supplying the cash needed to move the market higher.  John Connolly, chief portfolio strategist at Dean Witter Reynolds, argues that while institutional cash was an important factor earlier this year, right now the estimated 6.4% of institutional holdings in cash is at the low end of the scale; he says the figure is more neutral than bullish.  And foreign purchases of U.S. stocks, boosted by a stronger dollar in the second quarter of this year, are likely to slow, too, as uncertainties grow about the dollar's direction, he says.  Lest he be accused of bearishness, however, Mr. Connolly points to other sources of cash.  For one thing, he expects corporate takeovers and buy-outs to continue and even increase in the second half of 1989.  As the takeovers proceed, they reduce the amount of stock left in the market for investors to buy.  Although there is some debate about whether the shrinking supply of stock has a big effect on prices, many analysts think it does.  Then there's the much lamented individual investor, the guy who was so spooked by the 1987 crash that he has had little to do with stocks in the past two years.  "Individual investors have tons of cash," says Mr. Connolly; he predicts that as yields on other investments decline in coming months, the temptation to return to the stock market will grow.  He notes, for instance, that with the average yield on 381 taxable money market mutual funds tracked by Donoghue's Money Fund Report slipping below 9% last week, some of that money is destined for stocks.  "That attracts headlines in the press, and while individuals may not notice it, brokers will," says Mr. Connolly.  "It becomes a talking point for brokers to get our clients to do the right thing."  Even if there is plenty of cash to fuel further price increases, there are growing concerns about where that cash is going as it comes into the stock market.  Analysts are worried that the stock market's advance is unbalanced; recession-sensitive stocks are lagging behind, while stocks that are considered best able to weather an economic downturn are spurting ahead.  "The danger is that the market will become too narrow and people will be playing too few stocks," says Mr. Connolly.  "Those stocks would be in danger of becoming overvalued."  That's already happening, says Scott Black, president of Delphi Management in Boston.  He contends that with the average stock in the S&P 500 selling at 13.3 times earnings, high-grade industrial bonds yielding 9% are a safer bet.  And he is particularly wary of much-favored consumer and financial stocks that investors are buying to hedge the risk of a recession.  "They're all selling at price-earnings ratios of 14 to 20," he complains.  "People are buying them no matter what the cost.  There just aren't any bargains anymore."  Not to worry, says Salomon's Mr. Spence.  While cyclical and technology stocks are being left behind as the stock market rally proceeds, he says the outlook for consumer and financial stocks remains bright.  "You can't look at this market as a monolith," he says.  "If you're playing in the right sectors, you've done well, and the fundamentals remain quite good."  ---  Friday's Market Activity  A round of late profit-taking quashed a midmorning rally, and stocks closed unchanged to a little higher.  The Dow Jones Industrial average fell 0.19 to 2635.24.  But broader averages showed a slight gain.  The Standard & Poor's 500-stock index rose 0.16 to 342.15, and the New York Stock Exchange composite index gained 0.16 to 190.38.  The Dow Jones Equity Market index of about 700 stocks rose 0.46 to 321.06.  All three indexes closed at all-time highs.  Volume on the New York Stock Exchange was heavy at 180,610,000 shares.  Advancers outpaced decliners, 819-679.  For the week, the industrial average recorded its fourth consecutive gain by rising 27.88 points, or 1.1%, but it trailed the broader averages substantially.  The S&P 500 and the equity market index each climbed 1.9% for the week, while the New York Stock Exchange composite rose 1.7%.  Among stocks in the industrial average, Merck fell 1 5/8 to 76 1/4, Philip Morris slipped 2 to 155, and Coca-Cola eased 5/8 to 63 1/2.  These losses offset gains in Woolworth , for example, which rose 2 1/8 to 59 1/4.  Woolworth was among the session's rumored takeover candidates, as was K mart, which rose 1 1/4 to 40 3/8 on 1.8 million shares.  Elsewhere in the retailing sector, Gap jumped 2 3/8 to 46 1/4.  Morgan Stanley repeated a buy recommendation on the stock, while Drexel Burnham Lambert launched coverage of the company with a buy rating.  Auto stocks dropped after Chrysler disclosed plans for a $1 billion cost-cutting program amid signs that the industry is struggling because of slowing sales and overcapacity.  Chrysler dropped 1 to 23 7/8, General Motors fell 1/2 to 44 5/8, and Ford Motor slid 1/2 to 49 5/8.  Chase Manhattan rose 1/4 to 38 7/8 as trading tied to the bank holding company's future dividend payment swelled its composite volume to four million shares.  Kidder Peabody reiterated its buy recommendation on the stock; banking analyst Charles Peabody told Dow Jones Professional Investor Report the company appears vulnerable to a takeover if its earnings don't improve.  Kidder also reiterated its recommendation to buy Bankers Trust, which rose 5/8 to 53 3/8.  Among other bank issues, Citicorp rose 1 1/8 to 33 1/8, Manufacturers Hanover gained 3/4 to 42, J.P. Morgan went up 3/4 to 39 7/8, and First Chicago gained 5/8 to 45 1/2.  Merrill Lynch rose 3/4 to 34 1/2 on 2.4 million shares as buyers snapped up brokerage stocks, which stand to benefit from a recent increase in stock trading volume.  PaineWebber Group added 3/8 to 22 1/4, Salomon firmed 3/8 to 26 7/8, Morgan Stanley Group gained 5/8 to 71 1/8, and Shearson Lehman Hutton Holdings advanced 3/4 to 22 1/2.  Squibb, which soared 24 3/4 Thursday on news that Bristol-Myers will acquire the company in an $11.5 billion stock swap, retreated 2 1/8 to 110 3/8 as 3.6 million shares changed hands.  Bristol-Myers dropped 1 1/4 to 48 1/4 after losing 2 3/8 in the previous session; the stock was the Big Board's most active, as six million shares were traded.  Other drug stocks rallied for a second day on speculation about the next takeover target.  Schering-Plough rose 1 7/8 to 77, Pfizer went up 1 1/4 to 65, Upjohn gained 1 5/8 to 34 5/8, Rorer Group rose 3/8 to 41 5/8, Syntex advanced 1/2 to 50 1/2, and Erbamont jumped 2 3/4 to 31 1/8.  The American Stock Exchange Index fell 0.84 to 374.51, leaving it with a 0.9% gain for the week.  Volume was 13,180,000 shares, compared with 14,790,000 shares Thursday.  There were 281 issues advancing, 296 declining and 258 unchanged.  Lever Bros., a subsidiary of Unilever N.V. of Rotterdam, The Netherlands, filed a trademark infringement suit in federal court in Los Angeles against Kraft Inc., claiming that the label and name of Kraft's new "Crockery" cheese spread is too similar to its own "Shedd's Country Crock" product.  Lever Bros., of New York, is seeking a court injunction that would prevent Glenview, Ill.-based Kraft from using packaging similar to Lever Bros.' product, or any label likely to confuse consumers.  Both "Shedd's Country Crock" and "Crockery" come in tan tubs.  The suit seeks unspecified damages, both compensatory and punitive.  Lever Bros. first introduced a vegetable-oil butter substitute in 1982 and later expanded into cheese spreads in 1987.  Airbus Industrie said it has received firm orders worth up to $1.32 billion for 28 of its A-321 commercial jets from the Italian airline Alitalia and the Spanish carrier Iberia.  Alitalia also has taken options on a further 20 of the jetliners, stretched versions of the European consortium's A-320 short-to-medium distance aircraft.  The first A-321s are scheduled to fly in 1994.  Iberia also has converted seven of its options for A-320 jets into firm orders, Airbus said.  Airbus said the eight A-321s ordered by Iberia cost a total of $360 million, or about $45 million a plane.  It declined to value Alitalia's order, but taking the figure of $48 million that industry sources say is the asking price of an A-321, it would be worth $960 million.  Airbus said the latest orders bring the total to 60 firm orders for the A-321 and 25 options.  The consortium previously said it would need 40 firm orders for the A-321 before launching construction.  Airbus is a consortium of Aerospatiale of France, Messerschmitt-Boelkow-Blohm G.m.b.H. of West Germany, British Aerospace PLC and Construcciones Aeronauticas S.A. of Spain.  J.H. Whitney & Co., New York, said its DR Acquisition Corp. unit extended its $21.50-a-share offer to buy as many as 49.5 million shares of Prime Computer Inc. to this Friday.  The offer had been set to expire last Friday, but earlier in the week, J.H. Whitney, an investment firm, announced that its main bankers had ordered it to find additional financing in the face of a $19 million second-quarter loss by Natick, Mass.based Prime.  Russell Planitzer, a Whitney partner, said talks with the banks are "ongoing."  Whitney also said it has been sued in federal court in Chicago by Grace Brothers Ltd., a Prime debenture holder, over the terms of delivery of shares.  Holders of Prime's 5 3/4% convertible debentures will receive a semiannual interest payment on the debentures tomorrow.  But that doesn't give them enough time to convert the notes to stock and then tender the shares.  Whitney said it believes the suit is "without merit."  Prime Computer shares closed Friday at $16.75, up 50 cents, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  MERGER APPROVAL: Shareholders of Satellite Music Network Inc., a Dallas-based syndicator of radio formats, approved a merger with Capital Cities/ABC Inc. for $5.60 a share, about $48.2 million.  Capital Cities had owned a 14% stake.  The following issues were recently filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission:  AAR Corp., shelf offering of up to $100 million of debt securities on terms to be set at the time of sale, via Goldman, Sachs & Co. and William Blair & Co.  Conner Peripherals Inc., proposed offering of 6.3 million common shares, of which, four million shares will be sold by the company and 2.3 million shares will be sold by holders, including one million shares to be sold by Compaq Computer Corp. Also, of the total, five million shares will be offered in the U.S. via Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., Montgomery Securities and Unterberg Harris De Santis.  And 1.3 million shares will be sold internationally via Shearson Lehman Brothers International, Montgomery Securities and Unterberg Harris De Santis.  E.I. Du Pont de Nemours & Co., shelf offering of up to $1 billion of debt securities on terms to be set at the time of sale.  Underwriters may include First Boston Corp., Morgan Stanley & Co. and Goldman Sachs.  Imreg Inc., proposed rights offering, in which, the company will give holders of its Class A shares one right for each Class A share held.  The rights will be exercisable for one unit which will consist of one Class A share and one warrant to purchase an additional Class A share.  Jacobs Engineering Group Inc., offering of $35 million of convertible debentures, via Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co.  Vencor Inc., proposed offering of 1.2 million common shares, of which, 1.1 million shares will be sold by the company and 100,000 shares will be sold by holders, via J.C. Bradford & Co. and Hambrecht & Quist Inc.  Ryder System Inc., Miami, said its board amended the transportation and business services company's share-purchase rights plan to strengthen its shield against potential hostile takeover bids.  Under a new Florida law, Ryder lowered to 10% from 20% the level of shares needed to trigger its so-called poison pill defense; now, if an unwanted bidder acquires at least 10% of Ryder's shares outstanding, holders other than the suitor could buy shares at half-price.  The law "offered us an opportunity to add protection for our stockholders against the particularly abusive tactic of open-market accumulation, which would threaten to usurp the company's long-term value," M. Anthony Burns, chairman and chief executive officer, said, adding that the rights plan "will not prevent a takeover."  Ryder has recently become the target of increasing speculation.  But a spokesman said Friday's move wasn't a response to any anticipated takeover action.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading Friday, Ryder common shares closed at $26.875, down 37.5 cents.  Sprague Technologies Inc., Stamford, Conn., said it is taking a $32 million charge for the second quarter, reflecting divestitures of its unprofitable filters and magnetics unit and ceramic capacitor businesses.  The write-down caused the electronic parts maker to post a net loss of $35.1 million, compared with net income of $5.2 million, or 28 cents a share, the year earlier.  Sales fell 7.2% to $118.7 million from $127.9 million.The 1989 results include $7.3 million in sales of its capacitor operations, which were considered discontinued operations a year earlier.  Both divestitures, which in the second quarter accounted for about $2.7 million of losses and about $11.9 million of sales, will allow it to focus on four core businesses: tantalum and aluminum capacitors, thick film networks and semiconductors.  Those areas represent about 90% of Sprague's $520 million in annual sales.  Sprague has agreed to sell the filter and magnetics unit to Bel Fuse Inc., a Jersey City, N.J., maker of electronic components.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Sprague also plans to sell its ceramics business.  A federal bankruptcy judge ruled that the estate of financier Marvin Warner must be liquidated to settle an estimated $4.5 billion in claims against him.  Judge George L. Proctor switched the case Friday to a Chapter 7 filing under the U.S. Bankruptcy Code from Chapter 11.  While Chapter 11 allows an individual to develop a plan to handle his debts, Chapter 7 calls for liquidation of property and distribution of proceeds to creditors.  The judge also appointed a trustee to take charge of Mr. Warner's estate.  Neither Mr. Warner nor his attorneys could be reached for comment.  Mr. Warner, a former U.S. ambassador to Switzerland, filed for bankruptcy in October 1987 to deal with a massive number of lawsuits that had been filed against him.  Those suits resulted from the collapse of Fort Lauderdale, Fla.-based E.S.M. Government Securities Inc., which was shut down in a fraud case in 1985.  Its closing prompted the failure of Mr. Warner's Home State Savings Bank, a Cincinnati-based thrift, which triggered a run on other Ohio thrifts and the temporary closing of about 70 of them.  In 1987, Mr. Warner was convicted of six counts of unauthorized acts in connection with investments that Home State made through E.S.M.  His case is on appeal.  Judge Proctor's ruling came after Mr. Warner, who had failed to get creditors' support for a proposed reorganization plan, withdrew the plan from court.  James Post, an attorney for the unsecured creditors, said the judge's decision will allow the case to move ahead after two years of delays.  Mr. Warner said in his filing that he has assets of about $3 million.  But creditors are seeking to force him to include in the bankruptcy an additional $30 million of assets that he transferred shortly before filing for bankruptcy.  Moto Photo Inc., Dayton, Ohio, said its board has voted to extend the exercise period of its common stock purchase warrants through Nov. 25, 1990.  The warrants, originally scheduled to expire Nov. 25, 1989, are exercisable at $4.25 a share.  They were originally issued in November 1985 in connection with a public offering of units consisting of one share of $1.20 cumulative convertible preferred stock and two common stock purchase warrants.  The franchiser and owner of one-hour photo processing services said the extension is designed to give warrant holders more opportunity to exercise their warrants.  South Korea partially lifted a ban on purchases of foreign real estate.  The Finance Ministry announced that South Korean companies and individuals will be allowed to invest in overseas property for business purposes starting early in August.  As examples of purchases that will be allowed, an official listed hotels, parking lots, sports facilities, laundries, gas stations, supermarkets, research institutes, training facilities, forests, employee welfare facilities and cultivated land.  Purchases of foreign real estate, such as rental houses, for non-business or speculative purposes will remain prohibited.  All transactions must be reported to the Bank of Korea and those that are in excess of $2 million will require the bank's approval.  The ministry had said in February it would lift all restrictions on overseas real-estate purchases after March 1 because of South Korea's widening trade surplus.  But it later reversed course because the surplus began shrinking.  Bercor Inc., which is operating under Chapter 11 protection, said the bankruptcy court approved a reorganization plan for the maker and distributor of consumer products.  The proposal calls for Bercor's Craig Consumer Electronics unit to be sold at a base price of about $6.3 million to Berel Industries Inc., a newly formed company.  Berel will be 68% owned by existing Bercor shareholders.  Under Chapter 11 of the Federal Bankruptcy Code, a company operates under protection from creditors' lawsuits while it works out a plan to pay its debts.  Providence Capitol Portfolio Managers Ltd. said it holds a 6.06% stake in India Growth Fund Inc.'s common shares outstanding.  In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, Providence Capitol, a London-based firm engaged in managing portfolio investments for investment clients, said it holds 303,700 India Growth common shares, all bought from Nov. 22, 1988, to July 18, 1989, for $9 to $12.625 a share.  Providence Capitol said the stock of the concern was bought as an investment.  It currently intends to buy as much as an additional 140,000 India Growth common shares from time to time on the open market, the filing said.  Foster Wheeler Corp. said it signed an agreement to build and operate an $84 million waste-to-energy plant for a Knoxville, Tenn., municipal authority.  The plant will process about 900 tons of municipal refuse daily to generate 30 megawatts of electricity, which will power the plant and be sold to utilities.  The plant, financed by the authority, is due to be completed in 1992.  Foster Wheeler designs, manufactures and installs equipment for power plants, oil refineries and other industrial uses.  Why has the rubber agreement succeeded while other commodity producers' accords have failed?  Because it's flexible enough to respond to market forces, officials and rubber traders say.  Since the International Natural Rubber Agreement came into being in 1979, it has faced periods of glut, shortage and now another time of relatively plentiful supplies.  But the pact -- made up of more than 30 producer and consumer nations -- has held up because it set a pragmatic price range that was able to respond to these changing conditions, says Paul Rawkins, a senior economist at Lloyds Bank Ltd.  "The agreement works because member nations haven't tried to peg prices," says Scott Monier, a first secretary in charge of commodities at the U.S. Embassy in London.  The "kiss of death" for any such producers' agreement, Mr. Monier says, is to try to set prices too high.  The rubber agreement adjusts its price range upward or downward in line with market trends, he says.  "Coffee has joined tin and sugar on the scrap heap of dead commodity price-stabilization pacts," says Charles Young, a director of Landell Mills Commodities Studies Ltd. Meanwhile, the most prominent of the producer pacts, the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries, has been struggling for years to come up with a lasting accord among its members on prices and production.  "But the rubber pact hasn't only kept prices within an agreed range; it has made a lot of money for member governments."  The agreement sets a sort of target price for rubber that reflects prices for several types of rubber and is expressed in a blend of Malaysian and Singapore dollars.  When market prices fall 15% below the target level, the manager of the buffer stock can buy rubber; if they decline by 20%, he must buy.  If prices surge by the same percentages, he sells.  During the life of the agreement, U.S. market prices for high-quality RSS1 grade rubber have soared to a peak of $1,625 a metric ton in 1980, dropped to $924 in 1985, surged back to $1,557 in June 1988 and fallen again to around $910.  But despite these roller-coaster movements, rubber quotes have remained within the range set by the agreement.  The buffer stock manager began buying in 1981, Mr. Young of Landell Mills says, when recession and high oil prices eroded demand for tires and rubber.  By 1986, he had accumulated 360,000 metric tons, about 8% of annual world production.  In 1987, prices got a boost not only from a rebound in tire purchases but also from the growing health threat of acquired immune deficiency syndrome that precipitated heavy buying of rubber gloves and condoms.  The buffer stock manager then sold all his supplies, so if prices fall much further now, he will have more than enough funds to buy and stabilize the market, Mr. Young says.  Some dealers say the agreement could fail if a deep recession were to come along and make a serious dent in demand for rubber.  "Agreements only succeed if the supply and demand of the raw material matches members' expectations," a London rubber dealer says.  The tin agreement managed to control prices when demand for the metal was strong, he says.  But when the market turned lower, it was only a matter of time before the International Tin Council's own buffer stock manager ran out of money.  But although demand for rubber has weakened in the past six months, dealers expect the agreement to survive.  For one thing, the agreement more closely controls the buffer stock manager's actions than the tin cartel did, they say.  "Prices have been pitched in line with producers' cost of production," says Michael Belt, managing director of the rubber brokers' concern William James & Henry Thompson Rubber Ltd.  If market conditions worsen, he says, the agreement has the power to lower its price range just as the target range was raised last year when the market was buoyant.  Moreover, a large majority of the world's rubber supplies comes from three members of the pact -- Malaysia, Indonesia and Thailand -- says Prachaya Jumpasat, chief economist at the International Rubber Study Group.  These producers are prepared to adapt to a "realistic" price, he says.  And unlike OPEC and some other commodity cartels, the rubber agreement has leading consumer nations -- including the U.S. and European Community as well as the Soviet Union and China -- among its members.  "The pact has succeeded because we have got the price and members right," Mr. Jumpasat says.  Looking ahead to other commodity markets this week:  Grains and Soybeans  Traders will begin focusing this week on a major crop report due Aug. 10, when the Agriculture Department will release results of its first field survey this season of corn and soybeans.  The report is expected to show a reduction in acreage for both crops from levels indicated in a previous government crop report.  The reduction reflects wet weather that prevented planting in parts of the eastern Corn Belt and the Southeast.  Separately, traders will be watching activity in the August-delivery soybean futures contract on the Chicago Board of Trade.  The process of delivery against that contract begins this week, and many traders are wondering whether Ferruzzi Finanziaria S.p.A.'s dispute with the Board of Trade will erupt into another showdown like the one when the big Italian merchant recently refused to close out its July buying positions and the Board of Trade ordered a liquidation.  Soybean supplies are still scarce as a result of last summer's drought, and Ferruzzi, a major U.S. soybean processor, has accumulated a large buying position on cash and futures markets.  The Board of Trade explained its order by saying that Ferruzzi's position raised the risk of a default on futures contracts.  Energy  As the week begins, petroleum futures traders will be watching closely the relationship between the September and October prices for West Texas Intermediate, the U.S. benchmark crude.  The spread between the two contracts narrowed to only two cents a barrel Friday before ending at four cents, and some traders say the September price may soon fall below October's.  Though analysts and traders admit they're still trying to determine what that means for the market, most say it's generally regarded as a bearish development.  Most market participants are expecting crude prices to continue their losses of the past six sessions, although some say a slight rally is probable, with prices as low as they are.  Debate continued over whether overproduction by the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries is already built into the market and whether crude prices will firm up or continue falling toward $17.50 a barrel.  West Texas Intermediate for September delivery closed at $17.95 Friday.  Angell Real Estate Co. said it is negotiating to purchase as many as 16 health-care partnerships with an appraised value of about $40 million.  Angell, a nursing-home owner, said the assets and liabilities of the partnerships will be acquired with shares of the company's stock.  Angell plans to issue about one million shares of stock to complete the purchases.  Shareholders will vote on the new issue at a special meeting in September.  If all 16 partnerships are acquired, Angell would have 95 homes in its real estate portfolio.  An Australian company will announce plans to manufacture a compact "two-stroke" engine in Michigan that could revolutionize automobiles in the mid-1990s, state officials said.  Details of the project will be announced at a news conference Wednesday morning by Ralph T. Sarich, managing director of Orbital Engine Co. and Gov. James J. Blanchard.  It isn't known whether the factory will initially make boat engines, automobile engines or both, or who Orbital's manufacturing partner will be.  Orbital is a Perth, Australia, research concern.  At least two marine-engine manufacturers have signed licensing agreements to Orbital's engine, as have General Motors Corp. and Ford Motor Co. Also, Japanese auto makers are understood to be conducting all-out research efforts to adapt two-stroke technology to cars.  Two-stroke engines deliver power with one up-and-down cycle of a piston, while conventional four-stroke engines require two up-and-down cycles.  Two-stroke engines are widely used in lawn mowers, but excess fuel emissions have rendered them unsuitable for use in cars and trucks.  Orbital, however, claims to have used electronic engine controls to solve that problem.  Two city of Detroit pension funds said they extended their $9-a-share, or $26.5 million, tender offer for the 83% of Income Opportunity Realty Trust they don't already own until Sept. 1.  The offer was to expire Friday.  The Policemen and Firemen Retirement System and the General Retirement System have been blocked from furthering the tender offer by a San Francisco judge who ruled they may have violated securities laws.  That decision is on appeal.  The funds also have launched a proxy fight to replace the directors on the real estate investment trust's board with eight of their nominees.  The trust's shareholders meeting is scheduled for Aug. 8.  Galesi Group said it is seeking to acquire Lone Star Technologies Inc.'s stake in American Federal Bank for $58 million.  American Federal is an amalgam of 12 insolvent Texas savings and loans pieced together last year as part of the so-called Southwest Plan to consolidate troubled thrifts in the region.  Lone Star Technologies invested $48 million in the investment group that acquired American Federal.  Since then, however, Lone Star has endured a series of setbacks, including a $40.2 million loss in 1988, the bankruptcy-court filing of its East Texas Steel Facilities Inc. subsidiary and the news that its chairman and chief executive officer, Howard Beasley III, was suffering from cancer.  Galesi Group said that it has twice offered to buy American Federal.  Lone Star's board rejected a July 12 bid, which Galesi resubmitted Friday.  In its news release, Francesco Galesi, chairman of the closely held company, said he renewed the bid in order to present its merits directly to the Lone Star board.  Acceptance of the offer, he said, would benefit both American Federal and, indirectly, East Texas Steel, by "eliminating questions about the viability of American Federal's holding company."  Officials of Galesi and Lone Star Technologies couldn't be reached for comment.  Galesi Group has interests in distribution, industrial parks, manufacturing, real estate, satellite-telecommunications and services.  Besides its interest in American Federal, Dallas-based Lone Star owns steel and industrial-services companies.  American Multi-Cinema Inc. filed an antitrust lawsuit in Los Angeles federal court against Mann Theatres and Columbia Pictures Industries Inc., alleging that Mann and Columbia "conspired" to give Mann's theatres an edge in exhibiting certain Columbia films.  Closely held Mann, a unit of Los Angeles-based Cineamerica Theatres Limited Partnership, owns several theatres in the Westwood neighborhood of Los Angeles; American Multi-Cinema owns theatres in the nearby neighborhood of Century City.  In the lawsuit, American Multi-Cinema alleges Mann demanded that Columbia require "unreasonable, discriminatory and unlawful clearances" for American Multi-Cinema to exhibit certain Columbia films.  American Multi-Cinema said such terms precluded its exhibiting Columbia's film "When Harry Met Sally."  Mann officials couldn't be reached to comment; Mark Gill, vice president-publicity for Columbia, a unit of Coca-Cola Co., of Atlanta, said the company hasn't been served with the suit yet and couldn't comment.  In announcing tough new measures to combat graft, the Communist Party is responding to one of the major gripes of this spring's massive anti-government protests.  But it isn't clear whether this campaign will be any more effective than earlier ones that fizzled under resistance from party officials.  Already, the anti-corruption drive is generating a barrage of propaganda.  News of the measures, approved at a meeting of the party Politburo Friday, was broadcast on television and carried in all major newspapers.  The official Xinhua News Agency said Beijing residents "responded positively" to the announcement and quoted an unidentified middle-aged woman as saying "the party should regain the confidence of the people by punishing corruption."  This isn't the first time China's leaders have gone after corruption.  Last year, for example, then-party chief Zhao Ziyang kicked off an anti-graft campaign, stating, with apparent urgency, "If we let matters drift, the {economic} reforms won't continue."  During that campaign, as in earlier ones, a few low and middle-ranking officials were arrested or dismissed.  But no leading cadres or their family members were punished, fueling cynicism among the masses.  And the corruption problem seemed only to get worse.  Now, in the wake of the student-led demonstrations, the party is trying to convince people it means business.  "Ultimately, the acid test isn't whether the latest campaign will stop corruption, but whether the masses will buy it," says a Western economic official in Beijing.  But the Politburo's measures suffer from ambiguity, the Western economist says.  Many of the measures, described in the Politburo's circular as "tasks of great concern," not as regulations, lack details and carry no specific legal sanction.  One measure, for example, says children and spouses of senior party and government officials can't work for trading companies or "engage in commercial business."  But, says the economist, "It's hard to understand just what commercial business entails.  Does this bar them from going out to buy a box of matches?  Or does this mean they can't work for banks or law firms that specialize in business?"  For foreigners, the "clean-up" of certain Chinese conglomerates is likely to have the most significant impact.  One big trading concern, Kanghua Development Corp., is to be abolished.  Kanghua has been involved in trade deals totaling $670 million since the company's founding in 1987.  Kanghua was targeted in last year's anti-corruption campaign.  Before then, the trade and investment company had been linked to the China Welfare Fund for the Handicapped, a charity headed by paramount leader Deng Xiaoping's crippled son, Deng Pufang.  Because Kanghua raised money for the charity, it enjoyed tax-exempt status.  But an investigation into Kanghua revealed extensive corruption.  Party and government officials associated with the company used their influence illegally to purchase relatively scarce goods sold at low, state-fixed prices and resell them on the free market for big profits.  According to a source, Kanghua's network of 170 branches nationwide frequently gave out big loans to officials connected to the company.  At one stage, Kanghua, which is headed by former Petroleum Minister Tang Ke, was unable to track $16 million in siphoned funds.  As a result of the earlier investigation, Kanghua's links with the welfare fund were cut, depriving the company of its tax breaks.  Kanghua also was forced to close its Hong Kong unit, Bring Fast Co.  An internal investigation of the younger Mr. Deng turned up no personal wrongdoing, though his reputation remains tarnished.  Besides Kanghua, a second enterprise under the State Council, China Industry & Commerce Economic Development Corp., is to be abolished.  The Politburo announcement said two other concerns, China International Trust and Investment Corp., or Citic, and Everbright Industrial Corp., will undergo public audits.  Those companies, both with extensive business in Hong Kong, have been under investigation for months for possible corrupt practices.  A third company also is to be audited: China Rural Trust & Investment Corp., which is to be merged into the National Agricultural Investment Corp. Citic, often referred to as China's multinational, maintains deep links overseas.  In Hong Kong, it acquired ailing Ka Wah Bank and bought a 12.5% share in Cathay Pacific Airways.  The concern also owns stakes in an aluminum smelter in Australia, a pulp mill in Canada and timber interests in the U.S.  Everbright, similarly, maintains sizable overseas holdings, especially in Hong Kong.  The company was set up in Hong Kong in 1983 by the "red capitalist," Wang Guan Gying, brother-in-law of China's late President Liu Shaoqi.  The Politburo's measures also call for the following restrictions on top officials: -- An end to access to special, high-quality foods supplied through private stores.  -- A halt to imports of sedans, plus a requirement that top officials use only Chinese-made cars.  It isn't clear what will happen to the thousands of Mercedes-Benzes that now ferry officials around Beijing.  -- An end to the use of public funds to entertain guests or send gifts.  -- Limits on official visits to foreign countries.  Officials can't accept invitations from foreign business executives to go abroad.  The game of musical chairs continues at the top two computer-industry publishers.  Terri Hamilton was named president and chief executive officer of Infoworld Publishing Inc., a unit of Framingham, Mass.-based International Data Group, publishers of Computerworld and other industry newspapers and magazines.  Ms. Hamilton returns to Infoworld from Ziff Communications Co.'s Ziff-Davis Publishing, where she was associate director of marketing for PC Week.  Eric Hippeau, whom Ms. Hamilton succeeds, has been named publisher of Ziff's PC Magazine.  Exel Computers filed a Chapter 11 petition in federal bankruptcy court in Bridgeport, Conn.  The closely held computer retailer said its losses resulted from heavy investment in retail locations and a highly competitive and unprofitable personal-computer segment of the market in which it has been doing business.  In an interview yesterday, Victor Matalon, Exel president, said 1988 sales were about $40 million.  Current assets total about $10 million.  He said other figures weren't readily available.  A spokesman said Exel operates two retail outlets in New York and two in Connecticut.  After reorganizing, Exel will operate one retail outlet in New York City and one at its Stamford, Conn., headquarters, the spokesman said.  Under Chapter 11 of the federal Bankruptcy Code, a company operates under protection from creditors' lawsuits while it works out a plan to pay its debts.  In a risky legal move, Sir James Goldsmith asked federal courts to take jurisdiction from nine states over the U.S. insurance issues in his #13.2 billion ($21.9 billion) bid for B.A.T Industries PLC.  Sir James's Hoylake Investments Ltd. argued in lawsuits filed Friday that state-by-state review of the sale of B.A.T's Farmers Group U.S. insurance unit "will delay and probably defeat the offer."  He challenged the constitutionality of the state rules.  British rules require the bid to be completed by the end of October, yet state-by-state approval of B.A.T's 1988 bid for Farmers took about six months.  B.A.T is a tobacco, retailing, paper and financial-services conglomerate.  The action risks alienating insurance commissioners in nine states where Farmers operates.  Sir James has already asked all nine for permission to sell Farmers.  John Woodall, assistant deputy commissioner for Washington state, said his department "will actively oppose Mr. Goldsmith's petition."  B.A.T, London, called the move "an act of desperation, an attempt to do an end run" around the commissioners.  Separately, a group that holds B.A.T's American Depositary Receipts, which trade on the American Stock Exchange and represent B.A.T shares, sued in New York federal court to force Sir James to make his offer in the U.S. Sir James wants to avoid making the offer to U.S. holders to reduce the risk of becoming ensnarled in U.S. courts.  But the holder group said that will deprive U.S. investors of needed disclosure.  Atlantic Financial Federal Corp. said its board voted to suspend the Sept. 1 dividend payment to holders of its $1.05 cumulative convertible preferred stock, Series A.  The previous payment was 26.25 cents a share.  The thrift said it was suspending the payment because of recent losses and the need to preserve capital to meet proposed legislative requirements.  In June, the company omitted its common stock dividend.  Empire State Bank in Manhattan was closed by state banking authorities because of loan losses and depleted capital.  The bank, with $25 million of assets, will be liquidated by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp.  AMERICAN EXPRESS issued an unusual public apology to Edmond J. Safra, the controlling shareholder of Republic New York Corp., for a campaign to discredit the international banker.  The financial-services giant also promised to donate $4 million to charities specified by the Geneva resident, who once managed an American Express unit.  ---  Thrift officials are bracing for a massive restructuring of their industry under the big bailout package.  The bill, which may pass this week, still must clear a hurdle regarding how much of its $166 billion cost will be included in the federal budget.  ---  AT&T may enter electronic publishing Aug. 24, a federal judge ruled.  The lifting of a ban on such a move could trigger rapid development in the information-services industry.  ---  NCNB agreed to buy the remaining 51% of NCNB Texas National Bank from the FDIC for $800 million.  Cutting its ties to the agency may help the company's acquisition efforts.  BancTexas Group, the first major Texas bank company to be restructured with federal aid, became the first to request a second bailout.  ---  Bush hinted at willingness to compromise on his plan to cut capital-gains taxes.  One possibility could involve excluding from taxation any gains attributable to inflation.  ---  Growth in personal spending practically halted last month while personal income rose 0.3%.  Machine-tool orders in June dropped 38% from a year earlier, mainly because of postponed orders by the auto industry.  ---  Big insurers won a court victory when a federal judge tentatively decided to dismiss an antitrust suit filed last year by 19 states.  But a long and bitter legal fight remains likely.  ---  Socanav offered $1.12 billion for Steinberg, a real-estate and food-retailing concern 20 times Socanav's size.  The bid's success, once seemingly assured, is far from certain. ---  Canadian Pacific's stock price soared 10% over the past two trading days, to an all-time high, on rumors that Hanson is buying shares in the rail, oil and communications firm.  ---  Hooker advisers are expected to decide whether the Australian developer and retailer should seek U.S. bankruptcy-court protection.  ---  Marvin Warner's assets must be liquidated to satisfy about $4.5 billion in claims against the financier, a federal bankruptcy judge ruled.  ---  Two Walt Disney holders sued to compel the company to cooperate with anyone seeking a merger.  The step follows intense takeover speculation in the entertainment industry.  ---  Trustcorp took a $96.6 million pretax charge against earnings in an effort to clean up its balance sheet before merging with Society Corp.  ---  The prosecutor instrumental in negotiating Drexel's settlement with the government will resign soon to join a Washington, D.C., law firm.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 180,610,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2635.24, off 0.19; transportation 1269.20, up 3.02; utilities 219.82, up 1.89.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3345.70, up 14.05.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 127.93, off 1.14; spot index 129.90, off 1.03.  Dollar: 139.20 yen, off 0.06; 1.8805 marks, off 0.0023.  The last U.S. maker of 16-millimeter movie projectors is calling it quits, a victim of Japanese competition and the increased popularity of videotape.  Kalart Victor Corp., which makes movie projectors, educational-television products and audio-visual and film-editing equipment, was to close its plant today, said president Leonard J. Quartin.  He said the 67-year-old company has struggled since the early 1980s, when video-cassette recorders and hand-held camcorders became popular.  The company's products -- halfway between the 35mm film used for Hollywood movies and the 8mm film once popular for home movies -- were purchased mostly by schools, governments and businesses for instructional use.  Kalart Victor made projectors for every U.S. embasssy in the world, and supplied some city school systems with projectors for each classroom.  The city of Los Angeles alone bought thousands of the company's projectors, Mr. Quartin said.  But the rise of VCRs meant that instructional films could be shown on television, an easier technology for teachers and companies to use, he said.  "The ease of using a cartridge or cassette far outweighs the steps in making movies where you have to put reels on the projector," Mr. Quartin said.  He added, "Home movies have disappeared, taken over by camcorders."  At its peak during the 1970s, Kalart Victor employed 250 people.  Recently, there have been fewer than 50 people working at the plant.  Mr. Quartin said Kalart Victor is the last company in the U.S. producing 16mm movie projectors.  He said three Japanese producers will have the entire market -- albeit a small one -- to themselves.  Japanese companies dominate the VCR market.  As recently as 10 years ago, he said, there were five U.S. companies making the projectors, which grew in popularity after World War II.  At one time, the industry produced 100,000 projectors a year; the number has dwindled to about 15,000, Mr. Quartin said.  "The only reason to have 16 millimeter now is to use it for a large audience," Mr. Quartin said, since it can be projected on a large screen.  Tesoro Petroleum Corp. said a new two-year agreement with a syndicate of banks led by Chase Manhattan Bank provides for as much as $80 million in letters of credit and allows for as much as an additional $25 million of debt outside of the agreement.  The refining and marketing concern said its strong cash position negates a direct borrowing capability within the agreement.  LTV Corp., a steel, aerospace and energy concern, said its LTV Aircraft Products Group received a $36 million contract from the Canadair division of Bombardier Inc., Montreal, to build aircraft engine housings.  The housings, known as nacelles, will be used on Canadair's new 50-passenger Regional Jet.  The contract calls for LTV to design and produce 106 nacelles to be used on 53 flight test and production aircraft.  Home Shopping Network Inc., the homespun video retailer, tried to take its show upscale -- and got a black eye.  Two weeks ago, the company that pioneered the billion-dollar home-shopping business posted its first quarterly loss and first sales decline since going public in 1986.  Much of the poor showing resulted from a 60% jump in administrative costs, including a big jump in legal fees stemming from a court battle with GTE Corp.  Part of the loss, however, stemmed from a change earlier this year in the company's marketing strategy.  In a move that resembled the more sophisticated programming of its biggest rivals -- QVC Network Inc. and CVN Cos. -- Home Shopping began supplementing its offerings of silver neck chains and porcelain blue jays with a greater number of classy items such as videocassette recorders and computers.  Viewers didn't bite.  Demand for the high-ticket items was so weak that the company recently decided to yank some of them. (Home Shopping doesn't provide specific figures.)  Although Home Shopping characterizes the episode simply as an experiment gone awry, industry analysts say the failure points up the limitations of the company's TV format.  Home Shopping's carnival-like atmosphere has attracted a loyal following, but its hucksterish approach turns off a lot of people, making it "difficult to penetrate more homes," says Larry Gerbrandt, a television analyst at Paul Kagan Associates Inc. in Carmel, Calif.  Adds J. Timothy Rice, an analyst at Johnson Rice & Co. in New Orleans: "You can't take a guy who's worked in a used-car lot and expect him to sell a Mercedes."  Many analysts believe Home Shopping will have to change.  It had been a highflier for almost two years, posting double-digit and even triple-digit sales gains.  But about a year ago, sales flattened.  The reason, some analysts say, was that the network had saturated its core audience of middle-aged, middle-income women.  "Once you sell them 'x' amount of collectibles and jewelry, it's hard to expand that vein," says Mr. Gerbrandt at Paul Kagan.  In addition, Home Shopping's cable competition could get tougher.  QVC, based in West Chester, Pa., agreed two weeks ago to acquire CVN, based in Minneapolis, for $423 million.  "Unless Home Shopping can figure out how to get back to its old double-digit growth, QVC and CVN are headed for the top," says Mr. Gerbrandt.  QVC and CVN already use more of an upscale approach than Home Shopping.  Part of their recent success is due to segmentation: Instead of having viewers sit through an endless parade of unrelated products, Home Shopping's competitors divide their programming into blocks: an hour for home furnishings, for instance, or an hour for toys.  Future segments are periodically flashed on the screen and are even listed in some cable guides.  Moreover, QVC's and CVN's programs appear to appeal more to viewers' reasoning and less to impulse.  Their segments feature a host or hostess, often seated in a studio living room or kitchen, demonstrating the products for sale.  One evening, a QVC host is giving a 15-minute talk on an RCA camcorder, showing how the camera works and suggesting how it might be used to make a film of home valuables for insurance purposes.  By contrast, on the same evening, Home Shopping is offering a 40-channel citizens'-band radio and a radar detector.  The two items sit on a table.  No demonstration.  No visible host.  Simply the voice of a chatty announcer, who periodically asks callers whether they would like to receive an extra "toot" or two from a toy horn in the studio that greets customers and heralds sales.  "The moderators {on QVC} do a better job in a low-key way, rather than jamming it down a customer's throat," says Fred Wintzer, a principal at Alex.  Brown & Sons in Baltimore.  "There's probably a market for both approaches, but I think more customers probably prefer a soft sell."  And Home Shopping's rivals are already expanding.  QVC has discussed launching a second channel (or perhaps using CVN if the merger is successful) on which other retailers, such as Sears, Roebuck & Co. or Spiegel Inc., could lease time to sell their products.  Home Shopping faces additional pressures.  The company has a lot riding on its lawsuit against GTE.  The suit seeks to recover $500 million in lost profit and $1 billion in punitive damages from GTE, which Home Shopping alleges provided it with defective telephone service that lost or cut off millions of callers.  A decision in that case could come as early as this week.  As for its broad strategy, Home Shopping says it will continue to experiment with incremental changes.  "At the moment, spontaneous impulse purchases and the entertainment element of the show work well for us," says Les Wandler, the company's chief financial officer.  But he adds, "We will certainly stay abreast of trends in the industry."  Indeed, Home Shopping has already made one move toward segmentation.  When it added expensive electronic items to its menu, it also began to feature more women's clothes.  Though the electronics flopped, the clothes sold briskly.  As a result, Home Shopping now features a three-hour fashion program, "Designer Row," as part of its regular morning fare.  Some analysts expect the video-retailing business eventually to resemble traditional retailing, with a combined QVC and CVN assuming the role of an upscale -- and highly successful -- department store, and Home Shopping playing the part of a lower-end -- and slightly less successful -- mass merchandiser.  Home Shopping, however, dismisses that theory.  "The high end isn't that big," Mr. Wandler says.  "Everybody pretty much has to deal across the board."  While the planned consolidation of QVC and CVN may help video retailing by ensuring the presence of another strong player, he adds, "We're the {industry} leader, and we're going to continue to be the leader."  American Savings Financial Corp. said it scheduled a special meeting of shareholders for Sept. 13 for a vote on the company's proposed acquisition by Seafirst Corp., a unit of BankAmerica Corp.  BankAmerica has proposed issuing $30.05 of its stock for each American share, indicating a total value of about $68.6 million.  Under the agreement, American Savings stockholders would receive more than $30.05 of BankAmerica stock if the market value of that stock averages more than $33.375 for the 10 days preceding the close of the transaction.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange Friday, BankAmerica stock closed at $30.75 a share, up 12.5 cents.  Nike Inc. has Bo Jackson and spends more than $35 million a year on advertising.  Ryka Inc., Weymouth, Mass., has body trainer Jake Steinfeld and an ad budget of less than $2 million.  Undaunted, it intends to take on Nike and scores of other established companies in the $4 billion-a-year athletic shoe market.  Ryka, a 25-employee firm led by a husband and wife team, hopes to become the next hot shoe company by using cheap but ingenious "guerrilla" marketing in selling shoes specifically designed for athletic women.  Its tactics, other than Mr. Steinfeld, include targeting marketing efforts in California.  "We'd love to be the next Reebok," said John Gillis, a Ryka vice president, although the fledgling company initially would settle for steady growth.  Treading in the land of consumer product giants is risky business for small companies.  Reebok International Ltd. may have scored big in the early 1980s when it entered the aerobic shoe market, as well as L.A. Gear Inc. when it followed in the mid-1980s by peddling stylish sneakers.  But their very success makes it all the harder for Ryka to succeed.  Six years ago, for example, athletic-shoe companies spent a total of $20 million on advertising; last year, they spent more than $100 million.  But Ryka is undeterred.  "Retailers definitely recognize the need for this category of shoe," said Sheri Poe, Ryka's president.  For many years, major shoemakers designed women's shoes by simply shrinking a man's last (a block of plastic shaped like a foot on which shoes are made) to fit a woman, Ms. Poe said.  "But women have different hips and pelvises and their feet strike the ground differently.  We developed a special last that takes that into consideration," she said.  Industry analysts said they believe Ryka is the only athletic shoemaker that designs strictly for women.  It was among the first to use the special last for women in athletic shoes; now competitors like Nike are following suit.  Many retailers agree that a category of specially designed women's shoes could be popular.  "I think they have the right concept," said a spokeswoman for Lady Foot Locker, a subsidiary of F.W. Woolworth Co.  "They advertise nationally in different magazines, and a lot of women tear out the ad and bring it into our stores looking for the shoe," she said.  Making lasts just for women is an advance in women's footwear that is here to stay, podiatric sports experts say.  "Women's feet are different from men's feet," said Lloyd Smith, a podiatrist based in Newton, Mass.  Specialized lasts fulfill women's needs for a shoe made in their shape and size, he said.  Unfortunately for Ryka, other companies have also recognized this untapped women's market.  Nike, for example, plans to introduce nine new specialized technical shoes for women in the coming season, including aerobic, walking, tennis and even cycling shoes.  They would be in addition to its first running, basketball and volleyball shoes made on a woman's last, which Nike began producing last year.  Those three styles alone raised Nike's sales in women's footwear 45% last year.  The cost of Ryka's shoes range from about $50 to $80 a pair, comparable to the women's sneakers of its competitors.  Some investors like the idea of specialized women's shoes, too.  Ryka, which sold 3.5 million shares at $1 each in an initial public offering in 1988, was quoted Friday at $1.813 bid in over-the-counter trading.  Ryka's problem, like all small companies entering a crowded market, is getting attention.  But its budget won't let Ryka go toe-to-toe with the big guys.  That's where Jake Steinfeld comes in.  Mr. Steinfeld, a Hollywood body trainer who was given an undisclosed amount of Ryka stock and a small stipend, has all his assistants wearing Ryka shoes on his syndicated TV fitness show, "Body by Jake."  The show has a 70% female audience.  "I'm here in the Hollywood community trying to put all the gals in the shoes," Mr. Steinfeld said.  "It's more of a boutique type of shoe right now."  But Mr. Steinfeld says more people in workout studios are wearing Ryka shoes as well as a number of his celebrity clients, such as actress Bette Midler.  Popular shoe trends start out in California because people there tend to be open to new things, Ms. Poe said.  Ryka has focused intently on Southern California, advertising in three California magazines and on local radio stations.  In addition, Ryka's top management frequently makes in-store promotional visits hoping to excite store clerks about the brand.  So far, this focused marketing strategy appears to be working.  In the past four months alone, Ryka's sales in California rose to 36% from 24% of its total sales.  Ryka is also trying such other low-budget marketing ploys as exhibiting aerobics shoes at shoe conventions, offering discounts to aerobics instructors and serving as the official shoe of the Miss Teen USA pageant.  Advertising isn't Ryka's only problem.  Like many small companies, it had quality control problems initially.  Specifically, it had difficulty perfecting its patented technology -- a nitrogen molding resembling clear rubber bouncing balls that fit into the foundation of the shoe.  Complaints about poor stitching and other quality problems caused one athletic shoe chain to send almost its entire fall shipment back to Ryka.  But since then, Ryka's quality problems with the molding have been corrected, Mr. Gillis said.  Despite initial setbacks, Ryka's distributors are pleased with the concept behind Ryka.  "We think their technology is excellent," said a spokesman for Jordan Marsh, a department store subsidiary of Campeau Corp. of Toronto.  "Their styling is definitely contoured for a woman's foot."  Ryka's sales were $1.7 million in the first quarter of 1989 and company officials expect sales of as much as $7 million for the year, compared with $1.4 million in 1988.  With 900 accounts and shoes at only 1,500 stores vs. a potential 10,000 stores, retailers like Nordstrom Inc. say it's too early to tell how successful Ryka will be.  In 1988, Ryka had a net loss of $1.5 million.  "Everyone always said Nike ignored the women's market . . . that we were such a macho company.  And for a certain time, that was true, to an extent," said Elizabeth Dolan, a spokeswoman for the company.  But this past year, Nike ran a lot of ads specifically for women.  "We realized there is a huge market out there."  Adds Ms. Dolan: "This is not a marketing game.  Small companies can do well if they can make a quality product.  Ryka found a good niche . . . but we are taking customers from them."  Japan's steel exports in June totaled about 1.8 million metric tons, a 16.5% decrease from a year earlier, marking the seventh consecutive monthly decline, the Japan Iron and Steel Federation said.  A metric ton is equal to about 2,204.62 pounds.  A federation official said, though, that the latest statistics appeared relatively unaffected by the dollar's surge or ripple effects from the bloody repression of pro-democracy supporters in Beijing in early June.  He said the numbers represented a continuation of a longstanding trend in which local steelmakers are concentrating on meeting domestic demand in the face of weak export performance.  In May, Japan's steel exports fell 11.6% to about 1.7 million metric tons from a year earlier.  Exports were down 10.1% in April, and fell 6.3% in March.  The average export price per metric ton in June was $764, up from $754 in May.  Lincoln Savings & Loan Association had an $847 million loss in the first half, sending its net worth plunging to a negative $906 million, state thrift officials said.  The officials wouldn't say exactly what caused the huge loss at Lincoln, the American Continental Corp. unit that was seized by federal regulators in April.  But other persons said most of the loss probably resulted from huge write-downs of the thrift's real estate assets.  "In the light of other situations where the feds have moved in, it's not unusual when a company is active in real estate development for there to be a great deal of subjectivity as to the real estate values," said Allan Bortel, a San Francisco-based thrift analyst with Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. "That's an area where the regulators have gotten extremely tough lately."  American Continental, which filed for bankruptcy-law protection the day before Lincoln was seized, had long been criticized for using Lincoln's federally insured deposits for such non-traditional investments as real estate and junk bonds.  Regulators say they are now looking at the possibility that Lincoln and American Continental used fraudulent transfers of funds and accounting methods that made the unit look healthier than it was.  Analysts estimate that a bailout of the thrfit could cost the government $2 billion or more.  California thrift regulators didn't break down Lincoln's first-half loss by quarters.  But earlier reports indicated that the thrift had a first-quarter loss of $28 million, which would indicate a second-quarter loss of $819 million.  In Phoenix, Ariz., an attorney for American Continental said that "without having any control of the numbers anymore, we have no way of knowing where they came up with that number" for the six-month loss and the negative net worth.  The attorney, Marilyn Fried, said the regulators previously said the thrift had a net worth -- or assets minus liabilities -- of $112 million as of last Dec. 31.  American Continental contended that the net worth then was $249 million.  When regulators seized the thrift in April, they said its net worth had plummeted to $20 million.  "It's hard to imagine that with $112 million of net worth they now come up with almost $1 billion of losses," Ms. Fried said.  She said American Continental is "outraged" at the "misleading impression" that the loss figure gives.  "It might have some credibility if the regulators never had a chance to look at the records, but they were in since March of 1986 continuously," she says, referring to lengthy examinations of the thrift by the San Francisco Federal Home Loan Bank and the Federal Home Loan Bank Board in Washington.  "What new could they have found?"  France's seasonally adjusted trade deficit narrowed to 2.8 billion French francs ($441.7 million) in June from a revised May deficit of 6.68 billion francs, the National Customs Office said.  The latest result was better than market expectations, which had called for a deficit of 3.5 billion francs to 4.5 billion francs.  Rumors earlier last week in London put the expected deficit closer to eight billion or nine billion francs.  The revised May deficit of 6.68 billion francs was up slightly from the Customs Office's previous data, which had put it at 6.64 billion francs.  On an unadjusted basis, the June deficit was 2.9 billion francs, down from a revised 9.1 billion francs in May, but up from the June 1988 deficit of 1.2 billion francs.  Kentucky Medical Insurance Co., a medical liability insurance concern, said it filed a registration statement with the Securities and Exchange Commission for 200,000 shares of its Class A common stock to be used in an employee incentive stock option plan.  The registration statement is expected to become effective Aug. 14.  The former head of the New York regional office of the Department of Housing and Urban Development made decisions that benefited private developers who became his business partners after he left the federal housing agency.  The disclosure came in testimony from Joseph Monticciolo, HUD's New York regional administrator from 1981 through 1988, before a House panel that has been probing allegations of influence-peddling and mismanagement in the agency.  In 1984, Mr. Monticciolo recommended that HUD support a proposal that yielded an $11 million profit for an investment group that included New York developer Sheldon Goldstein.  Mr. Goldstein is a partner in Eagle Capital Group, the company that employed Mr. Monticciolo at an annual salary of $125,000 when he left the government.  Mr. Monticciolo also has a 15% equity stake in the business.  "I made recommendations to Washington that ultimately benefited people who are now partners of mine," Mr. Monticciolo told the employment and housing subcommittee of the House Government Operations Committee on Friday.  Federal laws limit the post-employment lobbying activities of federal employees but do not prohibit them from going to work for companies they dealt with while in government.  The former HUD official was also questioned closely about his contacts with Sen. Alfonse D'Amato (R., N.Y.), who played an influential role in winning HUD projects for his state, according to recently released HUD documents and congressional testimony.  In 1983, Mr. Monticciolo successfully pressed for the selection of a construction company for a HUD project in White Plains, N.Y., even though the company was high bidder for the project.  The company, Jobco Organization had contributed thousands of dollars to Sen. D'Amato's campaign.  Mr. Monticciolo testifed that he didn't know about the company's ties to Sen. D'Amato.  Also on Friday, Lance Wilson, a former executive assistant to HUD Secretary Samuel Pierce, failed to show up for his scheduled testimony.  On Wednesday, the subcommittee will decide whether to subpoena Mr. Wilson, who reaped millions of dollars from HUD projects both as an investor and as a consultant after he left government, according to HUD documents and internal audits.  This week, the panel will again focus on abuses in a HUD co-insurance program, with testimony expected today from former Federal Housing Commissioner Maurice Barksdale.  Mr. Barksdale placed underwriting restrictions on DRG Funding Corp., a HUD co-insurer which later defaulted on more than $500 million of government-backed mortgages.  John Knapp, a former HUD general counsel who issued a key legal opinion affecting DRG, is also scheduled to testify today.  Advanced Micro Devices Inc., a big semiconductor maker plagued recently by soft sales and dwindling margins, said it would shut down most of its domestic production for four days in September.  The company had already announced it will suspend operations on Dec. 28 and Dec. 29.  The drastic measures are aimed at allowing the company to balance production with flagging chip demand, the company said.  "It is now clear that the semiconductor industry is in a period of relatively weak demand," W.J. Sanders, chairman and chief executive officer, said.  He added, "We are planning our expenses accordingly and controlling our costs."  Advanced Micro has been hurt recently by a slowdown in auto sales.  Car makers are heavy users of some of Advanced Micro's chips.  But the company also is suffering the consequences of some basic strategic errors.  For example, Advanced Micro was slow to begin producing chips made with a fabrication technology called complementary metal-oxide semiconductor, or CMOS.  They use less power and run faster than conventional chips, but Advanced Micro remained committed to an older technology until 1987  The company said CMOS chip sales are growing rapidly and reached 20% of total revenue in the second quarter, for which Advanced Micro reported a 54% dive in profit to $12.1 milion, or 12 cents a share.  Sales totaled $274.9 million.  Advanced Micro said the shutdown from Sept. 5 through Sept. 8 will affect all of its domestic operations except two wafer fabrication facilities in Texas.  Employees have a choice: Take either accrued vacation time or unpaid leave.  Advanced Micro shares closed at $8.50, down 37.5 cents, in composite trading Friday on the New York Stock Exchange.  The British pound and Japanese yen, which are seeing renewed bullish sentiment, could post more gains against the West German mark in coming days, some analysts say.  "Certainly, cross-trading {involving the pound and yen} will remain a very important part of the market" early this week, says Robert Hatcher, a corporate dealer at Barclays Bank PLC.  In cross-trading, market participants buy and sell foreign currencies against each other using the dollar as an intermediary vehicle.  With the dollar's near-term direction seen as unclear, foreign currencies have been stealing the spotlight.  The pound-mark relationship is seen as particularly important because the British currency's fortunes have changed considerably in recent weeks.  In mid-July, the pound dropped to a 16-month low of about 3.01 marks amid perceptions of a monetary policy squabble between Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher and Chancellor of the Exchequer Nigel Lawson and concerns about Britain's economy and labor unrest.  After coming close to falling below crucial support at 3.00 marks, the pound reversed direction and worked its way above solid resistance at 3.10 marks last week.  Late Friday in New York, the pound traded at 3.1053 marks.  The currency's climb above the 3.10 mark level "has caused the technicians to forecast numbers as high as 3.12 and 3.14," says Mr. Hatcher of near-term prospects.  Much of the turnaround is related to developments that have "helped the interest rate outlook" for the pound, says Nigel Rendell, international economist at James Capel & Co. in London.  With the Deutsche Bundesbank considered unlikely to tighten monetary policy again soon and the Federal Reserve easing its credit grip, the pound is benefiting from the relatively high British rates that were largely overlooked during the recent slump.  Mr. Rendell says the British rate picture is also brightened by what he sees as a "30%" possibility that Britain's base lending rates will soon be increased to 15% from the current 14%, a four-year high.  High rates are generally favorable for a currency because they make investments denominated in the unit more attractive.  The pound has also been helped by reduced worries about Britain's merchandise trade deficit, which was an unexpectedly narrow #1.89 billion (about US$3.12 billion) in June, rather than the #2 billion deficit expected by many market participants.  But despite the bullish sentiment, many analysts say the pound probably won't get far beyond 3.15 marks.  "I don't think we're completely out of the woods yet," says Mr. Rendell.  He sees the pound falling to 2.95 marks in the next year, burdened by trade deficit concerns and what will probably be slow progress against U.K. inflation, which currently runs about 8%.  Also, Mr. Hatcher of Barclays Bank says concerns about the Thatcher and Lawson relationship "could resurface very, very easily" and hurt the pound.  Meanwhile, the yen is seen continuing its rebound against the mark now that Japan's political woes are no longer the primary force driving trading in that currency.  The mark traded at 74.15 yen late Friday in New York, having retreated after breaking through brick-wall resistance at 75.00 yen early last week.  The mark has the potential to fall toward 72.50 yen in coming weeks, says Frank Pusateri, senior corporate trader at the Bank of Boston.  He notes that the yen is "fundamentally strong" because of Japan's robust economy despite the political uncertainty engulfing that nation.  Japan's governing party plans to choose a successor for resigning Prime Minister Sosuke Uno on Aug. 8 in a vote by Liberal Democrats in parliament.  While the yen has recovered, traders say the currency, like the pound, could eventually be undermined by persistent bearish sentiment.  "I don't see anyone anxious to really run into the yen in any great degree," says Mr. Hatcher, who sees the mark soaring to 77 yen within three months if Japan's political problems remain.  Cross-trading has recently dominated foreign exchange dealings because the dollar has languished in range trading.  But market participants say the dollar could run into trouble at the end of the week if the July U.S. employment data, due Friday, support further easing by the Fed and trigger sales.  The jobless rate probably held steady at 5.3% in July, while nonfarm payrolls are seen having risen about 150,000 after gaining 180,000 in June, according to an early survey of economists polled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report.  Unexpectedly weak data could knock the dollar under support at 1.85 marks, says Mr. Hatcher.  But he says the dollar "becomes very bottomish at 135 yen" because of uncertainties about Japan's government.  At the close of New York dealings Friday, the dollar traded at 1.8805 marks and 139.20 yen, off from 1.9125 and 142.25 a week earlier.  In trading Monday in Tokyo, the dollar opened at 138.90 yen, down from Friday's close there at 139.45.  On the Commodity Exchange in New York Friday, gold for current delivery plummeted $6.70 to $367 an ounce.  Estimated volume was a very heavy 7.5 million ounces.  In early trading in Hong Kong Monday, gold was quoted at $368.35 an ounce.  The American Stock Exchange said a seat was sold for $180,000, down $1,000 from the previous sale May 24.  Seats are currently quoted at $165,000, bid, and $204,000, asked.  Devon Energy Corp., an independent oil and gas company, said its shareholders approved an increase in its authorized capital from one million shares of preferred stock to three million shares and from 20 million shares of common stock to 40 million shares.  Growth in personal spending in the U.S. practically came to a halt last month, the Commerce Department said, in another indication of a severely slowing economy.  But personal income continued to grow, with wages and salaries showing particularly large increases.  Consequently, the nation's savings rate climbed to 5.9% of disposable income from 5.4%.  Personal spending inched up in June to an annual rate of $3.441 trillion from a $3.440 trillion rate in May, the Commerce Department said.  At the same time, personal income grew 0.3% to an annual rate of $4.407 trillion after rising 0.2% in May.  The department revised May's increase from an original calculation of 0.3%.  A steep 21.4% drop in farm income pulled down income growth during June.  Americans outside the farm sector did quite well on the average.  But no one seemed to be spending much money.  Not only was there a drop in spending on durable goods -- cars, household appliances and other items intended to last more than three years -- but spending on services and non-durable goods, such as food and clothing, barely grew.  Until recently, most of the slowdown in consumer spending has come in durable goods, which are more closely tied to high interest rates.  "There is some more underlying weakness in the economy, in consumption, than we might have thought," said William Griggs, managing director of Griggs & Santow, an economic consulting firm in New York.  The economy has slowed markedly in recent months, a consequence of the Federal Reserve's campaign between March 1988 and March 1989 to fight inflation by pushing up interest rates to try to discourage borrowing.  The Fed has been hoping to keep the economy on a slower track for a while but trying to avoid tipping it into a recession.  With that in mind, the central bank recently eased its grip on credit.  Some economists have been surprised by the extent of the recent slowdown in consumer spending.  Most analysts say that the buying practices of U.S. consumers rarely lead the economy into a recession.  Still, personal consumption accounts for two-thirds of the nation's economic activity, and Mr. Griggs said, "Everybody appreciates that if you're going to have a substantial slowdown in this economy, it has to come from the consumer.  He has to slow down."  A record number of Americans are employed, and wages and salaries grew 0.5% last month.  That suggests consumers have money to spend.  But some economists say that although income has been growing, many people aren't any better off after inflation is factored in.  Here is the Commerce Department's latest report on personal income.  The figures are at seasonally adjusted annual rates in trillions of dollars.  @ June May  @ 1989 1989  @ Personal income ................... 4.407 4.395  @ Wages and salaries .............. 2.616 2.602  @ Factory payrolls ................ 0.551 0.549  @ Transfer payments ............... 0.629 0.626  @ Disposable personal income ........ 3.769 3.747  @ Personal outlays .................. 3.545 3.543  @ Consumption expenditures ........ 3.441 3.440  @ Other outlays ................... 0.103 0.103  @ Personal saving ................... 0.224 0.204  TALKS ON CAMBODIA OPENED in Paris, but a settlement appeared unlikely.  Foreign ministers from the U.S., the Soviet Union and 18 other countries opened the conference with a call for a comprehensive peace accord in the Southeast Asian nation's 20-year-old conflict.  The warring parties, however, stuck to their positions.  Prince Sihanouk reiterated his call for a four-party interim government following a withdrawal by Vietnam.  Secretary of State Baker warned that U.S. aid to a new Phnom Penh government would depend on the role of the Khmer Rouge guerrillas.  Baker and Soviet Foreign Minister Shevardnadze, at talks Saturday in Paris, agreed to meet in September to prepare for a Bush-Gorbachev summit.  ---  MOSLEM CAPTORS VOWED to kill a U.S. hostage over a cleric's abduction.  A Shiite group threatened to hang today Marine Lt. Col. William Higgins unless Israel frees a Moslem clergyman kidnapped Friday by Israeli commandos.  The cleric is a leader of the pro-Iranian Hezbollah group.  The U.S. called the threat "outrageous," and said the kidnappers would be responsible for the safety of Higgins, head of a U.N. peacekeeping force who was abducted in southern Lebanon in February 1988.  Israel was expected to try to exchange the cleric for three soldiers missing in Lebanon.  An official in Jerusalem said Washington has asked Israel to report what it discovered during the interrogation of the abducted Moslem cleric.  ---  A Soviet parliamentary faction elected Yeltsin, Sakharov and three others to lead the nearly 400-member group, Moscow's first organized opposition in nearly 70 years.  The faction is pressing to accelerate Gorbachev's restructuring program.  Separately, official Soviet newspapers expressed concern that rail strikes could erupt.  ---  Poland's Rakowski faces the task of rebuilding the country's Communist Party amid criticism of the government's economic management over the past year.  The 62-year-old Rakowski, who is expected to resign as prime minister today, was named party chief Saturday, succeeding President Jaruzelski, who resigned the post.  The Warsaw government announced the end of food price controls and meat rationing, despite warnings from the Solidarity union and a Politburo member that the move could lead to huge price increases and unrest.  The plan takes effect tomorrow.  ---  Rafsanjani won an expected landslide in Iran's presidential election, with final results showing him capturing almost 95% of the ballots cast Friday.  Voters also approved amendments strengthening the presidency.  But a massive turnout sought by Tehran's leaders as a sign of support for the Islamic revolution didn't materialize.  ---  Israel's high court restricted the army's right to demolish the homes of Palestinians suspected of involvement in the 19-month-old uprising in the occupied territories.  The court said the military must allow judicial appeals.  More than 200 houses have been destroyed, and the practice has been denounced by the U.S. and other nations.  ---  China's Communist leadership approved measures to combat graft.  While the steps cleared Friday at a Politburo meeting were considered a response to a major demand of this spring's student-led protests, the measures apparently lack detail and specific legal sanction.  ---  The Exxon Valdez tanker entered San Diego Bay, arriving at a shipyard for long-delayed repairs after running aground March 24 and spilling crude oil into Alaska's waters.  The repair job is expected to cost $25 million.  ---  A former regional HUD official made decisions that benefited private developers who became his business partners after he left the federal housing agency.  The disclosure came in testimony Friday from Joseph Monticciolo, the agency's New York administrator from 1981 through 1988, before a House panel.  ---  Chileans voted in a referendum on constitutional changes to ease a transition to democracy, including legalizing Marxism and reducing presidential power.  Partial returns showed the measures, backed by Pinochet and the opposition, headed for approval.  ---  Arab League officials neared completion of proposals aimed at ending the 14-year-old civil war in Lebanon, where a lull in fighting enabled hundreds of people to flee Beirut.  Over the weekend, Syrian-backed militiamen and Christian forces traded rocket fire, hitting every neighborhood in both sectors of the capital and some outlying villages.  ---  Rep. Dixon of California said he was never lobbied by a company with which his wife has a lucrative business arrangement.  But the company's law firm, in documents filed with the Justice Department, said it contacted the Ethics Committee chairman on company business four times in 1986 and 1987.  Dixon termed the data "erroneous."  Lloyds Bank PLC said sharply higher provisions totaling #483 million ($797 million) against loans to less developed countries depressed pretax profit to #93 million in the first half of 1989 from #452 million a year earlier.  The results were well below forecasts, but bank analysts responded favorably to the increase in provisions.  Chris Wheeler, an analyst at Shearson Lehman Securities, said the fact Lloyds raised its dividend to 6.4 pence a share from 5.5 pence in 1988 "is bullish for the stock and shows that management is confident about the way business is progressing."  Lloyds gained 13 pence to 357 pence ($5.89) a share in late trading Friday on London's stock exchange.  Candela Laser Corp. expects to report net income of $455,000 to $490,000 for its fourth quarter ended June 30, compared with a loss of $1.4 million for the year-ago quarter, Richard Olsen, vice president, said.  Revenue totaled between $6.5 million and $7 million, up from $3.8 million, Mr. Olsen added in an interview.  The fourth-quarter results would put the loss for the year at around $3.8 million on revenue of about $18 million.  In the previous year, the maker of medical lasers had a loss of $3.7 million on $11.5 million in revenue.  Candela initially reported a profit of $727,830 on revenue of $15.8 million for the year ended June 30, 1988.  But the company restated the results after its auditor, Deloitte, Haskins & Sells, withdrew its opinion just prior to a planned public stock offering. (Candela subsequently sold about one million of its common shares to Singatronics Asset Holdings Private Ltd. for $7 million, increasing the Singaporean electronics concern's stake in Candela to 27%.)  In signing off on the revised financial statement in March, Deloitte -- which has since been replaced by Coopers & Lybrand -- said that recurring losses and other factors raised "substantial doubt" about Candela's ability to continue as a going concern.  Mr. Olsen said, however, that Candela now expects to be profitable in each quarter of the year that began July 1 and to achieve revenue of $27 million to $28 million for the year.  To eliminate its cash pinch, Candela has shifted "from an expansion strategy to a profitability strategy," Mr. Olsen said.  Among other measures, Candela trimmed its overall work force and cut back on outside distributors, while increasing its direct sales force.  The recognition of revenue from sales to certain distributors was a main issue in Deloitte's decision to withdraw its opinion on last year's results.  Mr. Olsen said distributors' inventories have been eliminated and the company ended its fiscal year with a "substantial backlog," without any bank debt and with "almost $4 million" in cash on its balance sheet.  Candela is "ready for a comeback," Mr. Olsen asserted.  Candela, which sells lasers for removing birthmarks and for destroying kidney stones, recently received clearance from the Food and Drug Administration to market a laser system for treating gallstones.  The system, similar to the one used for kidney stones, provides an alternative to major abdominal surgery and to two other new systems being developed by other companies -- shock wave treatment and treatment by chemical solvent.  Because around 500,000 gallbladder removals are performed in the U.S. in a year, Candela says it sees the gallstone treatment as its biggest potential market yet.  But some medical specialists familiar with the procedure, in which a thin laser fiber is inserted into the gallbladder through a small incision in the skin, caution against expecting wide use of the treatment in the next few years.  That's partly because, like the other new methods, the laser treatment leaves the gallbladder intact and thereby leaves a risk of recurrence.  "Surgery is still going to remain the backbone of treatment for gallbladder disease for the next five to 10 years," predicts Robert Hawes, assistant professor of medicine at Indiana University School of Medicine.  Dr. Hawes, a gastroenterologist who has used the Candela laser to break up stones in the gallbladder or bile ducts of eight patients, estimates the laser could be applicable to 80% to 85% of patients with gallstones -- the exceptions being those whose gallbladders have shriveled.  People most likely to consider the laser treatment would be the medically frail or others who want to avoid an abdominal incision, general anesthesia and a lengthy recovery period, Dr. Hawes says.  But whether the technique catches on may depend on how many radiologists embrace it, as they must perform the task of inserting a catheter through the skin and into the patient's gallbladder.  That's the trickiest part of the procedure, according to Dr. Hawes, and "not all (radiologists) are comfortable with it."  Candela also hopes to bring to market within the current fiscal year at least one of three other laser systems it has been developing, Mr. Olsen said.  A system for treating the eye disease of glaucoma and another for treating pigment -- containing skin lesions, such as aging spots or freckles, are being used in clinical trials.  Another, for treating degenerating blood vessels within the eye, also could be ready for clearance within a year, Mr. Olsen said.  Environmental Systems Co. said its board rejected as inadequate a $14-a-share, or $170.8 million, offer by Brambles Industries Ltd. to acquire the 79% of Environmental Systems it doesn't already own.  Jack W. Forrest, Environmental Systems' president and chief executive officer, said Brambles hasn't indicated whether it will make another offer for the hazardous-waste management concern.  Earlier this month, Brambles acquired three million Environmental Systems shares, or a 19.8% stake, for $30 million.  Brambles also loaned the company an additional $30 million for warrants that permit the company to buy an additional 2.1 million shares for $14 each.  Exercising the warrants would give it a stake of about 33%.  Mr. Forrest said those warrants haven't been exercised but that under a February agreement between the companies, Brambles could acquire up to 66% of Environmental Systems stock without the Environmental Systems board's approval.  Brambles officials couldn't be reached for comment, but in a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, the Australian transportation and waste management concern said its earlier agreement with Environmental Systems didn't prohibit it from buying more of the stock.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading Friday, Environmental Systems closed at $13.50 a share, down 25 cents.  London share prices soared to a post-crash high Friday as strong speculative interest, a firm showing on Wall Street, and the opening of a new trading account encouraged a flurry of buying interest.  Stocks in Tokyo turned around Friday afternoon, closing lower on profit-taking, brokers said.  In London, dealers said the market's upward bias was accentuated by a buying squeeze on several lines of stock.  "No one wants to sell at the moment and the institutions are still buying strongly," one trader said.  The Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100-share index ended up 22.3 points at 2306, a high for the day and well above a low of 2286.2 at the opening.  "We expected Wall Street to open slightly weaker but it moved ahead," one trader said, "and the London market just followed."  Most dealers reckoned the market was set to rise higher in the near-term, unless institutions found an excuse to start selling.  "No one wants to be left out when the market takes its next step forward," noted one trader.  At the close, the narrower Financial Times 30-share index was up 22.3 points at 1924.8.  Volume amounted to a robust 585.7 million shares, up from 481.3 million Thursday.  Banking shares rose sharply in the wake of Lloyds interim results, as the market turned bullish on the sector ahead of this week's interim earnings reports from other major U.K. clearing banks.  Lloyds rose 13 pence (22 cents) to 357 ($5.92), National Westminster gained 14 pence to 326, Midland rose 12 pence to 354, and Barclays added 24 to 509.  "Barclays is the market's favorite bank share at the moment, and it's increasing its market share," one dealer noted.  Many dealers said they were encouraged that Lloyds had decided to make large provisions for Third World debt, a problem that has plagued the bank sector for some time.  "The banks have been underrated for some time and look cheap," said one dealer.  "I think there will be more buying interest next week."  Thorn EMI also starred, rising 44 pence to 840 pence, on takeover speculation that West German music company Bertelsmann might be set to bid.  "There was strong buying from West German institutions early Friday morning," one trader said.  Avis Europe, a vehicle rental and leasing company, ended 128 1/2 pence firmer at 578, following news that it is holding talks with a group of investors, including Avis Inc. of the U.S., that may lead to a friendly offer being made for the company.  Brewing shares extended their recent rally on continued speculation about their breakup value.  Bass ended 17 pence firmer at 1067, Allied Lyons climbed 16 pence to 528, and Grand Metropolitan rose 13 pence to 599.  Meanwhile, in Tokyo, the Nikkei average of 225 issues was up 96.36 points to 34801.99 in early trading Monday, after falling 79.65 points Friday to 34705.63, off from a high of 34945.56 points 15 minutes into the session.  The Nikkei gained more than 550 points last week, reaching a record close of 34785.28 points Thursday.  Volume on the first section Friday was estimated at 900 million shares, off from 1.4 billion shares Thursday.  Turnover broke the one billion share level, a benchmark for healthy trading, Wednesday for the first time since 1.6 billion shares traded June 1.  Advancing issues outnumbered decliners 478 to 392, and 223 issues were unchanged.  Market activity fell in the afternoon, which put some additional downward pressure on the market.  Morning volume was estimated at 550 million shares.  "Conventional trading logic doesn't always apply to the market, but gravity does," said one trader, explaining the decline of inflated prices in the afternoon.  The Tokyo Stock Price Index of all issues listed in the first section, which gained 19.35 points Thursday, was up 1.13 points at 2606.61.  The market surged to record levels last week because of positive external factors and relief that results of the long-awaited upper house election July 23 were consistent with expectations.  The "triple merit" of a stronger yen, the prospect of lower U.S. interest rates and lower oil prices helped rally interest in the market, brokers said.  Large institutional investors left the sidelines and also encouraged individual investors to enter the market.  But some analysts predict strength in the market may dry up if the power vacuum in the Liberal Democratic Party continues for too long.  Prime Minister Sousuke Uno, president of the LDP, effectively resigned last Monday after the LDP lost its majority in the upper house.  The temporary political calm is pushing investors to take advantage of the market situation.  "The market needs to see some activity until the next storm cloud approaches," said one analyst.  The allocation of investment trust fund money through the week kept the market flush with cash to help support the rally.  Housing-related issues that have been trading higher for the last two weeks came under selling pressure Friday.  Daiwa House fell 10 yen (7 cents) to 2,650 ($19), Misawa Homes was down 70 yen at 2,680 and Sekisui House gained 20 yen to 2,300.  Construction issues, which surged Thursday late in the session, closed lower Friday.  Taisei fell 60 yen to 1,770, Shimizu was down 10 yen at 2,370 and Ohbayshi fell 50 yen to 1,910.  Nonlife insurance and railroad stocks were also lower on profit-taking.  In other Asian and Pacific trading, share prices closed higher in Hong Kong, Singapore, Seoul, Manila and Taipei and steady in Sydney and Wellington.  Elsewhere, share prices closed higher in Paris, Zurich and Stockholm, lower in Frankfurt, mixed in Amsterdam and Milan and unchanged in Brussels.  South African gold stocks closed lower.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Jul 27 Jul 26 Year  @ U.S. .......................... 315.3 311.6 + 23.1  @ Britain ....................... 691.5 686.2 + 26.6  @ Canada ........................ 431.9 429.1 + 17.6  @ Japan ......................... 1544.4 1532.5 + 8.7  @ France ........................ 521.2 515.1 + 17.8  @ Germany ....................... 244.9 245.7 + 17.8  @ Hong Kong ..................... 1870.1 1861.1 - 7.9  @ Switzerland ................... 221.7 220.6 + 28.2  @ Australia ..................... 327.6 324.8 + 12.9  @ World index ................... 540.6 532.9 + 9.3  Northern Telecom Ltd. said it expects second-half earnings to exceed the first half's 49 cents a share, and it is "cautiously optimistic" that 1989 profit will surpass 1988's profit from operations of $1.27 a share.  Paul Stern, vice chairman and chief executive officer of the telecommunications equipment maker, said analysts, many of whom are predicting net income of about $1.30 a share for 1989, "will probably be satisfied with our results."  He didn't offer specific year-end or third-quarter earnings forecasts, but he indicated that third-quarter net will probably exceed the year-earlier $60.1 million, or 23 cents a share.  "The company isn't going to pull off the whole miracle in the fourth quarter," he said in an interview.  Last Tuesday, the company reported second-quarter net of $75.3 million, or 29 cents a share, down from $83 million, or 33 cents a share, a year earlier.  Mr. Stern said he isn't unhappy with the results, which were "better than our expectations."  Northern Telecom shareholders and analysts will see "significant" benefits by 1990 from the company's $200 million restructuring program, he said.  Although it's too early to offer a specific forecast, Mr. Stern said analysts' estimates for 1990 net of $1.58 to $1.68 a share "aren't out of line."  Mr. Stern said the anticipated growth in earnings will come partly from significantly higher orders for Northern Telecom's switching systems and other products as well as from major reductions in overhead and expenses.  He added that, aside from "some pruning here and there," the restructuring provision appears to have been sufficient to turn the company around.  Mr. Stern said Northern Telecom's order input reached a record $1.59 billion in the second quarter, up 16% from a year earlier.  The order backlog also rose 16%, to $1.7 billion, the company said.  "Revenue, we'll do our best, orders we're doing our best and doing well," Mr. Stern said.  "But controllables are absolute.  We're paying dogged attention to expenses."  As a percentage of sales, expenses for sales, marketing, administration and research and development all declined in the second quarter, the company reported.  This city's reputation for corruption weakens its potential for economic and social growth, most observers agree in the wake of the latest scandal.  Last week's arrest of Mayor James Usry, six other city officials and several local business people was the fourth time in six city administrations that the resort's leaders have been charged with corruption.  Mr. Usry was elected five years ago as a reformist candidate after his predecessor was implicated in an influence-peddling scandal and lost a recall election.  Once again, residents and business owners are embarrassed.  Albert A. Marks Jr., a longtime civic leader and former director of the Miss America Pageant, remembers past attempts to reform the resort's government.  Changes are thwarted by provincial attitudes, he said.  "Atlantic City really needs help from the outside, but everyone in Atlantic City has a chip on their shoulder for the people who move to the suburbs," Mr. Marks said.  "Their attitude is, 'We are alone to ourselves.'  "A regional government would be ideal, but it's probably not going to happen," he said.  "So, it's going to take a mayoral candidate whose qualifications are so beyond anybody who has ever run before, and it's going to take a very aggressive city manager who is really experienced in running a hundred-million dollar business with billions of dollars in assets."  The city's 11 casinos mostly report to state gaming regulators, but in matters of zoning and planning, the gaming halls must endure a city system often overwhelmed by the mammoth projects.  Mr. Usry has often been accused of being an incompetent administrator.  The Casino Association of New Jersey suggested in a statement that changes in government must be made.  Martin Danzinger, a former member of the state Casino Control Commission, said the city's deteriorated condition and its administrators' reputations probably deter potential investors.  In 1976, when gambling was legalized, gaming companies first rushed to Atlantic City "because it was new," he said.  "Now, investors notice that the city has failed to develop many aspects of the schools, transportation and other social services," Mr. Danzinger said.  "The expansion of the airport and the talk of a new convention center -- those are still being discussed after 10 years.  "That all negates interest by investors.  They say they have better places to throw their money," he said.  Atlantic City has a lot going for it geographically, observers say: a temperate seaside location just two hours from New York and Philadelphia.  A dying city injected with millions of dollars in new tax revenues, such as Atlantic City, could be reborn, Mr. Danzinger said.  Pittsburgh, Baltimore and Hartford, Conn., are just some examples of cities that have successfully put on a new face.  "In those places, cities and governments work hand in hand," he said.  "When I pass through Atlantic City, much of what I see looks exactly the way it did 10 years ago, and that's largely the fault of city government."  But James Hughes, a professor of urban policy and planning at Rutgers University, said the city suffers because "the casinos internalize operations.  Local merchants are certainly hurt."  Casino money "bypassed the poor of the city," said Mr. Hughes, co-author of a 1983 book titled "The Atlantic City Gamble," a critical look at what legalized gambling did for the decaying resort.  Mr. Usry and 13 others were charged Thursday with bribery, conspiracy, influence peddling, official misconduct and other counts resulting primarily from an attempt to gain control of a lucrative Boardwalk electric cart business and an airport gift shop franchise.  The case now goes before a state grand jury.  Mr. Usry and the others can hold office in the meantime.  Within hours of Mr. Usry's arrest, "state takeover" was on the minds of many.  Legislation for an Atlantic City "superagency" has been proposed before, but never took off.  Mr. Marks believes the state must take over Atlantic City "at least on an interim basis, to eliminate what I perceive will develop into a chaotic situation.  It will psychologically calm things down."  Antoine Jeancourt-Galignani, president director general of Bank Indosuez in Paris, was elected a director of this home builder, filling a vacancy.  Circle Express Inc. said it plans to convert part of its debentures into common stock and miss an interest payment to debenture holders as part of a financial restructuring of the company.  The truck carrier also said it expects to report a loss for the second quarter of about $5.3 million compared with a $10 million loss for the like 1988 quarter.  That would make the company's loss for the first six months of the year $11.6 million compared with $15 million for the similar 1988 period.  Under the restructuring plan, Circle Express would convert much of its 13 1/2% senior subordinated debentures into common stock.  Terms weren't given.  It would also suspend a $3.2 million interest payment slated for Aug. 15 to holders of those debentures.  The company said will discuss the plan with representatives of holders of those debentures.  Joel Becker, 43 years old, was named to the posts of president and chief executive officer of this maker of data-communications systems.  Mr. Becker, currently senior vice president of marketing and corporate development, succeeds Arnold N. Silverman, 50, who retains his position as chairman.  A panel representing the leading Western technology-exporting nations has agreed to remove all export restrictions from a widely sold class of personal computers, U.S. officials said.  The decision makes it possible for U.S., West European and Japanese suppliers to ship International Business Machines Corp.'s AT computers and other models of equivalent power to the Soviet bloc without prior authorization.  The panel, called the Coordinating Committee on Multilateral Export Controls, or Cocom, voted to relax restrictions on the shipments effective Aug. 15.  The panel action came a week after the Commerce Department announced that it is relieving U.S. exporters of licensing requirements for these products.  In effect, the panel is extending the same privilege to traders in the 16 other countries that make up the group.  The ruling covers computers with a data-processing rate of up to 68 million bits of information a second and four megabytes of memory.  Among the models that fall in this class are IBM's PS/2 Model 30 and Apple Computer Inc.'s MacIntosh Plus.  The U.S. decided to abandon controls on these products because they are widely available in many countries outside Cocom.  FEDERATED FINANCIAL SAVINGS & LOAN ASSOCIATION (Milwaukee) -- Roger F. Martin, chairman of Pope Scientific Co., was named a director of this banking concern, increasing board membership to 13.  L.L. Bean Inc. wants to do something few other companies aspire to: It wants to grow more slowly.  The famous mail-order company, a mecca for yuppies and outdoorsmen, prides itself on its service.  It promises 100% satisfaction or your money back.  The problem is, lots of customers aren't satisfied.  Last year, they returned $82 million worth of goods, or about 14% of Bean's $588 million in sales.  The returns cost Bean $18 million in shipping and handling costs -- and a National Quality Award for service from the Commerce Department.  Dismayed, Bean has hired a Harvard Business School professor as a consultant, and it recently gathered its 3,500 employees to launch a new service campaign.  Its theme: Get it right the first time.  To accomplish its aim, Bean has scaled back expansion goals to ensure greater care in inspecting and shipping goods.  "We don't mind fewer new customers as long as we do it right," preaches Leon Gorman, Bean's president.  The company shelved its goal of reaching a billion dollars in sales by 1992.  "We would like to grow at a rate of about 5% to 8% over the next few years," says Mr. Gorman, compared with growth of about 23% a year over the past decade.  Bean will spend about $2 million over the next 18 months to improve service.  The company will survey customers, revise catalogs so they depict items more accurately and retrain employees on finding out what the customer really wants.  Bean also plans to upgrade its computers, which will offer more detailed descriptions of its merchandise and suggest sizes, according to weight, height and other variations.  Other mail-order firms are taking different steps, as consumers get more finicky and assertive about return privileges, notes Stanley Fenvessy, a mail-order consultant in New York.  Recently, 10 companies contacted him, asking for help in reducing their rates of returned goods.  Efforts include scratching off mailing lists the customers with a history of returning things.  Some firms, like Horchow Mail Order Inc. in Dallas and Sharper Image Co. in San Francisco, offer only limited guarantees on merchandise -- a bold departure from a tradition among catalog companies of luring customers away from retailers with lifetime warranties.  Some firms, like Spiegel Inc. of Oak Brook, Ill., and Sears, Roebuck & Co., Chicago, discontinued lines with higher return rates.  Both, for example, stopped selling bridalwear through the mail.  "Customers are becoming more demanding and they know they can be more demanding, given the competition between mail-order merchants and retailers," Mr. Fenvessy says.  Bean's focus on improving service isn't to say it isn't pleasing many customers.  The main reason for the returns is because clothes don't fit -- common in the $35 billion U.S. catalog-company business.  Although Bean's return rate rose several percentage points in the past five years, it's still among the lowest for mail-order firms.  Started in 1912 by hunting enthusiast Leon L. Bean on the whim that a sportsman ought to have the state of the art, the company has tried to be the standard bearer in quality.  It didn't get off to a good start.  Ninety of the first 100 pairs of boots sold were returned because the soles fell off.  But since then, Bean has gone to legendary lengths to make good.  Often, Bean's employees meet vacation-bound customers at highway tollbooths to deliver hiking or camping equipment.  One time, Bean drove a van 500 miles from Maine to New York getting a canoe to a customer leaving on a boating trip.  Service like this, though costly, will continue, says David Garvin, the Harvard professor hired to help reduce returned goods and service expenses.  "It's a good way to retain a customer for life," he says.  To reduce problems, Bean hopes to improve communication with both suppliers and customers.  Recently, for example, Bean received 999 pairs of dark green rubber boots from a vendor.  But it had ordered light green boots with a narrower heel and toe, as pictured in its catalog.  "These are the kinds of things we'd like to cut back on," says a Bean spokesman.  "It's a good thing we're not a publicly owned company.  We don't have to worry about earnings," says Mr. Gorman.  He declined to disclose profits.  But insiders put 1988 after-tax earnings at about 7% of sales, up from about 6% two years ago.  Cutting mail-order goods returned won't be easy.  Industrywide, roughly 15% to 18% of basic apparel shipped is returned, according to a survey by Kurt Salmon Associates, a consulting firm in New York.  Fit is a big problem.  To cut returns in basic apparel and in shoes -- another big business for Bean -- consultants say the company must set up uniform sizes for customers and vendors.  Another problem is known in mail-order jargon as bracketeers: shoppers who order, say, three of the same item in different sizes or colors, and return two after trying them on.  Only a small percentage of merchandise is returned because of defects, Bean says.  A few years ago, the company recalled 25,000 of its Oxford shirts because the yoke in a few shirts ripped.  Only a handful of shirts were returned following the recall.  Nonetheless, everyone received a new shirt -- on the house.  Sir James Goldsmith, trying to rebut criticism of his #13.2 billion ($21.9 billion) bid for B.A.T Industries PLC, is telling investors the bid is less leveraged than it looks.  In lunches and dinners with institutional holders during the past two weeks, Sir James has argued B.A.T could repay the #11 billion takeover debt within a year by selling its paper, retailing and financial-services businesses.  He contends the strategy would leave a tobacco company with only an average debt load.  The Anglo-French corporate financier also maintains that his investor group, which includes British financier Jacob Rothschild and Australian businessman Kerry Packer, wouldn't get 31% of the profits for nothing because they are committed to putting #870 million into the deal.  Sir James needs to put the best face on his group's share of the profits to woo institutional investors.  Held in London at brokerage James Capel & Co. and at hotels in both Glasgow and Edinburgh, Scotland, the sessions illustrate how much power a group of about 50 money managers wields over bids in Britain.  Typically, the bidder and the target conduct an elaborate debate over the company's future, which institutions then decide.  Although British takeover rules bar him from going beyond the outlines of his July 17 proposed offer, Sir James has persuaded some investors that he not only is charming and intelligent, but serious about his B.A.T crusade.  "He was trying to take the moral high ground, talking about his concepts about unbundling conglomerates, while trying to paint the B.A.T management as lacking his breadth of vision and resorting to spoiling tactics," said one money manager.  "I was more impressed than I thought I would be," said another.  "He's very charming, very enthusiastic.  The charm is one of inner vitality."  Most attending the meetings asked not to be identified.  To bolster his case, Sir James also cited a study by U.S. accounting firm Price Waterhouse & Co.  He said the study, which he didn't distribute, showed that three public companies he has controlled all outperformed B.A.T.  The British congolomerate is defending itself based on its long-term record.  The takeover battle, the world's second biggest, proceeds at a glacial pace by U.S. standards.  Sir James must make his formal offer by Aug. 8.  He then has 60 days to buy more than 50% of the stock, and then another 21 days -- or until around the end of October -- to remove any remaining conditions.  In some investor meetings, Sir James acknowledged one of his biggest challenges is winning approval from state insurance commissioners in the U.S. so he can sell B.A.T's Farmers Group insurance unit within that timetable.  B.A.T spent seven months pursuing those state approvals during its hostile bid for Farmers last year.  But Britain's takeover panel, which referees such battles, might force B.A.T to drop its opposition efforts in the U.S. unless shareholders approve, Sir James has said.  Under British rules, target companies can't act to frustrate an offer without a shareholder vote.  In Britain, Sir James hopes to counter the perception that the bid is heavily leveraged because B.A.T is using that argument to lobby for an investigation on public-interest grounds by Britain's Monopolies and Mergers Commission.  Such an inquiry would block the bid temporarily.  At meetings with B.A.T investors, Sir James has compared the debt financing the takeover to a short-term "bridge loan," that would be repaid once the asset sales are completed.  But some investors have pointed out the remaining tobacco company also might remain deep in debt if Sir James doesen't get the prices he expects for the assets or if he has to raise his current bid substantially.  A few institutions declined to attend the meetings.  "We don't require anyone else to tell us why we made the investment," said one money manager in Scotland.  He added, "You get these accusations you have to countercheck, and you spend all your time running back and forth."  Although B.A.T hasn't made the same sort of organized effort yet to court share holders, one former colleague of Chairman Patrick Sheehy said he believes Mr. Sheehy soon will contact them -- but privately and with less fanfare.  As if movie producers haven't spent enough money advertising this summer's flicks, they're experimenting with a brand new marketing wrinkle: the telephone.  Moviemakers have discovered interactive 900 numbers, and they're quietly testing them with some of the summer's hottest movies, including "Indiana Jones and the Last Crusade," "Star Trek V: The Final Frontier" and "Great Balls of Fire."  The phone numbers are included in some print ads for the movies.  Callers are invited to play interactive games with the movie's characters, to enter sweepstakes and, of course, to run, don't walk, to the nearest theater.  Toll telephone services have mostly been the stuff of pornography lines and of children's horror-story and Santa Claus lines.  But movie marketers hope they can use the lines to entice potential moviegoers, especially teen-agers and young adults.  The phone lines can be used, too, to track down the caller's phone number and address -- giving movie companies access to demographic information about their audience.  Even better from the marketer's point of view: The calls cost money, so marketers can break even or even turn a profit, in effect charging people to be subjected to advertising.  Typical of the new services is the Indiana Jones line, which costs $2.50 for a two-minute story.  Callers are greeted by a rather tinny version of the Indiana Jones theme music, followed by an announcer booming: "Hello Dr. Jones.  We need your help to get through some exciting new adventures."  Callers are then asked to press a number to choose an "adventure" and to key in numbers again to make choices such as whether to raft or to swim across a raging river.  Listeners can write in to get prizes like T-shirts or posters, and a new Indiana Jones phone line will revolve around a $25,000 sweepstakes.  The phone lines are "for teens, for young adults, for the movie-going audience.  We want to get them involved in the story line," says Michael J. Ellman, president of West Coast operations for D.L. Blair, a sales promotion company that worked on Indiana Jones and other films.  "The purpose is to create more interaction with the movie, a feeling of what the movie is about.  We want to encourage them to see the movie, and see it more than once."  But it isn't clear how far movie companies can go with their new marketing plaything.  They already risk raising the ire of consumer groups riled up over toll lines geared towards children.  Parents nationwide have complained about children running up hundreds of dollars of calls to the Easter bunny or to services like the "Slime Line."  Sen. Howard Metzenbaum (D., Ohio) has threatened to propose legislation curtailing phone lines advertised to children.  While the movie lines say they are geared towards older teens, they are advertised on MTV and cable stations watched by younger children, too.  To combat the critics, Interactive TeleMedia, a Los Angeles-based firm specializing in 900 numbers for the entertainment business, has come up with a system to block multiple calls.  Its system would allow a movie line, for example, to accept only a certain number of calls from a single phone number.  Interactive has worked with Paramount, Lucasfilm and others, but so far hasn't used the blocking system.  "The abuse has been in sex lines and gab lines, and we don't have either.  We've had absolutely no complaints," says Barclay Lottimer, vice president of sales and marketing.  Still, the lines are far from a sure thing, and it's too soon to say if they even work.  While 900 numbers have been around for several years, interactive 900 numbers, allowing callers to punch in numbers to identify themselves or to play games, have only been available since February.  Orion's "Speed Zone," a racing-car flick, was the first film to try the new technology, with a number allowing callers to choose, for example, which turn to take in a car race.  Since then, Paramount's "Star Trek V" and "Indiana Jones" have followed, while Orion's "Great Balls of Fire" has experimented with a 900 number in a very limited way.  So far, though, most of the phone lines have been disappointing.  Interactive's Mr. Lottimer, for example, says he expected to get more than one million phone calls on the "Star Trek" and "Indiana Jones" lines, which his company worked on, but response was in the "high six figures" instead.  He believes the problem was that the phone numbers were included as part of movie ads, instead of being advertised separately.  "What we have now learned is to treat it as a separate product," he says.  "People didn't see {the number}, or they didn't understand it."  The new "Indiana Jones" phone line, which is tied to the sweepstakes, will be advertised separately, in TV ads, "and we hope to get into the low seven figures on this," he says.  Yet if a phone line is too successful, it can prove equally problematic.  FDR Interactive Technologies, an American Express Co. affiliate that claims to be the largest interactive company, can answer 10,000 calls a minute, but says a blockbuster mass promotion could lead to even more calls than that.  "The key is to be able to handle those calls," says Ronald A. Katz, president and chief executive officer.  He says his company will be looking into movie lines, as well as record promotions in which, say, callers could hear a preview of a new Madonna song.  The drawbacks haven't prevented film marketers from continuing to dabble, if cautiously, in untested waters.  D.L. Blair is working on a 900 line to coincide with the Aug. 31 video release of "Bill and Ted's Excellent Adventure," a teen movie starring George Carlin as a time traveler.  A TV commercial plugging the line will run on MTV, and a long promotional spiel for the toll line will appear on the video.  Blair's Mr. Ellman says the company is also working on a 900 line to coincide with an animated Christmas video release and a major feature film for next summer.  Still, plenty of moviemakers are steering clear of the 900 number lines, wary of the sometimes sleazy reputation of the business.  Interactive's Mr. Lottimer says he has been rebuffed by several movie producers because "there's a great deal of negative connotation right now.  We're working a little uphill in educating people."  He adds, "We're trying to take it to the Fortune 500s of the world, not the four, five and six-year-olds of the world."  ---  Ad Notes. . . .   NEW ACCOUNTS: Trump Taj Mahal Casino Resort, Atlantic City, N.J., awarded its $12 million account to Levine, Huntley, Schmidt & Beaver, New York.  The Taj Mahal is Donald Trump's casino that's scheduled to open in the spring of 1990. . . .  Saatchi & Saatchi Advertising, New York, picked up the $7 million tourism account for Cancun, Mexico.  WHO'S NEWS: John Peebles, 39, was named executive vice president, creative director at EBW Advertising, New York.  Canadian Pacific Ltd. stock hit an all-time high in very heavy New York Stock Exchange composite trading Friday, buoyed by rumors that acquisitive British conglomerate Hanson PLC is accumulating shares.  But Canadian federal government officials said a foreign takeover bid for Canadian Pacific would likely be opposed by the government because of the company's key role in the Canadian economy.  Canadian Pacific was the fourth-most active stock on the Big Board Friday, closing at $23.375, up $1.375.  The company gained 11.3% last week, rising 10% Thursday and Friday alone.  Its stock was the most active stock on both the Toronto and Montreal stock exchanges Friday.  Combined volume in the U.S. and Canada was 5.5 million shares Friday, 13.3 million shares for the week.  At current prices, a takeover of the company would cost about $7.4 billion.  Both Hanson and Canadian Pacific declined to comment.  Another rumor that Canadian Pacific will restructure or pay a special dividend has been circulating recently.  Canadian Pacific said it doesn't know of any corporate developments that would account for the stock activity.  As well as owning one of Canada's two major railroads, Canadian Pacific has extensive oil and telecommunications interests, activities that the federal government has said should remain in Canadian hands.  "The company is a major player in the Canadian economy," said Herb Gray, opposition Liberal Party leader in the House of Commons.  He said he would personally oppose a foreign acquisition of Canadian Pacific and he predicted that politicians of all parties would also resist such a move.  He said a takeover bid for Canadian Pacific would be subject to review by several regulatory agencies.  If the government were to allow a foreign purchase of Canadian Pacific, Prime Minister Mulroney would be attacked for "selling out the country," one official said.  In 1982, the Canadian government through legislation moved promptly to prevent the Quebec government's pension fund agency, Caisse de Depot et Placement, from acquiring more than 10% of Canadian Pacific's shares.  Government policy is to keep Canadian telecommunications operations at least 80% Canadian-owned and to maintain Canadian ownership of financially viable energy companies such as PanCanadian Petroleum Ltd., which is 87.1%-owned by Canadian Pacific.  Analyst F. Barry Nelson, who follows both Canadian Pacific and Hanson for Louis Nicoud & Associates in New York, said if Hanson is accumulating shares in the company it doesn't necessarily signal that the British firm is contemplating a takeover attempt.  "Hanson has a long record of taking minority positions for investment purposes," Mr. Nelson said.  Mr. Nelson said investors may be grabbing Canadian Pacific shares now because the company "simply got left behind in the bull market."  He said that compared with U.S. railroad concerns that have diversified, Canadian Pacific is attractive.  "By U.S. standards . . . it's cheap," he said.  Australia's wool production is expected to rise 6.7% to a record 1,005,000 metric tons in the year ending June 30 from an estimated 941,900 tons in the year just ended.  Production in fiscal 1989 was up 2.8% from 916,438 tons a year earlier.  The Bureau of Statistics said it expects the number of sheep and lambs shorn in fiscal 1990 to rise 5.4% to a record 199.8 million from 189.5 million and that each sheep is expected to produce a record 4.7 kilograms (10.3 pounds) of wool.  Australia is the world's largest wool exporter, and wool is the country's biggest export.  Wool prices soared to record levels in 1988, encouraging expansion of the flock, but prices since have retreated.  Japan's first-half exports of cars, trucks and buses declined 0.1% from a year earlier to 3,060,742 units, the Japan Automobile Manufacturers Association said.  Exports fell 1.4% to 472,293 units in June, the third consecutive month of declines from a year earlier.  Association officials explained that many Japanese car makers have started production overseas, and that demand in the U.S. and European countries has stalled as the markets have become increasingly mature.  For example, first half-exports to the U.S. edged down 0.2% to 1,248,783 units.  Shipments to Europe as a whole declined 7.4% to 918,892 units, and those to the European Community alone dropped 6.1% to 678,109.  But exports to Southeast Asia were strong, climbing 18.3% in the six months to 260,387 units.  The Council for Economic Planning and Development approved a plan that targets economic growth to average 7% between 1990 and 1993.  To achieve the goal, the government will expand public investment to stimulate domestic demand, the council said.  Meanwhile, Taiwan must strive to increase economic liberalization and internationalization to narrow a huge trade surplus that totaled US$6.19 billion for the first half, up 36.1% from a year earlier.  In 1993, the trade surplus will shrink to US$5 billion, the council predicted.  It also reported that gross national product -- the value of the nation's output of goods and services -- will jump to US$200 billion in 1993 from US$144.6 billion this year.  Krug International Inc., an aerospace, life sciences, housewares and garden products concern, said its technology life sciences unit received a two-year federal contract extension to support space shuttle operations and space station research and development.  Krug valued the extension at $29.1 million, including professional and technical support services, and materials and subcontracts.  Pratt & Lambert Inc. said it has agreed to buy 271,800 shares, or 4.4%, of its common stock from LL Capital Partners L.P., a New York investment firm, for $16.68 a share.  The paintings, coatings and adhesives maker said the purchase follows a board resolution authorizing the purchase of as many as 300,000 shares.  Advanced Medical Technologies Inc. said it acquired the right to purchase up to 19% of Applied Immunesciences Inc., a therapeutics firm based here.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Advanced Medical also said it would make an investment in Applied Immunesciences, but it didn't say how much.  Ralph D. Schlesinger of Portland, Ore., said he sold a 23.5% stake in Comdial Corp.'s common shares outstanding.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, Mr. Schlesinger said he sold 4,224,404 Comdial common shares, his entire holding, July 11.  No reason was given for the sale.  Comdial, a telephone terminal equipment company, is based in Charlottesville, Va.  South African stock prices are seen edging higher in the short term, amid expectations of a moderate rise in the price of gold, which has a dominant role in setting trends in this market.  Most South African gold analysts are cautiously optimistic that the gold price has bottomed and won't see $360 an ounce again this year.  Views differ about the speed of bullion's likely recovery, but most analysts say investors should start looking outside the safe haven of blue-chip gold stocks.  Analysts see lower interest rates in the U.S. and relatively high inflation as positive factors for gold, with any weakening in the dollar's value adding to the rise.  "A sustained upward break through $385 would be the start of a bull market," says gold and platinum analyst John Clemmow of stockbrokers Mathison & Hollidge Inc.  South African platinum stocks have already discounted an expected rise in the metal's price, analysts say.  In addition, analysts say the slowdown in world diamond sales in the first half of 1989 means that earlier growth expectations need to be adjusted downward substantially.  Consequently, expectations of high profit by De Beers Consolidated Mines Ltd. in calendar 1989 need to be scaled down, they said.  Shares of industrial companies either with extensive overseas operations, or with substantial export business, have performed well this year as the rand plummeted against the dollar.  Analysts say that if the dollar shows renewed strength, this trend will continue for such rand-hedge stocks.  But the industrial board as a whole is expected to be moderately easier in coming months because of the South Africa's economic slowdown.  The industrial index hit new highs this month, improving on records achieved in April.  The latest high of 2680 was recorded Wednesday, and the index was unchanged at this level through Friday.  It closed Monday at 2676.  The index is expected to rise further in coming weeks.  The index, which was at 2452 at the end of March, has risen steadily in the past few months.  The gold index has fluctuated between 1586 at the end of March to below 1400 in the second half of May but has since been moving upward with mild fluctuations.  It topped 1600 last week but fell to close at 1574 on Monday.  On gold stocks, Mr. Clemmow advises investors to start switching from a defensive to an aggressive strategy, moving the bulk of their gold holdings into "offensive blue-chips," which are sound long-term investments but geared to the gold price.  More cautiously, Mark Madeyski, mining research director for stockbrokers Fergusson Bros.  Hall, Stewart & Co., advises investors to stay with the quality counters but place some of their holdings in "recovery stocks," which he defines as mines where the grade has room for improvement or which are low-cost producers but sensitive to the gold price.  The near-term outlook for other base metals is flat with the European summer holidays heralding a slowdown in demand.  Analyst Kevin Kartun of stockbrokers Simpson, McKie Inc. said this is likely to be followed by fairly strong demand despite expectations of a global economic slowdown.  Automatic Data Processing Inc., a data processing concern, said it acquired Automatic Business Centers Inc., Moorestown, N.J., which provides payroll services to 11,000 companies in the Northeast.  The price wasn't disclosed.  Automatic Data Processing has annual revenue of more than $1.5 billion.  Chevron Corp. said its chemical subsidiary signed a definitive agreement to buy the Plexo division of Amsted Industries for an amount that wasn't disclosed.  Chevron, an energy concern, said its unit agreed to buy seven of the Plexo division's eight plants.  The Plexo division makes polyethylene pipe and fittings and coated steel pipes, which are mainly used for natural gas transmissions and distribution lines.  Chicago-based Amsted is a closely held maker of industrial parts.  Thomas G. Osenton, 36-year-old publisher of Billboard Publications Inc.'s American Artist magazine, was named president and chief operating officer of this media and information concern's Sporting News Publishing Co. unit, succeeding Richard Waters, 63, who was named chairman and will continue as chief executive officer until Jan. 1, when Mr. Osenton is to assume the post.  Robert C. James, 46 years old, was named vice president for a newly created Cooperative Marketing Division in the company's United States Data Processing Group.  The new division is responsible for reseller and third-party software programs in the U.S. Mr. James was previously vice president in the Product Marketing and Support Division of the data-processing group.  Bruce C. Gottwald Jr., currently assistant treasurer, has been named treasurer of this chemical concern.  Mr. Gottwald, 31, will succeed Charles B. Walker, who will remain executive vice president and chief financial officer.  W. Ian Green, chairman and chief executive officer of this metal maker's Corken International Corp. subsidiary, was elected a director, succeeding John Hubbard, who resigned from the board June 30 after participating in a management buy-out of the Hinderliter Heat Treating Inc. unit.  Victor P. Compe was named president of the Westchester Community Lending division of this bank, succeeding Richard L. Gerloff, who died this month.  Mr. Compe had been executive vice president and senior lender at the division since May.  Matthew Hunter, executive vice president of this electric utility, was named to the additional post of chief operating officer, succeeding Charles Monty, who retired in April.  W. Nicholas Thorndike, chairman of the board of trustees at Massachusetts General Hospital in Boston, was named a director of this commercial printer, expanding the board to eight members.  While Hong Kong worries about its future after Britain hands the territory back to China in 1997, another British colony hopes to pick up some of the business Hong Kong may lose.  Gibraltar, building on three years of increasingly successful efforts to become an offshore financial center, seeks a status some officials describe as "a little Hong Kong in the Mediterranean."  With a population of 30,000, this rocky peninsula on Spain's southern coast is little indeed compared with Hong Kong and its 5.7 million inhabitants.  However, with no taxation for offshore business operations, no foreign-exchange controls, strict banking secrecy and a warm climate to boot, Gibraltar is viewed by an increasing number of foreign companies as an attractive alternative to such European tax havens as the Channel Islands or the Isle of Man.  The number of banks in Gibraltar has doubled since 1986, to more than 20.  Last year, Gibraltar banks' total assets rose 71%, to #1.2 billion ($1.97 billion) from #700 million at the end of 1987.  "There are golden opportunities, particularly with the unease over Hong Kong," says Roger Knights, managing director of Banco de Bilbao (Gibraltar) Ltd. Gibraltar, he believes, could be a "natural successor to Hong Kong."  Gibraltar has its own political problems.  Seized by Britain from Spain in 1704 during the War of the Spanish Succession, the enclave has been the object of repeated Spanish attempts to get it back.  But, in contrast with Hong Kong, Britain has made clear that it won't hand Gibraltar over to Spain against the wishes of the peninsula's inhabitants.  And with Britain and Spain allied in the North Atlantic Treaty Organization and the European Community, there isn't any threat of a military confrontation over Gibraltar.  For now, because of the Gibraltar government's rejection of anything smacking of a Spanish takeover, there is a lull in negotiations between Spain and Britain on the colony's future.  Politics on the peninsula itself also are no obstacle, at least for now.  Plans to turn Gibraltar into a financial center were launched under a since-deposed conservative government.  But the socialist administration of the current chief minister, Joe Bossano, has enthusiastically taken up the cause.  "The objective is to make Gibraltar financially viable," says Mr. Bossano, a former labor leader.  "You can only start thinking about political options once you have put your economic house in order and are paying your way."  There have been setbacks.  Last year's collapse of a British investment group, Barlow Clowes, and its Gibraltar subsidiary damaged the confidence in Gibraltar of many investors.  But the Gibraltar government reacted swiftly, tightening controls on local companies by establishing new powers of inspection.  Planned legislation would increase controls on investment firms by obliging them to obtain licenses.  The new legislation also would set up a watchdog Financial Services Commission, whose seven members would be appointed by the government from the financial sector.  "We want to have the industry involved in the policy," says Gibraltar's minister of trade and industry, Michael Feetham.  Poor communications and lack of office space and housing are still obstacles.  Telecommunications suffer from a shortage of lines.  "Trying to ring people internationally is frustrating beyond belief," says the manager of an investment company.  Meanwhile, a political dispute with Spain over a proposal for joint use of Gibraltar's airport has resulted in the shelving of plans for expanded air services.  But government officials say action is being taken to solve these problems.  One of Mr. Bossano's first moves after taking office in March 1988 was to launch an ambitious land program that has reclaimed a 75-acre site near Gibraltar's harbor.  Part of this is to be used for an office development with 648,000 square feet of space.  A telecommunications overhaul is expected to give Gibraltar an entirely digital system by April.  And according to Mr. Bossano, the government is discussing plans with private investors for expanding the airport.  As for immigrants from Hong Kong, Mr. Bossano says the government has had some "contacts" and is prepared to consider applications.  But, "obviously we are not going to be in a position to take millions," he adds.  Sales at Japan's major retailers rose 6.7% from a year earlier in June, to 1.449 trillion yen, as sales shook off the after-effects of the new consumption tax and returned to levels in line with those seen in months before the tax was introduced.  According to the announcement Thursday by the Ministry of International Trade and Industry, retail sales at major department stores were up 7.7% to 765.4 billion yen, while sales at supermarkets were up 5.6% to 683.8 billion yen.  Sales grew at levels of 5% to 6% in the first two months of 1989, then soared 24.8% in March as consumers rushed to buy things before prices rose in April when stores began collecting a 3% sales tax.  Sales leveled off in the next two months, rising 0.1% in April and 4.4% in May.  Your June 26 article "As FBI Investigates Rocky Flats Weapons Plant, Groups Accuse Energy Agency of More CoverUps" reported (a congressman's) allegations that the Lawrence Livermore National Laboratory has plans to build a weapons-grade plutonium production plant at Livermore and has concealed these plans.  These allegations are incorrect.  The research project at Livermore does not involve a capability for production and there are no plans to produce weapons-grade plutonium.  Planned work at Livermore is a continuation of work that began in the 1970s, and is focused on development and tests of hardware for a future plutonium-processing plant to be built in Idaho.  It is not necessary to make weapons-grade plutonium at LLNL in order to validate the process and there are no plans to do so.  The goal is evaluation of the hardware and the process, not production.  The research at Livermore has not been concealed.  It has been the subject of numerous articles in the local press for the past several years.  It has been described in many unclassified laboratory publications.  It has been presented at open hearings of congressional committees.  John H. Nuckolls  Director  Lawrence Livermore National Laboratory  Livermore, Calif.  Your July 10 editorial on health insurance and your article on auto insurance rates lamented high-cost insurance.  No substantive reasons were put forth to explain why insurance premiums continue to escalate.  Perhaps The Wall Street Journal should revisit, by editorial and analytical reporting, the reasons for and the background on why insurance companies enjoy exemption from federal antitrust statutes.  The McCarran-Ferguson Act of 1945 exempts the insurance industry from antitrust laws.  A cornerstone of journalism is its obligation to educate.  I suggest that you have an obligation to remind your readers that the power to regulate insurance companies resides with state insurance commissioners.  Hence, we have a nearly $400 billion industry accounting for about 13% of disposable income accountable to 50 separate insurance overseers.  The probability of consistency is illusive and ethereal.  As a retired physician, I remain convinced that the 50 state insurance commissioners cannot police the insurance industry as effectively as the federal government under antitrust authority.  Too much is at stake to believe otherwise.  I oppose federal regulations in principle, except where such a large amount of disposable income is at stake.  Bedford H. Berrey M.D.  Underwood, Minn.  Japan's Hitachi Ltd. said it will help South Korea's Goldstar Co. build a high-volume semiconductor factory in Korea, in what is believed to be the first major pact between semiconductor makers from the two nations.  The alliance comes as many Japanese producers nervously watch South Korean conglomerates pour billions of dollars into establishing their own semiconductor industry.  The world semiconductor business only recently recovered from a vicious price war triggered by Japanese overcapacity, and some analysts say the South Korean buildup could force prices down again -- hurting the Japanese just as they earlier bloodied U.S. companies.  The Hitachi-Goldstar contract also highlights recent efforts by semiconductor companies, in the wake of trade tensions, to blur national distinctions by linking up with competitors in other countries.  News of the agreement came just one day after Hitachi officially announced that it will jointly develop a high-speed microprocessor with Hewlett-Packard Co. of the U.S.  The Japanese company also has agreements with Texas Instruments Inc. and VLSI Technology Inc.  Hitachi said it will help Goldstar begin mass production of dynamic random access memories that store about one million pieces of information, known as one-megabit DRAMs.  The Japanese partner will provide technical consultations on equipment and layout, and provide manufacturing technology.  Apparently Hitachi isn't putting any of its own money into the plant.  A Hitachi spokesman said the company will get royalty payments from Goldstar, and may eventually buy chips from the South Korean company to sell under its own name.  The benefits are clear for Goldstar.  It was the first South Korean company to start making microelectronics, but it blundered by trying to produce more-sophisticated products.  It relinquished its lead to Samsung Electronics Co., which is making large quantities of DRAMs.  Analysts said the agreement makes sense for Hitachi as well.  While one-megabit DRAMs are the industry standard, Japanese producers are gearing up to produce chips that can hold four times as much information.  Hitachi apparently can guarantee itself a stable source of one-megabit DRAMs through Goldstar, while concentrating on the more complicated, more expensive four-megabit market.  Regarding your June 29 article "Demand for Hispanic Ads Outstrips Specialists in Field."  Would it be in order for you to editorialize on the need for one language -- and one language only?  We all have seen and heard of the problems arising from dual languages -- in Canada (Quebec) and other locations.  It would seem to be beneficial for our country to have one language only.  Just what is it with Spanish-speaking people that they demand we use "their" language?  Charles H. Badger  Chicago  It hasn't gotten as much attention as the rise of the Japan Socialist Party, but one of the most intriguing developments in the rapidly changing Japanese political scene is the emergence of a new quasi-political party organized by Japan's unions.  Representatives of Rengo no Kai, a political arm of the Japanese Private Sector Trade Union Confederation, or Rengo, won 11 seats in the upper-house parliamentary election on Sunday, defeating the candidates of the ruling Liberal Democratic Party in all of the single-seat constituencies where Rengo put up candidates.  The four major non-communist opposition parties cooperated by not running their own candidates against Rengo's in the 11 districts, but the extent of Rengo's triumph in the Diet vote still surprised analysts.  "Rengo's emergence as a political force is one of the most important developments of the election," says Kent Calder, a professor at Princeton University and an expert on Japanese politics.  Traditionally, Japan's unions lent their support to the Socialist Party, the Democratic Socialist Party or the Communist Party but had seldom run their own candidates.  The labor organization was set up two years ago with the merger of private-sector unions.  Rengo said its aim was to strengthen labor's influence on the government and thus "to realize Western European and U.S.-level living standards."  A spokesman for Rengo says the original policy of the confederation was to avoid getting too involved with politics.  But he said it has become difficult to stay out of politics, given Rengo's expanding influence in Japan. "{We} couldn't fulfill our responsibility if we hadn't been involved in the election at all," he says.  Rengo's thrust into politics is a roundabout way to help stop the slide of labor's influence in the workplace.  The annual wage offensive, known as "shunto," has been a fixture of Japanese labor relations since the mid-1950s, but management has had the upper hand in negotiations for about a decade.  This spring, for example, despite record profits posted by many Japanese companies, the average wage increase granted was about 5%, only one percentage point higher than last year.  The proportion of Japanese workers in unions has dropped to 27% from 56% in 1949.  Consequently, unions may be hoping to achieve through the political process what they've been unable to accomplish through negotiations with management.  And Rengo's influence could grow.  Government and other public-sector unions are scheduled to join the labor organization this fall, boosting Rengo's membership to more than eight million and giving Rengo control of all unionized workers except those affiliated with Japan's Communist Party.  Analysts say they aren't sure how much success Rengo no Kai, the political arm, will have in future elections, though.  That's partly because the new quasi-party has yet to clearly define its policy aims.  Shoichi Nakagawa, a Diet member who belongs to the LDP, says, "{We} don't know what Rengo wants to do but as far as their young members are concerned, there isn't much difference in philosophy from ours.  As they aren't supporters of Marxism, we can talk with them."  Instead of focusing on policies, Rengo explains its role mainly in tactical terms, saying it wants to coordinate policies among opposition parties.  And indeed, political analysts say Rengo could have a considerable impact on Japanese politics as the "glue" holding the non-communist opposition parties together.  Hideo Yamauchi, professor at Keio University in Tokyo, says Rengo is "a new breed of political group that is not conservative and not reformist, pursuing efficacy so it can be an adhesive to tie up various political parties."  Even in that role, however, analysts say it's too early to judge how much contribution Rengo can make.  Kaoru Okano, a professor at Meiji University in Tokyo, says if Rengo doesn't secure seats in the lower house of parliament in the next election, its political infuence will be diluted.  As a China specialist who has lived some length of time in Beijing, I was surprised by A.J. Robinson's modest criteria the Chinese government should meet before American companies renew investments there (Manager's Journal, June 19).  Mr. Robinson believes a "stable and productive environment" has been re-established already -- at least in Shanghai.  In fact, the current calm is enforced by guns, intimidation and crude propaganda.  All of the causes of the recent turmoil -- inflation, corruption and lack of basic human freedoms -- not only remain, but grow more acute daily.  The longer public order is maintained through repression, the more violent may be the next explosion of popular discontent.  This inherently unstable situation should instill caution in any foreign investor, especially considering the dubious profitability of many Chinese-foreign joint ventures even before the recent upheaval.  A further risk American companies must now weigh is the harm to their public images in Chinese-American communities if they show too much friendliness to the current regime.  Mr. Robinson says American investors will not return to China until "the safety of our expatriate workers can be guaranteed."  Would not profitable operations require that the safety of Chinese employees be guaranteed as well?  Finally, Mr. Robinson urges the Chinese government to issue invitations and assurances to foreign business partners and overseas Chinese.  Rest assured: The Propaganda Department of the Communist Party has done this for many years, and is sure to continue.  Foreigners who recently have witnessed the party's domestic misinformation campaign, however, may well not be impressed when they are targeted for persuasion.  Robert Kleinberg  Assistant Professor  Department of Political Science  University of Kansas  Lawrence, Kan.  Regarding the article "Merrill to Move 2,500 Workers to New Jersey" (June 28): If Merrill Lynch unwaveringly continues to be bullish on America, it's certainly within its optimistic province to be bullish on Jersey City, meanwhile maintaining its hold on the Wall Street area.  Heading an underwriting group for a State of New Jersey bond issue, for example, is just as opportune as heading one for the Big Apple.  Marketability of a municipal-bond issue is no respecter of geography-bond credit ratings notwithstanding.  So, let crusty Mayor Edward I. Koch take umbrage at this move by depriving the top-flight investment firm of being the leading underwriter of New York City bond financing.  Mayor Koch's loss is Gov. Thomas Kean's gain, not to mention Merrill Lynch's.  William S. Pfriender  Spring Lake, N.J.  A new bomb-detecting device about to be installed in several airports is being greeted by the aviation industry with mixed emotions.  The thermal neutron activation device, or TNA, as it is called, costs $1 million, is big and bulky, emits radiation and can be set off by a salami.  "TNA, as such, we think is too big, too slow, too heavy, too costly," says Richard Lally, vice president for security at the Air Transport Association, a trade group for U.S. air carriers.  "But," he adds, "it does detect bombs."  Earlier this month, the Federal Aviation Administration proposed requiring airlines to purchase and install updated bomb-detecting equipment in airports in the U.S. and abroad in an effort to combat terrorism.  TNA, developed by Scientific Applications International Corp. of San Diego, Calif., is the only bomb-detection device in the production stage that is capable of handling airport baggage volume.  Transportation Secretary Samuel Skinner has hailed the first-of-its-kind device as "the highest degree of explosion detection currently possible."  The FAA, which has poured $15 million into developing TNA, has bought six units to use in U.S. airports and one foreign airport.  The first is expected to be installed at New York's John F. Kennedy International Airport by next month.  Gatwick International in London is scheduled to receive a TNA unit in September.  The FAA pinpointed 40 "high risk" airports here and abroad where U.S. air carriers will be required to install TNA or comparable bomb-detection devices.  The agency estimates that 400 units will be needed to provide adequate security at those locations.  The airlines will have to pay for most of the new security systems beyond those first six units.  The large number of machines is necessary because it takes about six seconds for the bulky machine to scan a bag.  Airports with large baggage volume -- Kennedy Airport processes 76,000 bags for international destinations daily -- will need numerous machines to keep baggage moving and avoid flight delays, a spokesman for the Air Transport Association says.  TNA works by bombarding objects with neutrons that detect concentrations of the nitrogen compounds found in all plastic explosives.  When the chemical compound is present, an alarm sounds and the questionable bag is automatically removed from the system's main flow.  Bombs, however, aren't the only things that will set off TNA's alarm.  Other highly nitrogenous material such as salami or a hunk of cheese could trigger an alert.  These possibilities mean a 4% false-alarm rate, or an average of 20 bags per widebody flight.  The FAA, though, isn't concerned.  "You are going to have a certain false-alarm rate with any machine," says Fred Farrar, an agency spokesman.  Another glitch, according to a report prepared for the Nuclear Regulatory Commission, is that the TNA unit leaves some items such as gold and salty foods slightly radioactive.  Also, employees working near the machine risk radiation exposure equal to that of workers in a conventional nuclear facility, the report said.  "There are very clearly concerns about people being exposed" to radiation, says Art Kosatka, director of technical services for the Airport Operators Council International Inc., an aviation-industry trade group.  But Hadi Bozorgmanesh, a Scientific Applications vice president, says radiation emitted from TNA is small and below acceptable federal standards.  TNA has been tested briefly at airports in San Francisco and Los Angeles at the FAA's request, and some aviation officials question if those trials were adequate.  "We want to make sure the systems we are putting in are going to meet the desired effect," says Spencer Dickerson, vice president of the Airport Executives Association, a group representing top airport officials.  Mr. Dickerson says his group is already concerned that airlines have to shoulder the cost of new anti-terrorism equipment when acts of terrorism are generally directed at government policy.  Other bomb-detecting devices are under development.  Close behind TNA in the race is Thermedics Inc. with a device that "sniffs out" explosives.  There are two versions: a hand-held version for luggage, and a walk-through type for passengers.  SecurScan, the people scanner, has been contracted by the FAA, and so far $4 million has gone into its development.  But company officials estimate it will be another two years before the device goes into production.  The hand-held version, called Egis, is at the production stage.  The State Department, concerned with the safety of U.S. embassies and military bases, invested $7.1 million for the development of Egis.  The units, costing $125,000, have a relatively slow scan time of 15 seconds per bag.  Because of that pace, the FAA has shown only lukewarm interest in using the device in the U.S., but seven systems have been ordered by foreign companies for airports abroad, Thermedics says.  Thermedics officials are pushing the Egis in airports as a complement to the TNA system.  David Fine, a company vice president, says using both devices would greatly increase the chances of bomb detection.  "Neither is going to solve the problem" alone, he says.  "You need both."  Egis could well end up in U.S. airports as a back-up system for the TNA, says Lowel Malotky, an FAA security-development official.  The effect, he says, would be like "wearing a belt with suspenders."  Britain's biggest banks kick off their half-year earnings season today amid expectations of flat to modest profit growth.  Trends spotted in February's 1988 full-year results are expected to show up even more clearly in 1989's half-year earnings.  Domestic competition is intensifying, costs are still rising, interest margins are being squeezed further, and high U.K. interest rates have contributed to a slowdown in personal lending.  But even more important, analysts are expecting a big increase in provisions against problem debt from poorer countries, which will be a main factor dulling profit growth.  The increases primarily will reflect higher provisions against interest and principal from Argentina.  "Underlying profitability will be flat to modestly up because of tougher conditions in the U.K. market," says Terry Smith, an analyst at James Capel.  He adds, however, that the figures are difficult to predict because "no one knows what the banks will do about LDC {less developed country} provisions."  Lloyds Bank PLC kicks off the earnings season today.  National Westminster Bank PLC follows next Tuesday; Barclays Bank PLC's results are due Wednesday; and Midland Bank PLC closes the Big Four results Thursday.  Lloyds' first-half pretax profit is expected to range between #444 million ($736.6 million) and #555 million, according to a survey of nine U.K. bank analysts.  The range compares with pretax profit of #452 million in the first half of 1988.  All pretax profit estimates take loan provisions into account.  The Lloyds results will reflect, for the first time, the bank's link with Abbey Life Group PLC late last year.  Lloyds took a controlling 57.6% stake in the U.K. insurer, and in return, Abbey Life took over five of Lloyds' personal financial services businesses.  Among the others, Natwest is expected to post pretax profit between #700 million and #770 million, compared with #702 million the year before.  Barclays' pretax profit is forecast to rise to #693 million to #768 million from #642 million the year before.  Midland's pretax profit is expected to land between #300 million and #360 million, compared with #313 million the first half of 1988.  Argentina's continuing arrears on interest payments to commercial banks, which totaled $3 billion at the end of June, will lead banks to raise their provisions against interest.  The arrears are also expected to boost the South American country's score on the Bank of England's matrix, which determines the level of provisions banks should set aside against principal.  Michael Lever, analyst at Smith New Court, estimates Lloyds' first-half provisions will be #112 million, compared with #48 million in the first half of 1988; Natwest, #44 million, compared with #6 million; Barclays, #70 million, compared with #18 million; and Midland, #110 million, compared with #90 million.  Mr. Lever's estimates assume Lloyds, Midland and Natwest will boost provisions against Argentinian principal to slightly more than 50% of exposure.  Barclays is expected to boost its principal provisions to around 56% of exposure.  Mr. Lever and other analysts say it is possible the banks may wait until the end of the year to make the bulk of this year's provision increases.  Rod Barrett, an analyst at Security Pacific-Hoare Govett Ltd. and one of the most bearish toward provisions, predicts that in addition to an increase in normal provisions this year, the four will take exceptional charges on provisions by the end of the year.  He predicts total 1989 problem-country debt provisions of #625 million for Lloyds, #245 million for Natwest; #320 million for Barclays and #735 million for Midland.  Mr. Barrett says his forecasts also reflect continuing arrears by Venezuela, higher provisions against Mexico, and uncertainty about Brazil, which has a large interest payment due in September.  Telemarketing Travail  Get yourself a mailing list  And try to follow through,  Call each and every company  And here's what's said to you:  "That phone is disconnected."  "He is no longer here."  "The company was sold today."  "We're moving to another sphere."  "That person's on vacation."  "I'm sure he doesn't care."  "If I need you then I'll call you."  "You said you were from where?"  -- Julie Lubash.  ---  Mystery Solved  The neighbors thought the family next-door had moved, but it was just a case of a bridge nut being married to a golf hound.  -- Arnold H. Glasow.  Heading for higher profit on the back of a two-year-old corporate expansion, Viag AG has recently been touted as a potential takeover target for foreign or domestic raiders.  The share price of the energy, chemical and metal company has surged 44% on the Frankfurt exchange since the beginning of the year, boosted by takeover hopes and the market's approval of Viag's acquisition strategy.  In the same period, the DAX index, which tracks 30 West German blue-chip stocks, gained only 16.5%.  Last month, Viag said it would buy Kloeckner & Co., a trading company, from Deutsche Bank AG.  This will propel Viag into new business areas, may double revenue and is certain to boost earnings.  Moreover, the outlook for the company's traditional business points to further steady growth, analysts said.  And Viag, like other West German electricity producers, will profit from a Franco-German agreement that will let it process spent fuel rods for nuclear reactors at a much lower price than initially planned.  "I don't see any clouds for Viag on the horizon at the moment; it's a very good company," said Beate von der Seipen, a stock analyst who tracks West German companies for the London-based brokerage firm of Enskilda Securities Ltd.  A July study of Viag by Schroeder, Muenchmeyer Hengst & Co. also is bullish.  Predicting a "further substantial boost" in Viag earnings power in the next few years, the Frankfurt private bank gives Viag stock a "buy" recommendation.  Market insiders said diminishing West German reluctance to join the world-wide merger-and-acquisition game is drawing increased attention to the company.  "Viag's capital is relatively widely spread, there are no large shareholders, no voting-rights limitations: You can see right away what would be possible there," said Harald Gruber, an analyst with BHF Trust Management Gesellschaft fuer Vermogensverwaltung G.m.b.H. in Frankfurt.  Viag has checked with rumored suitors, but hasn't found any evidence it is a takeover target, said Werner Lamby, a Viag management board member.  But partly to counter any such move, Viag has strengthened cross-ownership ties with Bayernwerk AG, a Bavarian utility 40%-owned by Viag.  Bayernwerk last week raised its Viag holding to 24.9% from 15%.  The rest of Viag's shares are spread over a large number of investors.  Even if a hostile takeover threat doesn't materialize, Viag's recent stock performance may be well-deserved.  Company officials acknowledged Viag's earnings outlook is bright and said the company is well-prepared for the barrier-free market the European Community plans for 1992.  "If it proves to be correct that 1992 will provide even more chances and if political stability is maintained (in West Germany), I would see the immediate future as all in all positive," Mr. Lamby said.  Analysts predict Viag's per-share earnings will rise to about 35 marks ($18.58) this year from 30 marks in 1988, and Mr. Lamby said he didn't rule out an additional five marks a share when Viag next year adds most of Kloeckner to its books; it is said to be paying between 500 million marks ($265.5 million) and 600 million marks.  Per-share earnings will be diluted by a recent one billion-mark capital increase, but comparison with adjusted year-earlier figures will continue to show a steady earnings rise, analysts said.  Viag's 1988 profit rose 15% to 219 million marks from 191 million marks a year earlier; sales rose 12% to 9.47 billion marks from 8.44 billion marks.  Kloeckner will represent a new trading business area for Viag as growth prospects in traditional industrial sectors are being overshadowed by the strong expansion of the services sector.  "High growth in capital investment in Western Europe has leveled off quite a bit," Mr. Lamby said.  "What we have to do now is make sure that the general trend towards market orientation and services is nurtured and that it'll play a bigger role."  BHF's Mr. Gruber said the service-oriented Kloeckner will help Viag, with its cyclical core businesses, to respond more flexibly to ups and downs in the economy, and stabilize earnings.  In its chemical and aluminum operations, Viag has been diversifying and shifting more of its resources into higher value-added products.  The aluminum sector, which accounted for 53% of Viag's 1988 total sales, has excellent 1989 prospects, Mr. Lamby said.  In electricity operations, Viag is relatively well-shielded from oil price swings, because more than 40% of its electricity output is generated by nuclear power.  The outlook for the chemical sector, which contributed 18% of Viag's total 1988 sales, also is favorable.  Viag has expanded in traditional chemical operations, and moved into construction chemicals through the purchase of Chemrex Inc. of the U.S., Mr. Lamby said.  It stepped up metallurgical activities through acquisitions in West Germany, the U.S., Britain and the Netherlands.  Viag's expansion also has focused on aluminum operations, in its Vereinigte Aluminium Werke AG. Viag has increased smelting capacity through the purchase of a 20% stake in a Canadian smelter that is being built.  The company also is effectively adding a line, refractory products and industrial ceramics, by boosting its stake in Didier-Werke AG to 49% from 27%.  The U.S.-backed international debt strategy won't succeed unless big banks continue to lend to heavily indebted countries, bankers and debtor-country officials said.  This is because the debt strategy has been modified to focus somewhat less on reducing the amount of debt outstanding and relatively more on seeking new bank loans for debtor countries.  It also emphasizes cutting interest payments more than reducing debt principal.  The Philippines, which appears likely to be the next country to reach a settlement with its bank creditors, is seeking $1.7 billion in new bank loans.  It may prefer to borrow more from banks rather than spend months wrangling over a complex and uncertain debt-reduction agreement, according to some bankers and officials.  The country, which has enjoyed inflation-adjusted annual economic growth of about 5% or more the past three years, is set to resume negotiations with its bankers in New York on Aug. 8.  It already has agreed to an economic program with the International Monetary Fund.  The proposed settlement Mexico reached with its bank creditors last Sunday demonstrates the importance of continued bank lending.  The agreement gives bank creditors three basic options: cutting back interest payments, reducing debt principal or lending further funds.  If it is to work well, holders of as much as 20% of the Mexican government's $54 billion in medium-term and long-term debt will have to opt to make further loans, bankers and Mexican officials said.  Without sufficient foreign bank credit, Mexico and other debtor nations won't have enough foreign exchange to meet their foreign obligations.  Some debtor countries, though, still would like to slash their foreign debt principal in single transactions.  Venezuela last week proposed that its banks take either a 50% reduction in debt principal or a 50% cut in interest payments on the country's approximately $20.5 billion of medium- and long-term foreign bank debt.  The country's debt negotiators also proposed to set aside $800 million to buy back old loans at a discount, and it recommended that bank creditors convert second-quarter interest payments to long-term debt.  Venezuela's bankers rejected the country's proposal, saying in a brief note that the offer was "unilateral, involuntary and retroactive."  The note urged the Venezuelans to think again, and also exhorted them to bring their interest payments to banks up to date.  Those arrears probably now total hundreds of millions of dollars.  The Venezuelans say they are disappointed with the banks' reaction.  "We have presented a market-oriented approach," said Edgard A. Leal, the country's chief debt negotiator.  "The only way we can solve our financial {problem} is with a reduction of 50% in our bank debt and no new money," he said.  Unlike other big Latin American borrowers, Venezuela has received practically no medium- or long-term bank loans since 1983.  And, unlike other big Latin borrowers, it has paid back large amounts of debt principal over the past five years.  Venezuela also expects to process as much as $600 million a year through debt-for-equity swaps, Mr. Leal said.  These transactions allow creditors to exchange foreign currency loans for local currency with which they can make prearranged equity investments.  The Venezuelans apparently have received $2.7 billion of applications for debt-equity swaps from their creditors.  Christopher Stainforth, an official of British securities house UBS-Phillips & Drew, resigned Thursday, the latest casualty following last week's publication of a government report into the 1987 Blue Arrow PLC rights issue.  The Department of Trade and Industry report severely criticized officials of National Westminster Bank PLC and its investment banking arm, County Natwest, for their conduct in handling the rights issue.  It also criticized officials of Union Bank of Switzerland's Phillips & Drew, which acted as Blue Arrow's brokers and helped underwrite the issue, which flopped.  Mr. Stainforth, an executive director of corporate finance at Phillips & Drew, was one of four officials who received the greatest criticism in the report.  These officials were criticized for "misleading the market," by being responsible for a news release that indicated the bulk of the share issue had been sold in the market, when in fact County and Phillips & Drew retained a substantial stake in Blue Arrow.  New York investor George Soros and Quantum Overseas N.V. said they reduced their stake in Wolverine Exploration Co. to 1.4% of the common shares outstanding.  A Securities and Exchange Commission filing, Quantum sold 372,089 Wolverine Exploration common shares from July 14 to July 19 for $5.75 to $6.44 each and 51,788 warrants from July 18 to July 21 for $2 each.  As a result of the sales, Quantum and Mr. Soros together control 135,000 remaining shares, assuming exercise of warrants.  No reason was given in the filing for the sales.  Wolverine Exploration is based in Fort Worth, Texas.  It's been a long, hot summer in the civil-rights industry, though not in the way one might expect.  The groups chartered to empower black Americans have instead dedicated their moral capital to destroying a symbol of that empowerment.  Who would have believed it?  Certainly not the intended victim, William Lucas, who is George Bush's choice to be assistant attorney general for civil rights.  Bill Lucas is both astounded and offended by the campaign of leaks and smears against him.  With a Senate vote still pending, he understandably won't comment on the motives of his opponents.  But an hour of conversation does reveal some of his frustration at being turned upon by civil-rights leaders who, he naively thought, would support a role model of black achievement.  "I was deeply offended that the organizations, people who know very little about me, could be so personally negative in their reactions to me," he says in his soft-spoken style, more sad than angry.  "They don't want to have the me that exists.  They want to create a straw man."  The unstraw Bill Lucas is more interesting -- raised in Harlem, orphaned at 14, a cop who put himself through Fordham Law at night, father of six (three doctors), one of the first blacks in the FBI, the first black undersheriff of Wayne County, Michigan, surrounding Detroit.  Unlike Jesse Jackson, who keeps changing his mind about Bill Lucas, he has actually won an election -- four times as sheriff and then county executive.  "That's real," he says of his 61 years.  "These are the kinds of sacrifices that someone sitting very comfortably behind a desk can't understand."  The civil-rights establishment celebrates only litigators, but what about the work of the foot-soldiers, the "first black cop on the beat, the black man who goes into an industry first?"  These contributions, he says, "may not be as important, but they ought not to be denigrated, ought not to be sneered at."  The critics accuse him of lacking litigation "experience," though lobbyist/critic Ralph Neas was happy last month to endorse Evan Kemp for the same job.  Mr. Kemp, a commissioner of the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and policy ally of Mr. Neas, is also not a litigator. (Mr.  Neas and hypocrisy are old friends.) The "not-qualified" charge, says Mr. Lucas, is "the kind of judgment that was used against blacks in the 1960s."  Though Mr. Lucas is too politic to say so, it's exactly his independent success that frightens the civil-rights elite.  Having made it on his own, he owes them nothing.  He will think for himself.  Detroit's black Democratic establishment has ostracized him since 1985, when he switched parties, he says,"recognizing that there would be some price to be paid."  The civil-rights elite may also suspect that Mr. Lucas would pursue a broader agenda than their own cramped remedies of lawsuits and government coercion.  Not that Mr. Lucas is another Brad Reynolds, the brilliant Reaganite who fought affirmative action.  Like George Bush, Mr. Lucas won't repudiate either minority set-asides or affirmative action.  But he also wants to focus on people who "are suffering for taking risks every day . . . who can't walk in their neighborhood . . . who are paying a crime tax in everything they do," he says.  "That's a violation of their civil rights.  They have the poorest schools.  That's a violation of their civil rights."  Mr. Lucas wants all minorities to move "into the mainstream.  That's where the empowerment is."  To civil rights leaders wedded to lawsuits, special treatment and federal paternalism, this talk is rank heresy.  So they will go to the mat to destroy him.  Yesterday the Judiciary Committee delayed its vote on Mr. Lucas until Tuesday, though a full Senate vote could still be postponed until September.  Delay gives his tormentors more time to leak "news" from raw FBI files, a la John Tower.  Even if he loses in committee, Mr. Lucas and the administration both say they'll take the fight to the Senate floor.  No matter the result, he figures his ordeal will have been worth it if it inspires debate about "whether there's room for different opinions" in the civil rights movement.  At least by September Mr. Lucas won't be the only target.  The civil-rights crowd is already trolling for muck about Clarence Thomas, the black Yale Law grad and Reagan administration official nominated to the U.S. Court of Appeals.  Nan Aron, of something called the Alliance for Justice, is privately circulating a 12-page bill of indictment, accusing Mr. Thomas of such crimes as "a pro-employer bias" and "opposition to affirmative action/goals and timetables."  To lobbyists like Ms. Aron, Mr. Thomas is especially threatening because after serving on the federal bench he'd be qualified for the Supreme Court; success by a black who owes them no allegiance is intolerable.  The civil-rights movement has accomplished all it has because the majority of Americans believed its fight for non-discrimination was fundamentally just.  The more its establishment leaders have clamored for special treatment, however, the more they've abandoned public support and relied on moral intimidation.  With their campaign to destroy Bill Lucas and Clarence Thomas, they've now demonstrated that their efforts have less to do with minority advancement than with political power -- their own.  Mapco Inc. said one of its units agreed to acquire 37 retail outlets in Nashville, Tenn., from National Convenience Stores Inc. Terms weren't disclosed.  The unit, Mapco Petroleum, operates 251 stores called Delta Express.  The purchase of the Nashville stores "is part of an aggressive program to grow our retail presence in the Mid-South area and bring gasoline sales in balance with production at the Memphis refinery," said W.J. Hart, president of Mapco Petroleum.  V.H. Van Horn, president and chief executive officer of National Convenience Stores, which operates 1,142 stores, said "We do not have enough stores in the {Nashville} market to pursue our marketing strategy, which involves extensive advertising, on a cost-effective basis."  Proceeds from the sale to Mapco will be used to pay down bank debt, he added.  National Pizza Co., which was unsuccessful in its tender offer for Skipper's Inc. earlier this year, said it's still interested in acquiring control of the company.  In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, National Pizza said it plans to propose to acquire Skipper's in a negotiated acquisition "at an undetermined time in the future."  According to the filing, National Pizza has raised its holdings in Skipper's to 9.4% of the common shares outstanding.  It holds 252,500 Skipper's common shares, including 148,500 shares bought from June 7 to July 26 for $8.3875 to $9.05 a share.  National Pizza, based in Pittsburg, Kan., indicated it would only acquire Skipper's in a negotiated acquisition.  Skipper's is based in Bellevue, Wash.  Fluor Corp. said its Fluor Daniel Inc. engineering and construction unit received two contracts, one in Canada for $210 million and the other in Ohio for an amount that wasn't disclosed.  The Canadian contract is for the unit's hydrocarbon sector to provide engineering, procurement and construction services for a methyl tertiary butyl ether facility in Edmonton, Alberta, for Neste Oy, Finland's national petroleum company.  The project should be completed by late 1991, Fluor said.  The second contract is for the unit's power sector to provide engineering, procurement and construction management services for Dayton Power & Light Co. of Ohio.  The project is expected to be completed by December 1990.  Fluor is is an engineering and construction company with investments in coal and lead.  A federal study has found a sharp decline in college-completion rates of high-school graduates in the 1980s, raising concerns that a long period of rising U.S. educational attainment has ended.  The study, which tracked 25,000 high-school graduates in three separate years, determined that the class of 1982 gained post-secondary diplomas at a rate less than half that of the class of 1972.  Four years after graduation, 15% of the 1972 class had a bachelor's degree, versus only 7% of the 1982 class.  A smaller college-educated segment of the population could be a serious drag on future living standards because of the strong correlation between income and education.  "If what we're going to see is a decline in degrees awarded, these results are pretty startling," says Henry Levin, director of the Center for Educational Research at Stanford University.  Mr. Levin adds, "There is an inexorable rise in the qualifications being demanded of job applicants" in the economy.  A smaller, but still significant, falloff was found among the study group seven years after high school.  Of the 1972 seniors, 25% had at least a bachelor's degree within seven years, versus only 19% of the high-school class of 1980.  Historically, there has been negligible bachelor's-degree completion after seven years.  The study, which was conducted by the U.S. Department of Education and released in May, didn't attempt to explain the decline in college completion.  But the drop was so marked that the department is considering asking a group of academics to help it determine possible causes.  Among the more likely explanations for the drop-off, education analysts say, are higher college dropout rates and a stretching-out of the time it takes average students to complete college.  Although college enrollments increased during the period covered by the study, many of the added students were part-timers or enrolled in two-year colleges.  If the decline continues -- and isn't offset by other factors such as more students getting degrees later in life -- it could mean a reversal in a trend of better-educated Americans that goes back at least to the turn of the century.  In 1910, only 2.7% of Americans over 25 had a bachelor's degree.  In 1970, the figure was 11%; in 1988, 20.3%.  It would take several years for lower attainment levels to show up in the overall adult population figures.  "What the {Education Department} has reported is enormous by any social standard," said Vincent Tinto, an education professor at Syracuse University who studies college dropouts.  Noting that educational attainment fell more sharply in the study for blacks, Hispanics and poor students, Mr. Tinto said, "We're running the risk of having a more bipolar, stratified society than we have now."  The study also found a sharp decline in the completion of post-high-school diplomas of any kind, including two-year degrees and vocational programs.  Only 18.8% of the class of 1982 had some kind of diploma four years after high school, versus 45% of the class of 1972 and 23.6% of the class of 1980.  Seven-year rates fell to 37.3% for the class of 1980, from 58.2% from the class of 1972.  Universities have been concerned for some time about a tendency of students to take longer to complete their studies.  The average college graduate, Mr. Tinto says, now takes slightly over five years to earn a baccalaureate, up from 4.5 years in 1972.  One reason is affordability.  With college prices soaring, more students have been forced to attend part time or take extended breaks during their school careers for employment.  But that alone can't explain the changes in the study, analysts say.  Dennis Carroll, head of the Longitudinal Studies Branch at the Education Department, says a bigger factor may be the students who drop out.  In one recent study, the Education Department found that about half of the 1980 college freshmen weren't enrolled anywhere four years later.  "This was never there historically," says Mr. Carroll.  "Persistence {toward a degree} is dropping like a rock."  But many academics remain unconvinced that higher education has a problem with rising dropouts.  "We don't know of any trend going on . . . that more people are failing to complete," says Patricia Smith, a researcher for the American Council on Education.  Ms. Smith says the council doesn't have a good explanation for the Education Department's findings.  Nevertheless, Mr. Tinto says he's sure attainment levels have fallen.  He says money problems forced some students to drop out.  What's more, he says that a well-publicized glut of college graduates in the 1970s persuaded many people not to pursue four-year degrees.  Lewis Solmon, dean of the education school at the University of California, Los Angeles, has another explanation: "As the baby-boom bubble has declined, colleges have been under tremendous pressure to recruit people, so they lowered their admissions standards," he says.  "But once the students get in, they can't hack it."  One puzzling question is why the number of bachelor's degrees awarded hasn't reflected the trend in the study.  In 1975-76, the school year four years after the high-school class of 1972's graduation, 925,746 bachelor's degrees were issued.  But in 1985-86, the year in which the Education Department surveyed the lower-attaining high-school class of 1982, the number of bachelor's degrees was up to 987,823, with negligible change since.  John Bolvin, the dean of the College of General Studies at the University of Pittsburgh, says this may be a hopeful sign.  He suspects that a rising number of nontraditional older students have been getting degrees, even while fewer current high-school graduates finish college within a traditional time frame.  But others doubt whether these offsetting factors can be sustained indefinitely.  The logic of the idea "that we would go on just having higher levels of college-educated people may have not been very sound," says Mr. Tinto of Syracuse.  "We may be seeing the beginning of a saturation level."  The Washington Times "gives us heel-nipping competition," says Leonard Downie, managing editor of the Washington Post.  Lately, though, the nipping by the Times (daily circulation: 103,652) has managed to keep the Post (circulation: 812,419) jumping.  "We feel like an expansion baseball team on a 10-game winning streak," says Wesley Pruden, managing editor of the conservative Times.  "We're a little like a supertanker," says the liberal Post's Mr. Downie.  "Our sheer size makes it difficult sometimes to turn around.  We got off to a slow start."  This isn't exactly the Pentagon Papers or Watergate; the battle between these two newspapers has been fought the past month over a little scandal involving homosexual "call boys," credit-card fraud, a midnight tour of the White House and social climbing and influence peddling by a classic Washington hustler who seems to have vanished.  The opening salvo was fired June 29 when the Times, owned by members of the Rev. Sun Myung Moon's Unification Church, charged, in a banner front-page headline, that "Homosexual prostitution inquiry ensnares VIPs with Reagan, Bush."  The paper said the prostitution ring's clients included "key officials" of the two administrations, plus military officers, congressional aides "and U.S. and foreign businessmen with close social ties to Washington's political elite."  Many of the clients, the paper said, paid for the services of their "call boys" with American Express, Visa and MasterCard credit cards.  Most of these services were fraudulently billed through a funeral home.  A typical billing was "cremation urn, $150."  The Times reported, ominously, that it had carefully examined hundreds of these credit-card vouchers but would disclose only the names "of those found to be in sensitive government posts or positions of influence."  All of official Washington, agog at the possibilities, waited for the names.  But the "key officials" turned out to be the ones named in the original story: a one-time personnel officer in the Reagan administration and a political liaison employee in President Bush's Labor Department.  The only other client named by the Times was its own assistant managing editor, a former minor official in the Reagan White House.  "When {Times reporter} Paul Rodriguez turned up with that suitcase full of vouchers, just about the first one that tumbled out was our own man," says Mr. Pruden.  "We accepted his resignation."  The Times surged back into action the next day, a Friday, with a page-one story that introduced Craig J. Spence, TV reporter, lobbyist, and self-promoter.  The Times said its cache of credit-card vouchers indicated Mr. Spence paid as much as $20,000 a month for male prostitutes.  That is more than the $12,000 a month he received from one of his lobbying clients, the Policy Study Group, a Tokyo-based non-profit organization seeking to promote Japanese business interests in the U.S.  Some of the more sensational Japanese papers have given the Spence story big play.  More than most great world capitals, Washington is a rootless city, with no established social order.  Mr. Spence, unheralded, set up shop here, and in no time at all, it seems, established himself as a host to such celebrity media figures as Ted Koppel, Eric Sevareid, and William Safire.  And, yes, one of the guests at his $345,000 house in the tony Kalorama part of town was Arnaud de Borchgrave, editor of the Washington Times.  Mr. Spence asked these well-known, successful people to dinner, and when they came, he showed them off to his business clients.  When Mr. Spence popped up in the Times that Friday, the editors at the Post, for the first time, were intrigued.  "We'd never heard of him," says Mr. Downie.  Benjamin Bradlee, the Post's executive editor, stepped in, demanding full coverage.  Mr. Downie instructed Mary Hadar, editor of the Style section, to work up a major profile of Mr. Spence, who is nowhere to be seen these days.  She assigned a Style reporter to the story.  But the reporter, like almost everyone else in town, disappeared for a long Fourth of July weekend.  "I'd have asked someone else to be assigned to the story if I'd known that," says Mr. Downie.  The profile finally appeared July 18.  Meanwhile, back at the Times, there was gloating all around.  Mr. Pruden, in his regular column, speculated that the reason the Post was showing "scant appetite for such a blockbuster story is that {Post Chairman} Katharine Graham doesn't want to embarrass her dinner-party A-list, which was, of course, Craig Spencer's dinner-party A-list."  Worst of all, the Post's in-house critic, ombudsman Richard Harwood, in his regular July 9 editorial-page column, lambasted the Post for "complacency and arrogance" in allowing a week to pass before making "any serious effort to even check out the yarn."  The column infuriated Mr. Downie, the managing editor.  "For the first time since I've been in the job," says Mr. Harwood, "he blew up at me."  Mr. Downie argues that the Post wrote about the prostitution ring in May and that a story, in answer to the Times' disclosures starting June 29, appeared in the Post's metro section July 1.  That story indicated the scandal was basically about credit-card fraud.  Slowly, the editors at the Post began to turn the big supertanker around.  On July 12, they ran a front-page story disclosing that Mr. Spence had given an $8,000 Rolex wristwatch to a uniformed Secret Service officer at the White House, whom they identified as Ronald A. deGueldre.  The story also reported that Mr. deGueldre admitted to the Secret Service that he stole several pieces of the Truman china collection from a White House pantry and gave one plate to Mr. Spence.  But, the Post said, Mr. deGueldre denied to its reporters he had stolen any china.  Apparently unchallenged is the Times' disclosure that Mr. deGueldre led Mr. Spence and a group of his friends, including two male prostitutes, on a midnight tour of the White House.  The Secret Service is continuing its investigation of the activities of Mr. deGueldre and at least one other uniformed officer.  Other investigators are focusing on Henry Vinson, a West Virginia mortician who came to Washington two years ago and established control of the homosexual "escort service."  The editors at the Times admit the Post was first with the report on the Truman china, but they won't concede the Rolex.  "We had the watch first" in a July 6 story, says Mr. Pruden.  Besides, he adds, "they {the Post} got deGueldre's name wrong."  His first name is Reginald, not Ronald.  That was cause for some more public gloating.  In its "Inside the Beltway" column on July 18, the Times said, "Ronald was the old guy {President Reagan}, asleep upstairs."  Chips & Technologies Inc. said net income for its fiscal fourth quarter ended June 30 rose 60% to $10.1 million, or 65 cents a share.  Sales increased 43% to $61.8 million from $43.4 million in the year-earlier period.  For the fiscal year, Chips & Technologies earned $33 million, or $2.23 a share, on sales of $217.6 million.  A year earlier, it earned $22.1 million, $1.54 a share, on sales of $141.5 million.  The company attributed the robust results to strong demand for its CHIPSet group of microchips.  Wellco Enterprises Inc. said the "extended" delaying of a U.S. Defense Department contract for military combat boots could cause reduced sales in its second quarter ending Dec. 31.  The footwear maker didn't specify how much the delay caused by a competitor's challenge of Wellco's small business status would probably decrease sales in the period, or its impact on earnings.  Wellco said the Atlanta regional office of the U.S. Small Business Administration has initially upheld the challenge.  In addition, Wellco has appealed the decision to the administration's Size Appeals Board, and no awarding of the contract will be made until the appeal procedure is concluded.  The company said it didn't know the amount of the contract.  Wellco's net income in its third quarter ended April 1 fell to $689,000, or 79 cents a share, from $767,000, or 89 cents a share, in the year-earlier period.  Premark International Inc. said it expects to report a "modest decline" in 1989 profit in the wake of higher raw material costs, unfavorable foreign exchange rates and the unexpectedly high costs of restructuring its Tupperware manufacturing operations.  Premark wouldn't elaborate on its projection.  Earlier, the consumer products maker expected to report higher earnings for the year.  In 1988, Premark posted net income of $105.3 million, or $3.03 a share, on sales of $2.397 billion.  The net figure included a debit of $15.9 million for an accounting adjustment.  Premark lowered its earnings projection after reporting that second-quarter net dropped 23% to $23.7 million, or 68 cents a share, from $30.8 million, or 89 cents a share, a year earlier.  Sales rose 11.1% to $657.9 million from $592.2 million.  MEMOREX TELEX Corp., Tulsa, Okla., said it offered $400 million of 13 1/4% senior guaranteed notes due 1996, and $155 million senior variable-rate guaranteed notes due 1996, both priced at par.  The maker of computer equipment said proceeds will be used to reduce senior debt.  Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. managed the offering.  INDIANA MICHIGAN POWER Co., a Fort Wayne, Ind., subsidiary of American Electric Power Co., Columbus, Ohio, said it will redeem two series of cumulative preferred Oct. 1.  The utility said it will redeem 30,000 of its 77,325 shares outstanding of 12% series cumulative preferred and 160,000 of its 691,900 shares outstanding of $2.75 series cumulative preferred under terms of sinking funds established for the retirement of the two series.  The redemption price is $100 a share for the 12% series preferred and $25 a share for the $2.75 series.  First Chicago Trust Co. of New York is the redemption agent.  Ethnic tension in Central Asia this summer has led to the deaths of hundreds -- Christian Armenians and Georgians and Moslem Azerbaijanis, Meskhetian Turks, Kazakhs and Uzbeks.  While this ethnic tension is evidence of a profound social crisis, it has obscured a parallel, more fundamental process taking place throughout Soviet Central Asia: A democratically oriented, urban-based political movement is emerging to speak for the voiceless millions of Moslem Turkic peoples of the Soviet Union.  There are about 50 million Soviet Turks, including 17 million Uzbeks, six million Azerbaijanis and seven million Kazakhs.  The leaders of this national movement are mobilizing not around Islam but around their long-suppressed Turkic culture, as a recent visit to Azerbaijan, Uzbekistan and Kazakhstan reveals.  Although there is a modest revival of Islamic religious schools, and mosques are reopening throughout Central Asia, Stalinism and six decades of Soviet rule have created deep ruptures with the Islamic past.  Even the mystical Sufi brotherhoods, once the center of Moslem resistance to Russian rule, have become largely unpolitical.  Their adepts do little more today than officiate at ritual circumcisions, weddings and funerals.  Religious thinking has been virtually extinguished, and the link to the religious thought of the past, sundered by Stalin's two forced changes in the local alphabet: from Arabic first to Latin and then to Cyrillic.  Nothing more clearly illustrates the trend toward secularization than the recent visit to predominantly Shiite Azerbaijan by Ali Akbar Rafsanjani.  The Iranian parliamentary speaker was greeted by a crowd of only 3,000 when he visited Baku's main mosque.  Increasingly, the Turkic peoples of the Soviet Union are becoming aware of their common heritage and are seeking to bridge what they regard as an artificial gulf imposed upon them by the policies of Stalin and his successors.  There is a growing awareness among young Azerbaijanis, Uzbeks and Kazakhs that they are part of a great pan-Turkic continuum.  As one Azerbaijani journalist puts it, "the older generation regards itself as Moslem.  Younger people think of themselves as Turks."  One new radical group, the regional PanTurkic Birlik ("Unity"), seeks to unite Soviet Turks, as one activist told me, "to create a counterweight to Russian dominance."  Kazakh writers in Alma-Alta speak dreamily of the "Great Tamerlane," the 14th-century Turkic warrior and unifier, lamenting the fact that the history of the Turks is suppressed in Soviet textbooks.  "We {also} know next to nothing about the Ottoman civilization or of the glories of Suleiman the Magnificent," one Kazakh leader notes.  "Our heroes are treated as barbaric criminals while the most brutal Russian czars are glorified," says Sherhan Murtazayev, editor of the 700,000-circulation literary weekly Kazakh Adebiyeti.  In Uzbekistan, copies of contraband journals from Istanbul are passed from hand to hand.  There, too, writers lament that Soviet Turks are cut off from their brothers in independent Turkey.  From Baku in Azerbaijan and Tashkent in Uzbekistan to Alma-Ata in Kazakhstan, an identical pattern is evident -- that of Russian preeminence.  In each of these cities the gap between the haves and the have-nots is increasingly one between Russians and the native Moslem population.  In Baku, a sprawling shanty town of 200,000 echoes the misery that is to be found in the Azerbaijani countryside.  The authorities have no constructive program for eliminating this slum.  Instead they've opted to hide the miserable squalor behind a high wall.  In Uzbekistan, the focus of discontent is the cotton industry and the widespread exploitation of child labor in cotton fields, which often exceed Soviet standards for pesticide and fertilizer toxicity by more than 50 times.  In many rural settings, Uzbek infant mortality rates are above 100 per 1,000 births, about five times the rate in the European part of the Soviet Union.  This is due in part to the poor health care facilities and in part to the poisoned environment.  Hepatitis is rampant, attacking more than four million Uzbeks in the past year, according to leaders of Uzbek activist groups.  Urban life, too, is filled with misery.  In Tashkent, the only Central Asian city to boast its own subway system, the vast majority of Uzbek families live alongside goats in tiny one-room, fly-infested dwellings, eight or 10 to a room.  More than a million adult Uzbeks are jobless.  Official population figures for 1989 show that the Soviet Turkic nations are continuing to grow at a rapid rate.  In the past decade the population of Azerbaijan has lept by 17%.  In Uzbekistan the growth rate over the same time period was nearly 30% and in Kazakhstan, the population has swelled by 13%.  By contrast, the population growth among Russians over the same decade has been slight.  The Turkic intelligentsia, aware of the growing numbers and potential power of its disenfranchised peoples, is mobilizing.  Azerbaijan's Popular Front has grown to 17,000 members since it was launched last August.  It maintains close links with the protest leaders who organized meetings of as many as half a million Azerbaijanis last November and has earned the quiet support of the Shiite mullah, Sheikh ul-Islam.  The group is led by democratically oriented activists such as historian Leyla Yunusova, a tiny, bespectacled woman in her mid-30s who has played a leading role in trying to defuse tension between Azerbaijanis and their Christian neighbors, the Armenians and Georgians.  Sitting in a 16th-century caravansary, newly converted into a cooperative restaurant, she speaks of the massive military force called out last November to stop huge protests and of the near-constant police surveillance of activists since then.  Although the Azerbaijani Popular Front has sought dialogue with the authorities, it has met with unremitting hostility from the corrupt Azerbaijani Communist elite.  At an April 18 meeting with the the front, Azerbaijani Communist Party First Secretary Abdur Rahman Vezirov pointed to the 16 leaders of the movement and ominously noted: "If this were Stalin's time, you'd all be shot."  In Uzbekistan, the local popular front, Birlik (this is separate from the regional Pan-Turkic Birlik), has grown even more quickly.  Launched in November, it has more than 300,000 members and has conducted demonstrations of tens of thousands of people in Tashkent.  Its aim is to make Uzbek the republic's official language.  It too is led by an awakening urban intelligenstia.  The Kazakh intelligensia are organizing more cautiously.  They are focusing on environmental issues and nuclear testing in their republic.  Local Communist authorities in Uzbekistan and Azerbaijan continue to reject dialogue with the moderate national movements.  They appear to be more comfortable with suppressing anarchic communal violence than with seeing discontent channeled into peaceful political protest.  Leaders of the Central Asian national movement fear that there is a design in this policy: to ride the current wave of anarchic ethnic violence to a crackdown on all the national movements pressing for decentralization, autonomy or independence.The leaders of the popular fronts of Uzbekistan and Azerbaijan maintain that the vast preponderance of the communal violence is fueled by the Turkic peoples' immense poverty.  "If the authorities don't move quickly to alleviate poverty, there will be hundreds of such riots," says Nuralli Kabul, director of the Uzbek Children's Publishing House.  "Where there is poverty there will be revolution."  Despite their early success, the leaders of the Turkic national movements confront huge obstacles.  The vast majority of their peoples are rural and are therefore cut off from the possibility of influencing urban political life.  Moreover, there is still a great deal of confusion about ethnic identity.  Are they Uzbeks or Azerbaijanis or Kazahks?  Are they Moslems?  Are they Turks?  What is not confusing is that the titular nations of the Central Asia republics are not masters of their own fate.  They are predominantly poor, badly educated and in poor health.  And as their numbers grow so does their political potential.  ---  Mr. Karatnycky, an editor of the Soviet Nationality Survey in London, directs research and publications for the AFL-CIO's department of international affairs.  Nissan Motor Corp. employees handed the United Auto Workers a humiliating defeat, rejecting by a 2-to-1 margin the union's bid to represent workers at the company's assembly plant here.  The vote concluded a bitter and divisive campaign considered by many to be a referendum on the adaptability of Japanese management techniques to the U.S. work force.  The campaign also was seen as a key test of the union's ability to organize Japanese-owned U.S. plants, which are building more and more of the cars made in America.  Workers voted 1,622 to 711 against UAW representation.  Before the vote UAW officials conceded privately that they expected to lose, but they were surprised by the large margin of defeat.  The union had convinced more than half the plant's workers to sign cards seeking a representation election.  In the end, it received only 30% of the votes, barely enough to qualify for an election under federal law.  Nissan officials said the UAW's organizing drive failed to give the workers a substantive reason to support a union.  The union focused its campaign around what it characterized as a fast-paced assembly line and resultant work injuries.  In the final two weeks of the campaign the union broadened its attack to include wages and benefits, but those already are comparable to what is paid at plants organized by the UAW. Also, Nissan workers earn 37% more than the average manufacturing wage in mid-Tennessee, and the plant has operated since it opened in 1983 without a single layoff.  "The UAW was never able to establish an issue within the plant," Jerry Benefield, Nissan's plant manager, said at a news conference after the votes were counted.  "I'm more convinced than I ever have been that the UAW is never going to organize this plant."  Workers at the plant build Nissan's Sentra car and a compact pickup truck.  UAW officials issued a brief prepared statement blaming their loss on "the company's sustained anti-union campaign," that created a "climate of fear," within the plant.  The union added that it will continue efforts to organize the plant, though that may be a face-saving statement on the part of union President Owen Bieber.  Mr. Bieber recently won re-election to a three-year term by beating back a spirited challenge by dissidents advocating more militant dealings with auto makers.  But the weak showing at Nissan after an enormous commitment of union resources -- including 30 professional organizers -- is sure to damage his prestige.  Labor experts saw the defeat as a significant setback for the UAW.  It certainly won't end the union's role as a significant force within organized labor.  But if the UAW is to reverse its decade-long slide in membership, which is the key to power and prominence, it must be able to organize Japanese-owned U.S. "transplants."  Currently the UAW has succeeded in organizing only the three assembly plants where Japanese companies build cars with or for U.S. auto makers.  The four non-UAW plants are owned and operated solely by Japanese companies.  Organizing them will be difficult, though perhaps not impossible in the long run.  "I don't think this dooms the UAW's efforts to organize the transplants," said Harry Katz, a labor professor at Cornell University.  "The UAW has too much at stake to give up."  Indeed, the union's bargaining clout stemmed from its ability to negotiate virtually the same contract throughout the auto industry.  But the UAW's failure to organize Japanese plants, while retaining its hold on Big Three factories, "does represent a cost disadvantage for the U.S. auto industry," said David N. McCammon, Ford Motor Co. vice president for finance.  The disadvantage might stiffen the resolve of the Big Three to resist UAW demands in next year's national contract bargaining.  Mr. Katz said the union stands a better chance at organizing the Kentucky plant owned by Toyota Motor Corp., or the Indiana joint-venture plant owned by Isuzu Motors Ltd. and Fuji Heavy Industries Inc.  Toyota could be an easier target because it makes cars jointly with General Motors Corp. in Fremont, Calif., Mr. Katz said; Isuzu is 40%-owned by GM. Toyota says it will neither support nor oppose a union, which is a far different stance from Nissan's stridently anti-union posture.  But the Nissan vote marks the second embarrassing end to a UAW organizing effort at a Japanese plant in recent years.  In late 1985 the UAW withdrew its petition for an organizing election at Honda Motor Co.'s Marysville, Ohio, plant just weeks before the vote was to be held.  Federal law prohibits the UAW from calling for another election at Nissan for a full year after the vote.  But the company faces the task of reuniting a work force divided by an often-bitter campaign.  It is a crucial task as Nissan prepares for a $490 million expansion that will boost the plant's capacity 80%, to 440,000 vehicles a year.  Mr. Benefield, who was met with a chorus of "union, union" from pro-UAW workers when he addressed employees earlier this week, tried to start the healing process.  He said he already has asked the anti-union forces to be humble winners, and the union supporters to be good losers.  "All our employees are good employees," Mr. Benefield said.  But the campaign was openly divisive.  The UAW bought half an hour of air time Sunday from a local television station to air a pro-UAW program.  Instead of criticizing the Japanese system that pushes workers to continuously improve productivity, the union stridently criticized the U.S. managers who run the plant.  Nissan countered with an aggressive campaign inside the plant.  Through its closed-circuit television system the company aired slickly produced messages that equated the UAW with job layoffs and portrayed the union as an "outsider."  Nissan refused to give an inch on health and safety issues.  It consistently maintained that it had fewer injuries than similar plants, but defied a state order to disclose its injury records because, as Mr. Benefield put it, "the UAW wanted them."  Two weeks before the vote, Nissan officials held a series of meetings with small groups of employees that UAW workers said were damaging to their campaign.  Neither side would disclose how much money it spent in the campaign.  Is it possible that Boeing Co., a company not known for its thick skin in regard to criticism, has turned into a good sport?  A 214-page book teeming with embarrassing tidbits about the aerospace firm is circulating, and Boeing has done naught to stifle it, even though it's the work of a former Boeing P.R. man.  In fact, the company bought 300 of the first 3,000 copies of "Boeing Trivia" -- and even handed some out at the recent Paris Air Show.  One of the vignettes tells of how Boeing misplaced an enormous Pratt & Whitney engine.  While managers squabbled with Pratt over who goofed on the shipment, a Boeing employee set about loading in his car the empty crate he had bought from the company for $2. (Employees often bought them.  "They made excellent play houses, dog houses" and had other uses, the author, Carl Cleveland writes.)  Unable to budge the container, the employee peeked inside.  "We better report this to the boss," he said to a friend.  Another tale recounts the maiden flight of the first passenger jetliner, the 707, in the late '50s.  With a planeload of press photographers flying alongside, the 707's landing gear wouldn't retract.  Thinking quick, Boeing's photo chief managed to have the 707 fly beneath the press plane for a shot or two.  Photographers were none the wiser, and a two-page picture of the new plane -- as seen from above -- appeared in Life magazine three days later.  The dapper, 86-year-old author concedes he's slightly amazed at the company's response.  "I haven't had a single negative reaction," Mr. Cleveland says.  Mr. Cleveland's persona -- along with the fact that many of the stories took place long ago -- seems to have kept Boeing from griping.  "Carl was sort of a legend around here in his own right," says Harold Carr, vice president of public relations.  It could also be that even the racy anecdotes are tame by today's standards.  Take the story of how fellow execs played a joke on T.A. Wilson -- known as "T" -- after he boasted about the office shower that came with his promotion to president in 1968.  His colleagues asked to see it after a meeting, and in showing it off Mr. Wilson opened the door to find a young woman, "clad in a bath towel wrapped tightly around her well-designed body," who squealed: "Oh, hi, T sweetie."  The proliferation of double-stack container trains is igniting a rate war between truckers and railroads, benefiting shippers with lower freight rates.  More than 100 double-stack trains, which carry one container loaded above another, now ply the nation's long-haul east-west freight routes each week, compared with a handful five years ago.  Double-stack rates between Chicago and Los Angeles dropped 15% in the past 12 months, as freight-hauling capacity continued to grow amid a slowdown in demand.  Some analysts expect rates to fall further when additional trains are launched.  The transcontinental freight routes have become "extremely competitive," says John Koons, president of Country Wide Transport Services Inc., a truck company.  Double-stack trains are "taking a lot of freight that used to be routed via trucks."  More broadly, the double-stack trains are "increasing the efficiency of U.S. freight transportation and the competitiveness of U.S. manufacturers," says Gerard McCullough, deputy director of transportation studies at Massachusetts Institute of Technology.  The rate cutting affects long-distance east-west freight flows of more than $10 billion a year.  Some analysts estimate that the industrywide rate drops spurred by double-stack competition are saving U.S. consumers between $500 million and $1 billion a year.  Among the biggest rate cuts are ones on the busy Chicago-Los Angeles corridor, where rates for some carriers plunged from about $1,500 for some of the bigger containers two years ago to $1,200 to $1,000 now.  Proctor & Gamble Co. recently shifted some of its business away from trucks to double-stack trains because of the rate cuts and improvements in double-stack service.  The company now ships 20 container loads a week of potato chips, peanut butter and liquid detergent from its Midwest plants to the West Coast by rail.  In response to shipper defections, some truckers are slashing rates.  Others are courting shippers further away from the major double-stack terminals.  A few are fleeing transcontinental routes, focusing instead on shorter regional deliveries.  Country Wide is moving its headquarters from Pomona, Calif., where double-stack competition is keen, to Knoxville, Tenn.  MNX Inc., a St. Joseph, Mo., trucker, is redeploying trucks to less competitive routes in the Southeast.  Recently, MNX bought a shipping broker to gain access to the fast-growing double-stack market.  Another trucker, CRST Inc., Cedar Rapids, Iowa, shelved plans to buy 50 more trucks, blaming rate declines.  "We're barely making money," says John Smith, president of CRST.  "We're doing everything we can to keep costs down."  For decades the nation's railroads seemed helpless against trucking companies that siphoned off their most lucrative freight, leaving the rails with low-rated bulk traffic.  They fought back with piggyback -- transporting highway trailers on flatcars -- but managed to win freight mainly from their own boxcars.  Double-stacks represent the "first concrete example of a new rail intermodal technology taking traffic off the highway," says Lee Lane, intermodal executive director of the Association of American Railroads.  By some estimates, double-stacks are capturing U.S. freight shipments of more than $100 million a year from trucks.  By stacking two containers on special rail cars, railroads nearly double train capacity and cut rail costs 25%.  The double-stack trains carry containers in low-slung, bathtub-shaped wells that provide a smoother ride than piggyback trains.  American President Cos., an Oakland, Calif.-based ocean ship line, launched the first coast-to-coast double-stack train in 1984.  It was originally designed to speed international cargo off the company's ships on the West Coast to inland destinations.  But to balance the heavy flow of Asian imports on its eastbound trains, the company solicited domestic freight to fill containers that would have returned empty to the West Coast.  Later, American President expanded its trains to carry domestic freight in both directions.  "Our international freight volumes gave us the base to create a domestic freight system," says Donald Orris, president of the company's domestic freight unit.  Other ship lines, and the rail units of CSX Corp., Burlington Northern Inc. and Santa Fe Pacific Corp., have launched their own double-stack trains.  Now they are trying to lure U.S. domestic shippers to use the the trains by ordering thousands of large-capacity containers, expanding terminals, speeding up train schedules and reducing rates.  Currently, domestic freight accounts for about 30% of the cargo on double-stack trains and the business is growing rapidly.  CSX and American President have begun to dispatch their own company trucks and drivers, rather than relying on independent drivers, to move containers between shippers' loading docks and their railheads.  That will eliminate some shipment delays, they say.  And American President is refunding freight charges when it fails to deliver on time.  Double-stack operators are also making organizational changes, hiring executives from the trucking industry, for example.  "The rails have finally realized after trial and error that to be competitive with truckers you have to think and act like a trucker," says M. McNeil Porter, a former trucking company executive who is president of CSX's CSL Intermodal unit.  Some shippers aren't likely to shift freight to double-stack trains any time soon.  "Motor carriers cover more routes, give better service and their transit time is less," says Peter Brock, transportation manager of J.C. Penney Co.  The trains are restricted, particularly in the East, by bridge and tunnel clearances.  And shipper surveys rate trucks higher than rail intermodal service in reliability, speed, door-to-door delivery and customer responsiveness.  But 3M Corp., Campbell Soup Co. and General Electric Co.'s appliance division have recently switched some shipments to double-stack trains from trucks.  One reason Procter & Gamble switched some of its freight to trains from trucks is that "they use less fuel and create less pollution and that's good for the country," says Fred Morris, the company's transportation director.  Nabisco Foods Co. also plans to divert certain shipments to double-stacks because the company is concerned about the growing shortage of long-haul truck drivers.  "We're trying to protect ourselves by putting as much freight on rail as we can," says William Ditoro, transportation director of the RJR Nabisco Inc. unit.  "We're trying to wean ourselves off trucks."  Hoyt Ammidon Jr., 51 years old, was named president of this investment banking and brokerage firm's U.S. unit, Cazenove Inc.  He succeeds T.M. Steel, 37, who returned to the London office as a partner involved in U.K. brokerage operations.  Mr. Ammidon had been a senior vice president of the U.S. operation.  Richard L. Schall, 59 years old, former vice chairman of Dayton Hudson Corp., was named to the board of this hardware and automotive distributor, increasing the board to eight members.  Manufacturing plant managers are growing less optimistic about the economic outlook.  Dun & Bradstreet Corp.'s latest survey of 1,500 plant managers found that the group's expectations for increased production, new orders and overall demand "dropped sharply" for the third quarter.  The survey had shown a strong positive surge in the second quarter.  Moreover, the survey found that optimism also has declined about the next 12 months.  "The silver lining in the forecast is the absence of any upward pressure on inflation," said Joseph W. Duncan, vice president, corporate economist for D&B, a business information and services company.  He said increased competition, a stronger dollar and the uncertain direction of interest rates "have clearly dampened plant managers' expectations."  The survey queries opinions on existing and expected conditions in factories, including production levels, new orders, costs and prices, and perception of overall demand in various industries.  The results are calculated into an optimism index, the percentage of plant managers expecting increases less those expecting decreases.  For the third quarter, the production index fell to 29 from 48, while new orders (50 to 29) and overall demand (51 to 31) also fell about the same amount.  The index for selling prices fell to 20 from 34, and unit labor costs fell to 17 from 25.  Mr. Duncan said the expected slowdown in manufacturing "will reduce inflationary pressures in many key sectors, particularly in labor markets."  The measures of long-term expectations fell to their lowest levels since the survey began in late 1987.  The production optimism index for the 12 months ahead fell to 58 from 64, while expectations also declined for new orders (65 to 60), overall demand (64 to 58) and selling price increases (56 to 53).  The Senate's vote, led by Jesse Helms, to bar federal funding for "indecent material" reminds us of the old Sunday comics feature, "There Oughta Be a Law."  Readers asked for laws to ban parents who bring their weeping babies into church, slow drivers, and husbands who snore.  Apparently the kids sending this stuff in grew up to become Members of Congress, because the U.S. is about full up with laws, rules and regulations that ban, bar, prohibit or forbid.  Mr. Helms's amendment bans federal money for "obscene or indecent materials, including but not limited to depictions of sado-masochism, homoeroticism, the exploitation of children, or individuals engaged in sex acts; or material that denigrates the objects or beliefs of the adherents of a particular religion or non-religion; or material which denigrates, debases, or reviles a person, group, or class of citizens on the basis of race, creed, sex, handicap, age or national origin."  Judged by that, if Eddie Murphy were a federal arts project, he'd be sentenced to 50 consecutive life terms in prison.  H.L. Mencken's collected works (he didn't much care for Methodists) would be in flames.  We don't like Jesse Helms's ban.  We don't like what he doesn't like -- "artist" Andres Serrano's work, "Piss Christ" (a plastic crucifix submerged in Mr. Serrano's urine).  We don't like photographer Robert Mapplethorpe's pornographic works (which admiring art critics can never quite bring themselves to describe in detail for their readers).  Come to think of it, we guess we don't like the idea of federal funding for art.  Let the politicians rant and rave about the arts endowment's decision to fund this sort of thing, but Jesse Helms's solution is Washington's solution to everything: Shackle someone with a law.  Senator Helms's language about "race, creed, sex, handicap, age" sounds like the sort of pious liberal authoritarianism now popular at places such as Stanford.  As to the works themselves, we suppose their defenders would argue that the now-beloved Impressionists shocked the Salon more than 100 years ago, and that this work is more such artistic "provocation."  But a society has simply lost its critical faculties if it can't distinguish between art that provokes because it is new and work that provokes because it depicts what is and always will be repulsive.  Meanwhile, the U.S. art-world monolith is phoning in its collective outrage at the Senate's threat to its federal funding.  What a spectacle.  These people take the world's most highly politicized money, use it to produce or promote something like "Piss Christ," and then weep when the politicians act like politicians.  A lot of people we know use vacations to take their families to indulge in fantasy at Disney World.  Perhaps some federal money could be set aside to send the U.S. arts academy in the opposite direction for a long-overdue vacation in the real world.  The collapse of tourism in China has shaken Hong Kong's travel industry.  Although a popular tourist destination in its own right, this British colony also is a favorite entry and exit port for China visitors.  Hong Kong hotels, restaurants and shops have all benefited from the boom in China tourism during the past decade.  Now they are beginning to feel the effect of the bust.  The wholesale cancellation of group tours to China that followed the June 4 massacre of students by troops in Beijing's Tiananmen Square has meant widespread cancellations for Hong Kong hotels, with a ripple effect through the tourism industry.  According to the Hong Kong Tourist Association, 28% of the visitors to Hong Kong in 1988 also visited China.  And it isn't just foreign tourists who have stopped going to China.  Hong Kong residents also have dropped China as a tourist destination, hurting many local travel agents.  Patrick Siu, executive director of the Travel Industry Council, which represents 1,000 Hong Kong travel agents, estimates that 95% of Hong Kong-originating tours to Beijing and northern China have been canceled since June 4.  About 75% of the tours to southern China, including day trips across the border, have been canceled, he says.  Mr. Siu estimates that lost China business is costing Hong Kong travel agents millions of dollars.  Agents that specialize in China travel are scrambling to find other markets.  Hong Kong tourists who would have gone to China are instead heading for Southeast Asia, particularly Thailand and the Philippines.  Beijing tourism officials have tried to convince travel agents that all is well, but few believe their assurances.  Although he is seeing a slight increase in tourists venturing from Hong Kong into relatively peaceful southern China, Mr. Siu believes that tourism in Beijing and north China is dead for the rest of this year.  While local hoteliers and travel agents say that China travelers of all nationalities have stopped coming through Hong Kong, it is visitors from Taiwan who have been most affected by the political turmoil in China.  In November 1987, Taiwan's government relaxed prohibitions on its citizens traveling to Hong Kong and to China.  The policy change led to a flood of tourists from Taiwan, eager to see relatives and compare life on the mainland almost 40 years after the Communists' 1949 victory in China's civil war.  In 1988, almost 1.1 million of Taiwan's citizens visited the British crown colony, three times the year-earlier figure, according to statistics compiled by the Hong Kong Tourist Association.  Taiwan became the colony's second-largest source of visitors in 1988, accounting for almost 20% of the total visitors.  Japan was No. 1 and the U.S. No. 3.  Until the Beijing massacre, Taiwan appeared set to become Hong Kong's No. 1 source of tourists for 1989.  For the first five months of 1989, the most-recent figures available, 570,000 citizens of Taiwan visited Hong Kong, up 57% from the year earlier.  Taiwan accounted for 24% of total visitor arrivals through May, supplanting No. 1-ranked Japan, which accounted for 22% of total visitors.  The growth in Japanese visitor arrivals has slowed this year; Japanese arrivals in May declined 1.6% from May 1988.  The total number of visitors to Hong Kong in 1988 rose 24% from 1987, to almost 5.6 million.  In the first five months of 1989, the total number of visitors grew 15% from the year earlier, to 2.4 million.  Tourism-industry officials say they won't begin to know the precise impact of China's tumult on Hong Kong's tourism until the June visitor-arrival figures are announced next month.  But in Taipei, travel agents who specialize in China tourism say that their business has all but dried up since June 4.  Chou Tsai-chiao, manager of China Travel Service (Taiwan), says that before the Beijing massacre, the agency was booking 500 to 700 people a month on China tours.  Since June 4, the agency's China business has dropped to almost nothing.  While Hong Kong's hotels haven't been hit as hard as the now almost empty tourist hotels of China, the loss of China-related visitors comes at an unsettling time for the colony's once-prosperous hotel industry.  The China tourism setback strikes as Hong Kong's hotel industry is in the midst of a building boom and is faced with rising operating costs and a severe labor shortage.  We can scarcely help noting all the stories about Felix S. Bloch being under investigation as a possible spy for the Soviet Union.  He served as deputy to two ambassadors to Austria, Helene Von Damm and Ronald Lauder.  Mr. Lauder says he requested that Mr. Bloch be recalled for insubordination and going out of channels.  Mrs. Von Damm, Ronald Reagan's former personal secretary, and Mr. Lauder, currently a candidate for the Republican nomination for Mayor of New York, were political appointees.  Mr. Bloch, who is said not to have liked his bosses in Vienna, was a career foreign service officer.  The predictable lesson being drawn inside the Beltway: Too few ambassadors are career foreign service officers, too many are political appointees.  Gary Lynch steps down as director of enforcement at the Securities and Exchange Commission today, after leading what was probably the most significant and spectacular investigation in Wall Street history, one that led to stunning charges of insider trading and securities fraud against Dennis Levine, Ivan Boesky, Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. and Michael Milken.  Now, after four years of being the most feared man in the financial markets, Mr. Lynch, who is 39 years old, will practice securities law at Davis, Polk & Wardwell, a Wall Street firm.  Following are excerpts from an interview about his thoughts upon leaving the SEC.  Q: What are you most proud of having done as enforcement chief?  A: It would have to be the line of cases -- Levine, Boesky, Drexel, et al.  Q: What will the ultimate significance of those cases be?  A: I have to think they'll be remembered as cases that had a major effect on conduct that was occurring in the markets in the mid-'80s.  I would certainly hope that's the way they're remembered.  As I look back and I think of major cases that have been brought in the past, there's the Whitney case, against the president of the stock exchange for manipulation, a very important case. {In that case, former New York Stock Exchange President Richard Whitney pleaded guilty to two counts of grand larceny in 1938, leading to highly publicized hearings on what William O. Douglas, then the SEC chief, called "the whole anatomy of Wall Street chicanery and corruption."}  I think this line of cases will be remembered as equally important for their time.  There's that picture of Whitney, I don't know if he's coming out of the courtroom or going into the courtroom.  My guess is there'll be photos coming out of this era that also sum up the enforcement actions that have been taken.  I think they'll be remembered as actions that curbed the excesses of the times.  Q: Do you think that the campaign against insider trading has had a real effect on the way people behave on Wall Street?  A: Yes, without question.  It's my sense that there was a time when people thought they could trade on inside information with absolute impunity.  And that's no longer true.  Now, I am certain that there are still people who think they can trade on inside information and get away with it because they're smarter than the average person.  There will always be those people.  But I think that the actions have had a significant effect on conduct.  Q: Is there any conduct on Wall Street that you haven't been able to get at?  A: Yeah, I guess the one area where there's a serious problem now, I don't think I'd characterize it as a Wall Street problem.  It's more of a Main Street problem.  That's the penny stock abuses.  It's all over various regions of the country.  It's a serious problem that needs to be curbed.  I think we've started moving toward that, but it's going to take awhile.  Q: What was your biggest mistake?  A: I will say that we haven't made a lot of mistakes around here.  We've been fairly cautious in the way we approach the investigative process and the bringing of enforcement actions.  Some would probably argue too cautious.  But I certainly wouldn't say that that's a mistake.  Q: You once referred to the Drexel case as a war.  A: It was a war.  Fred Joseph {Drexel's chief executive officer} referred to it as a war as well.  The investigation involved a lot of vitriol.  From the day that subpoenas were received by the firm, it was 2 1/2 years where there was a battle mentality, I think, on both sides.  Q: Did it affect your home life?  A: Only to the extent that I was preoccupied with it.  It was a matter where there seemed to be some daily event over a couple of years.  It wasn't as though I would forget about the Drexel matter for a day or two.  There was always some skirmish or issue that brought it to the front of my mind.  Q: Do you have any qualms about going over to the other side?  A: No, not at this point, anyway.  I think it's fair to say that I would like to have the luxury of being able to make a cut as to some types of persons that I would defend, and others that I would prefer not to.  There are people or institutions that are legitimate, that have a real business, and who step over the line, and have to be held accountable for it.  Then there are people or institutions whose business is corrupt from the inception.  It's the latter category that I'd just as soon not represent.  Japan's tradition-bound Liberal Democratic Party is flirting with the very untraditional idea of selecting a younger politician as LDP president and thus Japan's prime minister.  Ryutaro Hashimoto, the LDP secretary general who will turn 52 years old tomorrow, is far from a shoo-in, but he is emerging as the man to beat.  The reason is simple: The telegenic Mr. Hashimoto's growing popularity with voters makes him, in the eyes of many LDP legislators, the best possible standard-bearer in coming parliamentary elections.  "If LDP members' priority is to win the election, he will be chosen," says Minoru Tada, a political commentator.  If chosen, Mr. Hashimoto would be the youngest president in the party's 34-year history and one of the few who wasn't a leader of a party faction.  Just weeks ago, the party abandoned its tradition of choosing faction leaders as presidents when it selected the ill-fated current prime minister, Sosuke Uno.  For it to even consider following that step by discarding its preference for seniority shows how much it has been shocked by the series of scandals and policy blunders that led to the loss of its upper-house majority earlier this week.  Many LDP members of the parliament, or Diet, fear the party also could lose its majority in the more-important lower house.  Lower-house elections have to be held by next July and likely will be held sooner.  It also defies tradition for the party to consider a candidate because he comes across well on television.  For much of the party's history, public appeal simply wasn't a consideration in picking a party president.  The LDP won Diet elections pretty much regardless of who was leading it, because the LDP's policies kept Japan's economy growing and the opposition parties were weak and unattractive.  As a result, interchange and infighting among the party's faction leaders came to determine who was elected party president and hence premier.  Usually it took years of fund-raising and network-building and waiting to become a faction leader, so most faction leaders were elderly.  The youngest previous party president was Kakuei Tanaka, elected in 1972 at the age of 54, and his rise at such a young age was only by dint of being an extraordinarily ambitious and aggressive politician.  Mr. Hashimoto hardly fits the Tanaka mold.  Although he has a reputation within the party as a competent politician (he has been elected to the Diet nine times and has served as transport minister and as health and welfare minister), his appeal to the public seems to boil down to clean-cut good looks and an ability to be self-deprecating in television interviews.  As the party's secretary general during the short-lived premiership of Mr. Uno, who announced Monday that he is resigning as prime minister, Mr. Hashimoto has had plenty of opportunity to be self-deprecating in public.  But whatever the source of his charm, he is, according to a recent poll by a television network, one of the country's most popular politicians.  And that is especially important to the party because its main rival, the Japan Socialist Party, has a leader with strong popular appeal, 60-year-old Diet member Takako Doi.  According to one Japanese press account, some senior LDP members including Prime Minister Uno met at a restaurant this week, and during their meal listened to an impassioned plea from a cabinet minister that "other than Hashimoto, there is nobody."  But Mr. Hashimoto still must overcome many obstacles.  Some party elders are said to be unconvinced of the need for a break with tradition, while some younger Diet members are said to oppose Mr. Hashimoto because they see him as a potential rival.  Mr. Hashimoto admitted when he was appointed secretary general of the LDP in early June that the scandal-ridden Recruit Co. bought 400,000 yen ($2,800) in tickets to one of his fund-raising parties in 1985.  He said he had failed to report the money, as legally required, through an oversight.  The Japanese media hasn't dwelt on these admissions.  But, especially after the unexpected geisha scandal that helped bring down Mr. Uno, party leaders are likely to scrutinize carefully the backgrounds of any presidential aspirant.  Other names often mentioned include Shin Kanemaru, 74, and Toshio Komoto, 78.  Mr. Kanemaru, a behind-the-scenes power in the LDP for years, is leader of the faction of former Prime Minister Noboru Takeshita, which is also Mr. Hashimoto's faction.  Mr. Komoto has led his own faction for years, but has never been part of the party's mainstream -- something that may work to his advantage in a party looking for a fresh face.  But none of the other names would have Mr. Hashimoto's popular appeal, and the selection of an older politician would convince many voters that the LDP has learned nothing from its recent troubles.  "The days of the doyens running the LDP are over," says Nobuo Tomita, a political science professor at Meiji University.  "The younger-generation members should take over.  Of the younger generation, the best choice would be Hashimoto."  For the fourth consecutive year, a survey of 404 chief executive officers found Atlanta to be the nation's most desirable business address.  Of 31 cities listed in the survey, Atlanta placed first for manufacturing, warehouse and distribution facilities.  The survey, conducted by Louis Harris & Associates, is sponsored annually by the real estate brokerage firm Cushman & Wakefield.  The survey is intended to measure executives' views of the changing business climate in different regions.  "There are reasons other than rents that factor into companies' location decisions," said Cushman & Wakefield President Arthur J. Mirante II.  "We are finding there are many different factors."  Chief among them, Mr. Mirante said, is the quality of the local labor force.  "More and more executives seem to be saying, 'let's make sure where we're going to move will attract the kind of labor force we will need in the next five or 10 years," he said.  Chicago, which ranked fourth overall, placed first in the two categories executives said were most important: proximity to domestic markets and availability of skilled workers.  At the bottom of the list is New Orleans, the one-time energy boom town that has yet to recover from steep declines in the oil and gas industries.  Coming in 30th and 29th were Miami and Detroit, respectively.  Overall, the survey results reflected a growing confidence in the nation's economic prospects; 22 of the 31 cities received improved ratings.  While oil-depressed New Orleans lagged at the bottom of the list, Texas cities seemed to be moving back in favor.  Executives predicted that Dallas-Fort Worth, Houston and San Antonio all would experience improved business conditions within the next year.  Other cities receiving upbeat outlooks were Charlotte and Raleigh/Durham, N.C. Executives cited those two areas as having the most growth potential among cities not in the top 31.  Seattle experienced the greatest boost in the survey this year, jumping from the country's 12th best city to locate a business to second place.  Cushman & Wakefield officials asserted that in addition to having a strong available work force, Seattle is positioned to benefit from the U.S./Canada trade treaty and increased trade from Pacific Rim countries.  In addition to having a large pool of available workers, Mr. Mirante said, "Seattle just happens to be a great place to live."  Rounding out the list of top 10 cities were San Diego, which placed third, and then Chicago; Tampa, Fla.; San Francisco; Minneapolis-St.  Paul; Columbus, Ohio; Los Angeles and Baltimore.  The Cypriots had their day in an Indianapolis court.  And now the judge is about to decide if a Hoosier art dealer named Peg Goldberg can keep the four rare sixth-century Byzantine mosaics she purchased in Geneva last July.  The mosaics formed part of the decoration of the apse of the church of Panagia Kanakaria in North Cyprus, which was taken over by the Turks in 1974.  If the court decides that Ms. Goldberg and her firm, Goldberg & Feldman, have legal title to the fragments, then she can dispose of them as she wishes and pay off the loan from Merchants National Bank that made the transaction possible.  If the Republic of Cyprus and the Autocephalous Greek Orthodox Church of Cyprus recover the mosaics, they will most likely be kept in the archbishop's palace in Nicosia.  In addition to deciding the fate of the mosaics and of Ms. Goldberg, the case will have wide-ranging repercussions for American museums and collectors.  If foreign governments see they can succeed in reclaiming their art in a U.S. court, there may well be a series of similar suits seeking the return of art that has been in collections here for many years.  If Ms. Goldberg prevails, it will make it easier for Americans to buy and keep art that may be stolen or claimed by others.  A carefully written decision could moderate the negative implications of either ruling.  The six-day trial began in late May.  Lawyers for both sides submitted final briefs and proposed findings of fact on July 11.  Both sides agree on a few basic facts.  The mosaics were removed from their church sometime after the Turkish invasion of 1974.  Soon the church lost its Greek congregation and may have sheltered sheep and goats.  No one showed how the mosaics came down, whether through war damage or vandalism, or how they entered the possession of Aydin Dikmen, an ethnic Turk living in Munich who, according to the bill of sale, sold them to Ms. Goldberg in Switzerland last July for $1.2 million.  Suits to recover stolen art are not common even in New York, but in Indiana they are downright strange.  And here's an unlikely defendant in an international art case.  Peg Goldberg was born in Bloomington and educated at Indiana University and Christian Theological Seminary, worked in health services and social work for abused children and the retarded and was the first woman elected a county commissioner.  She changed careers in 1981 and has since been dealing with some success in 19th- and 20th-century art.  Now she is being branded as a dealer in stolen religious treasures by a foreign government and its church.  But on what grounds?  Cyprus maintains that the mosaics are stolen and that the Church of Cyprus is their rightful owner, an understandable and appealing position.  But there was a war, and it's not impossible to imagine an official of the (Islamic) occupying forces allowing them to leave.  In trial, no evidence was presented on either side to show how the mosaics were removed from Cyprus.  The mosaics do seem to have spent eight years or so in Munich before being sold in Switzerland.  There a good-faith purchaser can acquire good title to stolen goods if the theft is more than five years old.  So if the Swiss purchase is valid in the eyes of the Indianapolis court, Ms. Goldberg gets the mosaics.  Also, Cyprus's claim may be too old under Indiana's statute of limitations.  In court, Cyprus tried to discredit Ms. Goldberg as a good-faith purchaser.  At the very least, the revelations put into evidence about the structure of the deal for buying the mosaics gave unusual insights into the workings of Ms. Goldberg and two other dealers, Robert Fitzgerald of Indiana and Michel van Rijn of Amsterdam.  It came out that Ms. Goldberg knew that Mr. Fitzgerald had done business under several names and that Mr. van Rijn had been convicted in absentia in France in a matter involving false signatures on works by Chagall.  Late in June 1988, Ms. Goldberg traveled to Amsterdam to look at a Modigliani painting for an interested client, but she judged that it was "wrong."  Messrs.  Fitzgerald and van Rijn, who had brought her to the Modigliani, then mentioned the mosaics, and within about a week she had agreed to buy them with $1.2 million borrowed from her bank in Indiana.  She made her inquiries, inspected the mosaics in Switzerland and paid Mr. Fitzgerald $1.08 million in cash to give to Mr. Dikmen.  Mr. Fitzgerald testified that, contrary to what Ms. Goldberg believed, he gave Mr. Dikmen only $350,000, paid a London attorney about $70,000, gave $80,000 to Ronald Faulk, an American lawyer who represented him and Mr. van Rijn in these negotiations, and divided the remaining $580,000 equally with Mr. van Rijn.  Ms. Goldberg did not have counsel with her but tried to structure the deal favorably.  The original asking price had been much higher, but she persuaded Messrs.  Fitzgerald and van Rijn to take a share of the profits from the sale instead of an upfront finder's fee.  She agreed to give them each 22 1/2% of the profits, and they later sold some of their share to an Indiana physician, leaving them each with a fair amount of Ms. Goldberg's borrowed cash and little stake in the outcome.  Given her current troubles, it looks as if Ms. Goldberg was in a poker game with some slick players.  How did she decide to proceed with the purchase?  She testified that she telephoned a few places (UNESCO, IFAR and customs authorities of several nations; in my deposition for the trial I testified that no record of a call survived at IFAR nor could any of us recall one) to see if the mosaics had been reported stolen or if any treaties would forbid their import into the U.S. And, although Cyprus had spread the word in the community of Byzantinists, Ms. Goldberg did not get to that information.  Cyprus neglected to report to Interpol or other agencies.  Ms. Goldberg did not, however, play for time to make a more thorough investigation.  Nor, apparently, did she question why such great works were being offered to an Indiana dealer inexperienced in the antiquities trade.  Given the strong legal arguments on both sides, it is impossible to predict next week's decision.  In any event, it will probably be appealed.  If Ms. Goldberg wins legal title to the mosaics, in the best scenario she would sell them to an institution or person who wants to see the mosaics returned to the church of Panagia Kanakaria, and who will safeguard them, make them available to scholars, and show them publicly, perhaps on a shared basis with Cyprus, until the Church of Cyprus can return the mosaics to their original site.  This would help put a favorable light on her chosen profession and put right a disaster of war.  ---  Ms. Lowenthal is executive director of the International Foundation for Art Research (IFAR).  Peter Watson has a great fondness for the racy underside of art.  In "The Caravaggio Conspiracy," his 1984 art thriller, he sets out to grip his readers with the true story of how he, a journalist and art historian, adopted an alias, posed as a rich and corrupt art collector, and helped the police foil an international ring of thieves trading in stolen old master paintings.  Mr. Watson's new book, "Wisdom and Strength: The Biography of a Renaissance Masterpiece" (Doubleday, 395 pages, $21.95), is about "The Allegory of Wisdom and Strength," a sumptuous oil painted by the great Venetian master Paolo Veronese in 1576.  The illustrious 23 owners of the painting included the Hapsburg Emperor Rudolf II of Prague, Queen Christina of Sweden, Philippe II (the Duke of Orleans and for many years the French regent), and the Dutch-English intellectual socialite Thomas Hope, whose family also owned the fabled Hope diamond.  Thanks to the prescience and good advice of the art historian Roger Fry, Henry Clay Frick acquired "The Allegory of Wisdom and Strength" and its companion painting, "The Allegory of Vice and Virtue," in 1912 for $200,000.  Both paintings now hang in the serene majesty of the West Gallery of the Frick Collection in New York City.  While at first blush, the saga of "The Allegory of Wisdom and Strength" might seem rather a tame sequel to the cops-and-robbers drama related in "The Caravaggio Conspiracy," Mr. Watson goes to great lengths to enliven his narrative.  The Veronese painting, he tells us, has led "a distinguished and fantastic life," "a life that has seen many adventures . . . war, revolution, abdication, execution, madness, sexual scandal, religious conversion, and attempted assassination."  He does not stint detailing the madness and scandal, and readers need not worry about having to wade through a lot of conventional art history.  Indeed, Mr. Watson begins by telling us that he undertook this exercise in "biography" in order to reveal something of the sheer richness of art history.  The result is an often entertaining collection of historical anecdotes for which the itinerary of "The Allegory of Wisdom and Strength" provides a colorful, somewhat arbitrary excuse.  Among the scores of asides that constitute the real heart of the book, only a few have any direct bearing on art history, and fewer still have anything to do with Veronese's painting.  Typical is the familiar chestnut about how Queen Christina invited Rene Descartes to her court and then insisted that he instruct her in philosophy at five in the morning.  Poor Descartes soon contracted pneumonia and died.  Noting that the two did not seem to like each other much, Mr. Watson adds the spicy but insupportable observation that it was the Queen's "coldness, as much as winter, which had killed him."  Mr. Watson does include some informative tidbits about the evolution of artistic technique and materials in the course of his discussion.  He even pauses for a page or two to describe the pentimento, or underpainting, that shows through in one spot of the painting.  But what most fascinates him are the extravagant social and political circumstances in which the painting has found itself.  How marvelous that the Holy Roman Emperor Rudolf II should have been a devotee of the occult and have descended into madness in his later years] And how splendid that Queen Christina, whose army looted the picture from Prague in 1648, should have had a penchant for dressing as a man, have been of uncertain sexual orientation, and have abdicated in order to convert to Roman Catholicism]  This is the kind of history that Mr. Watson is rather overeager to trace.  Too often, this eagerness comes at the expense of judgment.  What can it mean, for example, to say that Veronese "looked more like a stern clerk than an artist"?  What, after all, does an artist look like?  And can we credit Mr. Watson's assertion that, because of the partial nudity of the female figures in Veronese's allegorical paintings, "at one level" the pictures were a form of "high-class pornography"?  Only if we adopt a very low level indeed.  It must also be said that this book is often infuriatingly repetitious.  When Mr. Watson happens on to an interesting fact or anecdote, he doesn't let you forget it.  Nor is the material he has collected particularly original.  Though they are usually engaging enough in themselves, the vignettes that fill this book are mostly so potted that one is tempted to consign them to the windowsill for watering.  Even Mr. Watson's judgment as an art historian seems to have been affected.  There is no doubt that "The Allegory of Wisdom and Strength" is a beautiful painting.  But is it Veronese's "masterpiece" as he claims?  Is it, for example, superior to its companion painting in the Frick?  Is it the equal of the artist's famous banquet pictures -- "Marriage Feast at Cana," say, or "Feast in the House of Levi" -- or such late religious paintings as "Agony in the Garden"?  The answer is no, but Mr. Watson is too excited to bother with such niceties.  Like so much in this energetic but exasperating book, such carelessness illustrates the danger of attempting to transform art history into an adventure tale.  ---  Mr. Kimball is a regular contributor to the New Criterion and other publications.  Speaking of turtles, there is something slower: The U.S. Department of the Interior.  Four years ago, three environmental groups asked the Department's Fish and Wildlife Service to list U.S. desert tortoises (land turtles) as endangered.  This week, the tortoises finally made the list.  But it may be a little late: "Off-the-road vehicles, illegal collecting, suburban development and now a new respiratory disease have already ravaged the species," says James Middaugh, press director of the Environmental Defense Fund, one of the three groups.  "I've got to admit we dragged our heels," says Craig Rieben, the service's information officer.  "Two of our geographical regions just couldn't agree on what to do."  Turtles may be cold-blooded, but they bring out tender feelings in warm-hearted people.  When 87-year-old Beatie Vickers entered a nursing home in England, she insisted that Joey the turtle, whom she found in her garden decades ago, move in with her.  "We've put it in a child's playpen in the garden, where Beatie goes all the time," says Ann Derry, who runs the home.  "After all, she's known Joey since she was six years old."  As pets, turtles are appreciated by people with imagination.  Marlyn Goldenberg, of the California Turtle and Tortoise Club's San Fernando Valley chapter, likes turtles because they "project love but don't overdo it."  She adds: "Just because they don't wag their tails like dogs doesn't mean they're not affectionate.  I tell my two turtles, 'Have a nice day,' when I go to work."  Turtles have been residents of the earth since Triassic times, 200 million years ago.  But today, the order Testudinata is in danger.  "Human beings may do them in before any of their natural enemies," says Glenn Stewart, a professor of zoology at California State Polytechnic University in Pomona, Calif.  "We'd better be careful," he adds.  Maybe if people knew more about turtles, and how strongly some people take to them, the turtle would be treated with more respect.  Two years ago Eric Platt of Fort Lauderdale, Fla., won a $1,500 court judgment against a landscaper Mr. Platt says killed the year-old, four-pound tortoise he had imported from Aldabra Island, off the coast of east Africa.  "It's a rare animal and I was devastated when it was killed," says Mr. Platt.  "It was run over by a lawn mower only eight days after I got it."  The landscaper didn't appear for a small-claims court hearing and Mr. Platt was awarded the turtle's cost by default.  But Mr. Platt never received compensation for his loss.  The landscaper has disappeared, and there's a warrant out for his arrest, says Mr. Platt.  "Since then, I've gotten two turtles and they never leave my sight," says Mr. Platt, who runs an auto-tire repair shop.  Turtles aren't born to run, but some can go pretty fast.  Al, a 325-pound African Aldabra at the El Paso Zoo, once whizzed around the zoo like a kid on a skateboard.  That's because Al was attached to a skateboard.  After his forepaw was injured a few years ago, zoo employees devised the arrangement for Al.  "He was then able to beat any hare at the zoo," says Robin Dalton, zoo curator.  In Boise, Idaho, Harlan Hansen, a retired electronics engineer, owns a turtle named Speedy that occasionally runs away from home to zip along a nearby freeway.  "Boy, can that turtle travel," says Mr. Hansen.  "They're supposed to be slow but this guy, even though he is 75 years old, has long legs."  At Brennan's Bar in Marina Del Rey, Calif., some turtles who have been racing over the past 14 years are far from slow.  One recently flashed across the six-foot racetrack in 1.2 seconds.  James Duffer, who runs the races wearing a velvet green tuxedo, does concede, however, that the slowest race took more than 25 minutes, or more than four minutes per foot.  "Slow but sure won that race," he says.  But not everyone admires thoroughbred turtle racing.  Two years ago the New Jersey Society for Prevention of Cruelty to Animals sued the Goal Post Restaurant in Fanwood, N.J., alleging that the bar abused both turtles and goldfish by racing them.  A trial judge fined the racing promoters $50 plus court costs for being cruel to the fish, which were taken out of a bowl by hand, and placed in a rain-gutter starting gate.  "If we'd only moved it with a net rather than our hand, we wouldn't have been accused of cruelty to the fish," says Gary Ferruggia, owner of Goal Post.  But the judge permitted the turtle races to continue.  Harry Cohen, who races turtles at the Goal Post on Wednesday nights down a six-lane, 16-foot track to the strains of "Rocky," says he has shelled out thousands of dollars in court costs for defending himself against animal-rights groups.  "Racing reptiles, ducks, hamsters, gerbils, baby alligators, bullfrogs and even lobsters -- backwards -- is my thing," says Mr. Cohen.  Last year he spent a night in jail for "civil abuse of a turtle" he had been racing.  In Washington, D.C., last year, radio station WCXR-FM decided to replace two live turtles with mechanical look-alikes after getting complaints about an upcoming turtle race the station was sponsoring.  The station had planned to use the race to promote a concert by a 1960s rock group called the Turtles (hit song: "Happy Together").  "But we decided that using live turtles wasn't worth the aggravation," says Mark Lapidus, the station's promotion manager.  "Some protesters complained that we were disturbing the psyche and consciousness of the animals."  Turtles face even bigger dangers than racing.  In the western Mojave Desert, they now are used as target practice by civilians and their habitat was once a bombing range for the Air Force.  "If we killed any tortoises, we weren't aware of it and didn't purposely do it," says a spokesman for George Air Force Base in southern California.  For almost two decades, bombers from the base dropped practice or small-explosive bombs on a nearby area where the tortoises live.  "We stopped in 1982 because the area is too close to a busy highway to Reno and Lake Tahoe," says the spokesman.  He says the Bureau of Land Management had assured the base that a lot of tortoises didn't live there.  Kristin Berry, a biologist with the Bureau of Land Management, says that in California's Fremont Valley, less than 70 of 200 tortoises seen in 1981 in a sample mile-square area are still alive.  "Many were shot, some had their backs pounded in or were run over by off-the-road vehicles," she says.  "In other areas of the desert, the turtles are being taken for food or as pets."  For as long as turtles have been around, their main defense has been their shells, which haven't always made them as impervious to attack as turtle lovers would like.  Because all turtles are ectothermic -- their blood takes on the temperature of their surroundings -- they must bask in the sun, on rocks or on high ground.  For this reason, U.S. desert turtles are easy prey for ravens, which divebomb them and break open their shells.  The ravens had become such a threat that the Bureau of Land Management planned to poison them.  But the Humane Society of America got a court ban against it last month in California.  "Whatever the government does in regard to protecting endangered animals, it hears about it," says Thomas Wilson, information officer for the Department of Interior.  When the Department protected the spotted owl, the lumber industry complained it was putting thousands of people out of work because of a ban on cutting down the trees in which the owls nested.  The shrimp industry is currently complaining about a requirement that shrimpers fit their nets with devices that permit sea turtles to escape because the industry says it's losing too much shrimp.  "Now that we're protecting the desert tortoise, wait and see all the people who'll complain about it," says Mr. Wilson.  Steve Robinson, acting director of the Fish and Wildlife Services, says cattle ranchers are angry because protecting the tortoise could hinder the ranchers' grazing rights on federal lands.  Don Zimmer, the stumpy manager of the Chicago Cubs, is called "Popeye," but his girth, indicating a bodily weight several stone in excess of the 175 pounds listed in the team's media guide, reminds you more of Wimpy.  That he is misnamed, however, does not mean that he is easily misled in matters concerning his trade.  Zimmer paused from his post-game plate in Busch Stadium's bowels here Wednesday night to ponder a hypothetical question after his team had taken two games of three from the St. Louis Cardinals.  If he'd been told back in April, when the season began, that Ryne Sandberg, his all-star second baseman, would be deep in a batting slump, and that Andre Dawson, his big-bopper power hitter, would be gimping around on a surgical knee, would he have foreseen his team's current second-place standing in the National League East?  "I'd of said you were out of your mind," snorted the veteran, returning to his repast.  That the Cubbies are, indeed, in the pennant race as July slides into August in this summer of the Rose blight, 3 1/2 games behind the Montreal Expos, has made others besides Popeye popeyed.  This, after all, is the club whose record of futility has been celebrated in song, story and drama, a gang that won its last pennant in 1945 and spent 34 of the 43 seasons since in the second division of its league or division.  The sole trophy the Cubs snagged in that stretch was for a divisional title in 1984, a year in which several veteran acquisitions had last-hurrah seasons.  And you'll recall that campaign also ended with Alka-Seltzer, because they blew a 2-0 lead to San Diego in the best-of-five league championship playoff.  It all might have gone down easier with the home folks if the Cubs had been unremittingly awful, but they have teased their fans with many a false start.  In six of the last dozen seasons, only one of which ('84) was concluded with a better-than-.500 won-lost mark, the Cubs took winning records into July.  Their pattern has been for them to be sprightly in the spring, but bummers in the summer.  Several reasons have been advanced to explain this propensity to fade.  One is the "No-Lights Theory," which held that, until the Cubs installed arcs last year, playing all their home games under the sun in lightless Wrigley Field sapped the poor lads' strength.  A different, though related, view is the "Rush Street Theory," whose premise is that it's the games the Cubs play in their many free evenings on their city's nightlife strip that does 'em in.  More persuasive is the "No-Speed, Lousy-Pitching Theory," which is self-explanatory.  A long succession of Cub front offices noticed Wrigley Field's snug dimensions and concluded that power hitting was the sole requisite for success there.  The team thus has featured a series of elephantine lineups in which pitching has been little more than an afterthought.  In the last 44 years, Cub pitchers posted the league's lowest earned run average but once, and in just seven of those seasons has the team stolen more bases than it hit home runs.  The last time it did both was -- uh huh -- that championship season of '45.  The fella who has seemingly broken the lockstep is Jim Frey, who managed the Cubs to their fleeting 1984 glory.  Frey says that since becoming general manager last year he has adhered to a simple goal.  "Years ago, a minor-league manager named Ben Geraghty told me something I never forgot," Frey recalls.  "He said the first thing you do when you take over a club is get three good pitchers.  And the next thing is to get three more.  The aim of every move I've made here has been to strengthen our pitching."  Frey's first big Cub trade sent reliever Lee Smith, who could pitch, to Boston for Calvin Schiraldi and Al Nipper, a couple of starters who couldn't.  He persevered, though, and has found his six pitchers in Bruce Bielecki, Paul Kilgus, Steve Wilson, Pat Perry, Mitch Williams and Schiraldi, who has been better in relief.  Together with staff incumbents, they have compiled an ERA of 3.25 through Tuesday, the league's third best and more than a half-run a game better than last year's mark.  The best of the bunch has been Williams, a fast-balling lefthanded reliever.  He came in a multiplayer winter swap with Texas that exiled Rafael Palmeiro, a popular batsman with movie-star looks.  Cub fans squealed their disapproval, but have been quieted by the scraggily bearded pitcher's league -- leading 25 saves and thrilled by his tendency to whip an occasional fastball to the screen.  Williams's habits used to excite Zimmer, too, but the manager avers he's become used to him.  "I just sit back and watch now," he says.  "What else can I do?"  Cub offense has been hampered by a six-week Sandberg slump in which his batting average (.180) would look good only as a cholesterol count, and a season of Dawson knee woes that have kept his home run and runs-batted-in numbers (10 and 38) well behind those of two years ago, when he led the league with 49 and 137.  Still, rookie outfielders Dwight Smith and Jerome Walton are hitting .321 and .286 respectively, while adding zip, utility man Lloyd McClendon is at .311, and others are chipping in when needed.  "Every day it's a different guy," Zimmer observes.  "It's nice that way."  The Cub hero Monday night at steamy Busch was Shawon Dunston, the shortstop who shows flashes of batting brilliance between chasing curve balls in the dirt.  He got three hits, stole a base and scored twice in a 3-2 win.  On Tuesday, lefty Kilgus allowed one run in six innings, batted in a run and scored another in a 4-2 triumph.  Zimmer savored his new bullpen depth in that one by sending three relievers to face five batters in the Cardinal seventh inning, and Williams provided his usual thrill by giving up a walk and a double and heaving a pickoff throw into center field in the ninth before getting the final out.  On Wednesday, Jose DeLeon outpitched Rick Sutcliffe, and the Cards won, 2-0.  But for baseball's ertswhile Sunshine Boys, who this season have been better at night than in the day, on plastic than on grass, and on the road than at home, two out of three is getting to be par.  The decision to renew the steel quotas, and the earlier Super-301 actions against Japan, Brazil and India, underline the pressures that the Bush administration faces from Congress to move trade policy away from the multilateralism embodied in the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade.  The GATT trading system has achieved unprecedented trade expansion and world prosperity.  What accounts then for Congress's hostility?  The explanation lies in a host of fallacies.  Fallacy 1.  Multilateralism does not work: At best, the pace is too slow.  This is simply not true.  Under GATT auspices, tariff barriers among the industrialized countries -- including Japan -- were successively lowered to negligible levels.  It took more than two decades and seven negotiating rounds, but it worked.  Many Americans believe that the failure to get an eighth round started in 1982 proved multilateralism's failure.  But only four years later, the desired round began.  The subject matter is complex and tricky this time, covering difficult new sectors (agriculture and services) and issues (intellectual property) that cannot be rushed if wise solutions are to be negotiated.  Fallacy 2.  Unilateral threats of trade retaliation are necessary to prevent "unfair traders" from exploiting America's more open economy.  GATT would, at best, produce exchange of trade concessions whereas the U.S. is entitled to get something for nothing.  This is no more than self-serving rhetoric.  The U.S. has more than its share of trade-restraining arrangements -- "voluntary" restraints on steel, textiles etc. -- and the East Asian economies are often forced, as with automobiles, to exercise export restraint in the face of a hostile Congress even when there are no formal arrangements.  The European Community has even released lists of American unfair trade practices, paying us back in our own coin.  Fallacy 3.  The U.S. trade deficit is unsustainable and requires immediate correction.  Tough tactics must be used to open Japan fast.  The American trade deficit reflects America's own macroeconomic folly.  If the U.S. does not bring its excess spending down by reducing the budget deficit, the removal of foreign trade barriers will not make any sustained difference to the trade deficit.  Remember: The U.S. trade deficit became large in the mid-'80s -- when Japan's trade barriers fell.  Fallacy 4.  Japan is different from the U.S.  Its market is inherently harder to penetrate.  Therefore we must scrap the "unrealistic" GATT system and shift to some form of managed trade.  There is nothing more silly than the assertion that trade imbalances necessarily follow because trading countries are different culturally or economically.  Imbalances reflect macroeconomic factors.  If this is hard to grasp, just ask yourself: Why did Japan's "inevitable" surplus wait so long to emerge when Japanese cultural impenetrability had been with us ever since Commodore Perry?  Fallacy 5.  Free trade can work only between culturally homogeneous nations.  In fact, the opposite is true: If we were all identical, there would be no profit from trade.  Equally, we must dismiss the notion that Japan's cultural difference makes mutual trade, driven by prices, impossible.  In the past two years, Japanese imports of manufactured goods increased by 33% annually, mostly because of the rise in the value of the yen.  The Japanese do belong to the human race that Adam Smith wrote about.  Fallacy 6.  GATT is dead because there are so many violations of its rules.  Some important GATT rules have indeed been sidetracked.  Thus countries seeking relief from unmanageable imports can, under Article XIX of GATT, protect their economies from foreign competition so long as they treat all exporters equally.  Instead, industrialized countries, the U.S. among them, have simply forced selected exporting countries to restrain export "voluntarily.  When the rule of law is breached, you do not turn automatically to the law of the jungle; instead you try to see where things went wrong and to improve law-enforcement.  The current Uruguay Round is accordingly concentrating on issues, like rejuvenating Article XIX, that will strengthen GATT.  Fallacy 7.  GATT is dead because the world is shifting to regional blocs and rejecting multilateralism.  This thesis is partly true and mostly false.  The U.S.-Canada Free Trade Agreement and Europe 1992 are at center stage for now.  But so is the Uruguay Round of multilateral negotiations.  Besides, both 1992 and the Free Trade Agreement reflect a coincidence of events from which it is impossible to infer either a trend or a rejection of multilateralism. 1992 merely intensifies an ongoing phenomenon, making the Common Market commoner.  Its impulse was internal unification, political and economic.  The Free Trade Agreement, equally unprotectionist in intent, reflects altogether different forces.  The U.S. wanted to take the political momentum away from protectionists in Congress.  Canada wanted to escape from the consequences of America's "unfair trade" mania.  Fallacy 8: GATT is dead because increasing trade conflicts will force bureaucrats and politicians to settle them bilaterally.  True, countries have turned to crying foul against their trading rivals.  Dumping and foreign subsidization are often charged; failure to sell is translated into conspiratorial refusal to buy.  Presently bilateral skirmishes follow because a mutually acceptable evaluation of the allegation is rare.  Rather, when made by Americans, the allegations go before American commissions and agencies, and are decided by Americans.  More than ever, an impartial dispute settlement mechanism is needed.  GATT has experienced but little clout in playing this role.  The need to enhance its authority to do so is now widely accepted.  GATT has to be built afresh, filling in the gaps that have arisen as the world economy has evolved.  Services and agriculture have to be brought within its ambit.  Market disruption and dispute settlement mechanisms have to be overhauled.  There is simply no alternative to making the effort needed to establish GATT firmly at the center of the world's trading system in this way.  ---  Mr. Bhagwati, an economics professor at Columbia, is the author of "Protectionism" (MIT, 1988).  Walt Disney Co. posted a 17% increase in fiscal third-quarter net income to $193.3 million, or $1.40 a share, reflecting the strength of the company's theme parks, including its new Disney-MGM Studios, which opened in Orlando, Fla., May 1.  In the year-earlier quarter, net was $165 million, or $1.20 a share.  Revenue for the quarter ended June 30 rose 28%, to $1.17 billion from $915.7 million.  "Excellent attendance at each of the Disney theme parks, combined with higher per capita guest spending and improved resort operations, were significant factors in the increased operating results," Disney said.  Revenue from the theme parks and resort operations rose 21% for the quarter to $727.9 million from $599.9 million, while operating profit rose 32% to $252.3 million from $190.5 million.  Revenue from the company's filmed entertainment business rose 37% to $354.5 million from $259.6 million, while operating profit rose 14% to $54.5 million from $47.9 million.  Disney attributed the increases to the strong performance of its films overseas, particularly "Cocktail," and continuing growth in home video and syndicated television markets.  Disney noted that its two summer releases, "Dead Poets Society," which opened in late May, and "Honey, I Shrunk the Kids," released in late June, already have raked in more than $160 million at the box office.  Revenue from Disney's consumer products business rose 52% to $85.2 million from $56.2 million, and operating profit climbed 18% to $39 million from $33 million.  For the first nine months, Disney's net rose 27% to $490.6 million from $385.6 million.  Revenue jumped 34% to $3.25 billion from $2.42 billion.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Disney fell $1 to close yesterday at $108.75 a share, easing from the $5.375-a-share jump it took Wednesday on rumors that it might become a target for Paramount Communications Inc., which failed in its bid for Time Inc. Industry observers said they doubted Disney would become a Paramount target, noting that most entertainment stocks are on the rise as investors plow their profits from Time's purchase of Warner Communications Inc. shares into other entertainment stocks.  Investors are getting a rude awakening as they try to play the fund takeover game.  It sounds like easy money.  Shares of a publicly traded stock fund are trading well below the fund's portfolio value.  A predator makes a bid.  Small investors jump aboard, hoping to bag fat profits as the fund's shares leap.  But several takeover and restructuring battles for these so-called closed-end funds have bogged down lately, leaving investors in the lurch and portending fewer such fights in the months ahead.  Raiders "are finding out that funds aren't going to roll over and play dead," says Thomas Herzfeld, a Miami investment manager specializing in closed-end funds.  Predators, for example, have been stymied at Clemente Global Growth Fund, Cypress Fund, Liberty All-Star Equity Fund, Blue Chip Value Fund, Schafer Value Trust and Bancroft Convertible Fund.  The fights are far from over, but a few funds have managed to throw raiders off balance with legal curves and anti-takeover moves.  The closed-end funds, which issue a fixed number of shares that trade publicly, are vulnerable because their shares often languish at a discount to the market value of their portfolios.  By contrast, open-end mutual funds continuously issue and redeem shares on demand at prices based on their portfolio value.  Some restructuring attempts have succeeded.  Just this week, Global Growth & Income Fund was liquidated.  Financial News Composite Fund and France Fund soon will convert to the open-end structure, a move that allows fund shareholders to immediately reap the difference between the discounted trading price of fund shares and the higher market value of the portfolio.  But trying to piggyback on an announced bid can be dangerous.  "If you come in at a 10% discount rather than at 18%, you've got to question whether the game is worth the candle," says George Foot, managing partner of Newgate Management Associates in Northampton, Mass.  If the bid falters, he says, the share price can slide enough to knock the discount back to 18%.  Take Cypress Fund.  The fund's discount -- after narrowing to about 11% after a bid by a group led by Robert Gordon -- has widened again to more than 16% as Mr. Gordon's six-month-old pursuit has bogged down amid litigation and competing tender offers.  Even getting in early is no panacea.  Consider those who bought the Clemente Global Growth Fund on the heels of a bid last September by a group led by Thomas Pickens III.  The fund was trading at a 15.6% discount to the value of its holdings when the bid was made.  After the Pickens-led group ran into pitfalls, investors were left recently with a stock trading at 23% less than its net asset value.  One unusual roadblock used by Clemente has proved at least temporarily effective.  It filed a suit citing an arcane federal securities law that prevents investment companies from buying more than 3% of the shares of other funds.  A federal judge in New York ruled that the Pickens-led group was in fact an investment company, and barred its offer.  Savvy investors actually sold their shares when the Clemente and Cypress bids were made.  Says Phillip Goldstein, a New York investor who dumped both funds when offers emerged, "There's some chance of it eventually open-ending, but you can't count on it."  Instead, Mr. Goldstein and some other investors prefer to buy funds that already have agreed to be restructured.  Their reasoning: Even though there's less money to be made, the gains are all but assured.  The France Fund, for instance, will convert to an open-end fund by autumn, but continues to trade at about a 6% discount.  That means investors buying today will make 6% when the fund is restructured -- a pretty nifty annualized return.  Many investors now have turned their sights on funds that have attracted sizable holdings by investor groups.  These include First Financial Fund, Dover Regional Financial Shares, Nicholas-Applegate Growth Equity Fund, Pilgrim Regional BankShares, the Brazil Fund and Italy Fund.  But there can be pitfalls in jumping in too early.  Investors who bought the Brazil Fund in April when VBI Corp. announced a 9.9% stake would have lost a bundle; shortly after the news, the fund was rocked by a Brazilian market crisis, and the fund's shares plunged about 25%.  VBI, after successful raids on the Scandinavia Fund and the France Fund, has hit roadblocks at the Italy Fund.  Shortly after the group disclosed a big stake, the fund proposed anti-takeover provisions, doubling the fund's discount.  If bids fail, investors can really suffer.  Not only are the fund shares likely to slide, but fund expenses may soar.  That's because fund managers typically spare no cost when warding off raiders, and those expenses eat into investors' returns.  Fund managers, moreover, can be so distracted in fending off an attacker that their portfolio management can be affected.  Don't expect as many bids in the coming months, however.  The discounts of many stock funds have narrowed as stock prices have risen, making the funds less attractive to raiders.  And the recent tribulations of the Pickens and Gordon groups have taught some potential predators some hard lessons.  Says Steven Samuels, editor of the Deep Discount Digest, a Santa Monica, Calif., newsletter: "It's not as simple as it seems."  The kindest thing that probably could have happened to Sudan has just happened.  A group of middle-ranking officers, reportedly backed by Egypt and the U.S., last month overthrew its democratically elected government.  To understand why such a seemingly retrograde step is actually a move forward, it is necessary to back up a few years to the time of another coup.  April 1985 was an intense, inspiring time in Khartoum.  In the midst of dust storms and 100-degree heat, tens of thousands of Sudanese, from shoeshine boys to college professors, staged a series of peaceful, well-organized demonstrations that led to a bloodless coup against the military dictator, Jaafar Numeiri.  This was one Arab revolt in which Communists, Baathists and Islamic fundamentalists played no part.  Sudan's version of the Ayatollah Khomeini, Hassan el-Turabi, was safely tucked away in prison at the time.  The coup's principal power brokers were members of the secular middle class -- doctors and lawyers whose unions organized the first demonstrations.  It was an article of faith among almost every foreign journalist in Khartoum that Mr. Numeiri was the devil incarnate, and that the chanting protesters in the street constituted the army of the righteous.  Further inspiration was to come with free elections the following year, in April 1986, and the choice of Sadeq al-Mahdi as prime minister.  "Sadeq," as everyone in Khartoum referred to him, was a Western Arabist's or Africanist's dream come true: an articulate, Oxford-educated political moderate and Islamic modernist, who during his years of London exile was a frequent source of quotes and articles in a journalistic and academic subculture that brought together Arabs sympathetic to the West and Westerners sympathetic to the Arabs.  No one doubted that democracy, even with such an Olympian figure as Mr. al-Mahdi in charge, was a daring experiment for Sudan, Africa's largest country -- a sprawling, illiterate nation with little infrastructure and millions of starving people.  But to say that Sudan might have been better off with Mr. Numeiri, the pro-American dictator who had led his country back into civil war, than with Mr. al-Mahdi and his band of moderate democrats was tantamount to heresy.  Even Amnesty International was praising Sudan at the time for the release of political prisoners and the halt to the amputations prescribed by Mr. Numeiri as a punishment for thieves.  Never mind that the number of people who actually had their limbs amputated was about 50, while the number who had their lives saved in the last completely successful Western relief effort -- which, not coincidentally, took place when Mr. Numeiri was still in power -- was in the millions.  Mr. Numeiri in his last years at the helm was an incompetent thug, kept in power by a 30,000-man private security force that had a budget as large as the regular army.  In comparison, however, to almost every other Arab and African security force, Mr. Numeiri and his group were saints.  People in Sudan, unlike those in Iraq, Syria and other Islamic countries, were free to speak their mind to foreign journalists, which is why Mr. Numeiri got worse press reviews than the leaders of Iraq and Syria.  Mr. Numeiri's other saving grace was his dependency on the U.S.: It enabled Washington to bully him into allowing massive shipments of grain to Kordofan in early 1985, just in time to avert a famine in the western province.  It was the last punctual delivery of emergency food aid in Sudan's history.  Prime Minister al-Mahdi started ineffectual and ended venal.  At the beginning, millions starved to prove the point that Sudan's democrats were non-aligned, and were not going to take orders from impatient technocrats at the U.S. Agency for International Development.  In the end, Mr. al-Mahdi was responsible for a policy of tribal massacres in the south of the country.  His Arab government was unwilling to make peace with Sudan's non-Moslem, African citizens.  It was also unable to defeat them on the battlefield, so it bribed friendly tribes to murder the Dinka rebels, as well as their women and children.  This, of course, was in addition to starving them out.  Lt. Gen. Omar Hassan Ahmed el-Bashir, the leader of the officers' group that took power in the June 30 coup, said that Mr. al-Mahdi's government had turned Sudan into "a nation of beggars."  Lt. Gen. elBashir, who has promised to end the civil war and cooperate more with Western relief agencies, was being charitable.  Under Prime Minister al-Mahdi, Sudan's political life had so dissolved that by the time of last month's coup, it was conveniently forgotten that Mr. al-Mahdi's government was a democratically elected one.  Mr. al-Mahdi was not an extermist who hijacked the democratic process.  As much as any other Sudanese politician, he stood for the middle ground in Arab-Sudanese society.  What few want to own up to is that the democratic system was less at fault than the attitude of the nation's leaders and those who freely elected them.  In the months prior to Mr. al-Mahdi's election in 1986, I had several long talks with him and his followers.  They displayed an alarming lack of interest in the famine, providing short replies only when asked about it.  Mr. al-Mahdi told me: "It {famine} is no longer a serious problem because international aid has been forthcoming."  Famine, in his mind, was the responsibility of the wealthy West, not of any Sudanese government.  More alarming was his attitude toward the non-Arab, non-Moslem southerners who accounted for roughly half the country's population.  Like rulers in other Arab countries, Mr. al-Mahdi never doubted his particular ethnic and religous group's right to dominate others.  The prime minister's hesitation to accept a ceasefire in the war with the southern rebels, and his government's obstructionist attitude toward allowing food supplies into the south, very much reflected the reluctance of Arab-Sudanese to accept what is geographically obvious: that Sudan is only half an Arab polity; that it is also half an African one.  In the uncharted hell of Sudan's southern jungles, all statistics are suspect.  But it is likely that Sudan's experiment in democracy has claimed even more lives than that other experiment in Arab-run democracy, Lebanon.  There are no other examples, simply because in no other Arab-ruled country, save Algeria, is there any government willing to risk its hold on power through elections.  As yet, the only place that democracy in the Arab world works well is in the minds of Western idealists -- the kind who thought so highly of Mr. al-Mahdi four years ago.  ---  Mr. Kaplan, who lives in Portugal, wrote "Surrender or Starve: The Wars Behind the Famine" (Westview, 1988).  Average hourly billing rates for lawyers have risen significantly this year, reflecting law firms' difficulties in controlling costs in the face of escalating salaries.  The biggest changes have come at the more junior positions in law firms.  At the partner level, billing rates for new partners rose to $113 from $96, or 18%.  At the same time, rates for new associates -- most of them fresh out of law school -- increased 14%, to $87 an hour from $76.  The increases represent bad news for corporations, the primary clients of major law firms.  Despite companies' efforts over the past decade to put a lid on legal bills and encourage law firms to engage in price competition, the cost of legal services keeps rising.  The billing-rate increases were identified in a survey of law-firm economics conducted annually by Altman & Weil, a management consulting group based in Ardmore, Pa.  More than 680 law firms nationwide completed a questionnaire about their billing practices, compensation levels and staffing patterns.  The survey excluded solo practitioners.  Law-firm consultants, corporate counsel and managing partners at law firms agree that rising salaries for lawyers, particularly starting associates, inevitably push up billing rates.  "Law firms are looking for new associates the way the Dallas Cowboys look for new quarterbacks," said Norman Krivoshe, general counsel of Ameritas Financial Services in Lincoln, Neb.  "The billing rates rise to cover it."  Mel Immergut, a partner at Milbank, Tweed, Hadley & McCloy, said a 15% annual increase in overall associate salaries has placed significant pressure on billing rates.  "But we have not increased our billing rates anywhere near our rise in costs," he said.  When New York's Cravath, Swaine & Moore set off a bidding war for associates by raising 1986 starting salaries 23%, managing partners hastened to assure clients that the additional costs wouldn't be passed along in the form of higher billing rates.  Nonetheless, rates have risen significantly since then.  "That money has to come out of the partners' pockets or the clients' pockets.  Most of the time it is passed to the clients," said Carl Liggio, general counsel of Ernst & Young in New York.  Although starting salaries have grown at a slower pace recently, the going rate at top New York firms is expected to inch up to about $83,000 this fall.  Warren Christopher, chairman of O'Melveny & Myers in Los Angeles, said higher billing rates are also a reflection of law firms' high rents and the costs of implementing new technology, such as computers and word processors.  According to the survey, California lawyers charged the highest average billing rates.  A California lawyer with 21 or more years of experience billed $187 per hour on average.  In contrast, a lawyer with similar experience in the West Central region of the country, charged $137.  David Maister of Maister Associates, a Boston-based consulting group, said that although corporate clients are still willing to pay top prices for senior partners, they are balking at higher billing rates for starting associates, who generally perform low-level legal tasks.  "Outside counsel are going to discover that they can't keep raising the billing rates," said Ameritas's Mr. Krivoshe.  "And I have a feeling it's reaching the point where the market won't bear much more."  ---  @ Legal Bills on the Rise  @ The table below shows average hourly billing rates for lawyers at 686 law firms surveyed nationwide  @ PCT.  @ 1989 1988 INCREASE  @ New partner $113 $ 96 18%  @ Midlevel partner 137 125 10  @ Senior partner 149 143 4  @ First-year associate 87 76 14  @ Midlevel associate 108 99 9  @ Senior-level associate 116 111 5  @ Source: Altman & Weil 1989 of Law Firm Economics  Ever since Pan Am 103 was brought down by an explosive hidden in a Toshiba radio, aviation authorities have been trying to figure out how to keep such bombs off jetliners.  It hasn't been easy.  And even as security officials set up screening procedures for electronic goods, they're worrying that savvy terrorists may turn to hiding their bombs in candy jars, boots or books.  Although it was last Dec. 21 when the Pan Am disaster occurred, it was only this month that the U.S. Federal Aviation Administration put out an emergency regulation on inspecting electronic devices.  That action was preceded by months of fierce debates among FAA officials and airline security directors over how to handle the electronic devices, which can include hand-held calculators, portable TV sets and laptop computers as well as radios.  Even the final emergency regulation has loopholes big enough to slip another bomb through, security experts agree.  "We've been trying to develop the most reasonable and effective security system that we can," says Raymond Salazar, FAA director of security.  But, he adds in commenting on one loophole, "Ain't nothing perfect."  The best solution on the horizon is the thermal neutron analysis device, which can bombard checked bags with radiation to detect all kinds of explosives.  But the TNA devices won't be available for at least two or three years and will have their own shortcomings.  What to do in the meantime?  Security officials have been under enormous pressure to come up with an answer fast, partly because West German police recently found a Middle Eastern terrorist group -- the same one suspected of bombing Pan Am 103 -- in possession of four more bombs concealed in radios and video devices.  "They weren't planning to blow up just one airplane," says one terrorism expert.  Terrorists have recently favored putting bombs in electronic devices because the batteries, wiring, electrical and barometric triggers needed for a bomb blend in easily with the parts of consumer-electronic products.  As a result, aviation authorities considered an outright ban of all consumer-electronic products.  On May 2, Transportation Secretary Samuel Skinner, in a speech at the National Press Club in Washington, floated a trial balloon.  "The question on everyone's mind is what to do with electronic devices," he said.  "A total ban of all such items on airplanes is an option we have to consider."  Mr. Skinner's balloon was soon punctured.  Makers of laptop computers and other electronic gadgets phoned and wrote the Department of Transportation to express concern.  More important, some foreign governments showed reluctance to go along with a ban.  Since the major threat of bombs being put aboard a plane is in Europe and the Middle East, their cooperation would be crucial.  Airline security persons also felt a total ban would be impractical.  "Have you ever tried to take a hair dryer or curling iron away from a woman?" a security official at one big carrier asks.  Besides working a hardship on passengers, there was the problem of defining which electronic devices would be banned.  "Does the ban include a small tape recorder? . . .  A hearing aid?" asks a security director at another carrier.  "Pretty soon we'd have a laundry list of things you could and couldn't bring on board, and that could be difficult for our airport screeners to handle."  With the total ban shot down, the FAA drafted a proposed regulation that called for a physical inspection of every electronic item brought on board.  Airline security personnel were aghast.  In meetings with FAA and Transportation Department officials, they said that inspecting each electronic item would turn airport security checkpoints into giant bottlenecks.  Some passengers caught in long lines would miss their flights.  If planes were held, that would cause flight delays costly for the airlines and aggravating to the other passengers.  Even worse, the draft regulation ordered that during inspections, airline security persons should remove batteries from an electronic device. (Typically, the batteries in a device power a bomb's detonator; removing them would effectively disarm the explosive.) But what if the device is booby-trapped to explode if the batteries are removed? airline security officials asked at the meetings with government officials.  The FAA rewrote the regulation.  It now reads: "Ask the passenger to remove the batteries."  Mr. Salazar, the FAA security chief, says the regulation wasn't rewritten to protect airline security personnel but to make it easy to observe if the passenger becomes nervous when asked to take out batteries, making him or her a suspect who should be given extra scrutiny.  Of course, if a passenger is an unwitting carrier of a bomb -- as suspected in the Pan Am 103 case -- he might cheerfully remove the batteries.  And if an airline security official is standing too close, says one carrier's security director, "I guess they both go up in smoke."  The ultimate solution, airline security officials say, is the "Madrid technique."  At the airport in Madrid, Spain, a passenger with a suspicious device may be told to take it into a concrete room and, while monitored by video camera, remove the batteries.  So far as is known, U.S. carriers aren't considering this technique.  In its rewrite of the regulation, the FAA also deleted the section calling for inspection of each electronic device.  Instead, airport screeners are to ask a series of questions -- "Did you receive this item as a gift?  How long have you known this friend?"  If the answers sound innocent, the item can be cleared without inspection.  Passengers with suspicious answers will have their devices searched and be asked to remove the batteries.  If a screener still is doubtful, the device is to be X-rayed.  If doubts persist, a bomb expert is to be called.  Although the new regulation has been scaled back from a total ban to inspection of all devices to inspection of only some, government and airline officials don't view this as watering down security.  "If you try to ban everything or search everything, you're spread too thin to catch the bad guy," says one airline official.  Nevertheless, security persons admit the new regulation still may let a bomb slip through.  When a device is opened for inspection, the new rule instructs screeners to look for parts "that do not match the majority of others used."  But one of the devices seized by West German police, a Toshiba Bom Beat 453 radio recorder, had internal parts bearing Toshiba labels and wiring diagrams that were actually part of the bomb mechanism.  Some security personnel doubt that airport screeners will have the technical expertise to pick out such disguised parts.  Noting that some screeners are poorly paid and get only limited training, one airline security director said, "It's not as if we had the 82nd Airborne handling security for us."  Even if radio batteries are removed by the passenger, that may not disarm a disguised bomb.  In the Toshiba Bom Beat, there was a second set of batteries -- four tiny cells that were concealed and that powered the bomb detonator.  If a bomb in a radio doesn't get through, a bomb concealed in something else might, and security personnel are expecting terrorists to try that tactic.  With all the concentration on radios, "a terrorist would be crazy to use a Toshiba again," says Richard Lally, security vice president at the Air Transport Association.  The next bomb, security employees say, may be disguised as a book, a pair of boots or a picture frame.  Or, according to a recent FAA warning, a can of Halawi candy commonly made and given as a gift in the Middle East.  Terrorists, the FAA says, are believed to have molded plastic explosive, which looks just like the candy, to fit inside a candy tin 6 inches high and 8 inches in diameter.  How the device would be set off isn't known, but airline security persons worry terrorists may have learned how to use a chemical trigger, which would do away with the need for batteries and wires and so would be even harder to spot.  Many carriers recently banned the tins of Halawi candy from their flights.  ---  @ Recent Bombings Of Jetliners  @1982 Pan American World Airways  @(Approaching Honolulu, 1 fatality)  @1983 Gulf Air  @(Approaching Abu Dhabi, 112 fatalities)  @1985 Air India  @(Approaching Ireland, 329 fatalities)  @1986 Trans World Airlines  @(Approaching Athens, 4 fatalities)  @1987 Korean Air  @(Over Indian Ocean, 115 fatalities)  @1988 Pan American World Airways  @(Over Lockerbie, Scotland, 259 fatalities)  Thursday, July 27, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2% to 11%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 9 1/16% high, 8 15/16% low, 8 15/ 16% near closing bid, 9% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 10% to 10 1/4%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.: 8.65% 30 to 44 days; 8.55% 45 to 59 days; 8.40% 60 to 89 days; 8.25% 90 to 119 days; 8.125% 120 to 149 days; 8% 150 to 179 days; 7.625% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000: 8.80% 30 days; 8.65% 60 days; 8.52% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.50% one month; 8.44% two months; 8.40% three months; 8.20% six months; 8.13% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market: 8.90% one month; 8.65% three months; 8.50% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.73% 30 days; 8.55% 60 days; 8.37% 90 days; 8.23% 120 days; 8.05% 150 days; 7.98% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% one month; 8 7/8% to 8 3/4% two months; 8 13/16% to 8 11/16% three months; 8 3/4% to 8 5/8% four months; 8 5/8% to 8 1/2% five months; 8 5/8% to 8 1/2% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 8 15/16% one month; 8 13/16% three months; 8 5/8% six months; 8 7/16% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 14%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, July 24, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 8.09% 13 weeks; 7.73% 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 9.72%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 9%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par) 9.65%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.65%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 8.97%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  In a new twist to his maverick career, Italian financier Giancarlo Parretti was charged with the illegal export of capital from Spain.  National Court Judge Rodolfo Soto Vazquez accused Mr. Parretti of receiving 50 million pesetas ($427,000) in checks in a loan from Escala S.A., a Spanish company he controls, and arranging for the money to be deposited in a bank in Andorra without authorization from the Economy Ministry, court sources said.  Andorra is a principality situated in the Pyrenees between Spain and France.  The judge ordered Mr. Parretti to pay bail of five million pesetas ($42,700) within 72 hours or go to jail pending trial.  The judge also said Mr. Parretti would have to post a 50-million-peseta bond within 15 days to cover possible civil fines resulting from the probe.  Mr. Parretti was understood to be outside Spain, and it wasn't possible to obtain any comment from his representatives in Madrid.  Under Spanish law, Mr. Parretti faces possible imprisonment of up to six years if he's found guilty.  A police spokesman said a number of investigations are under way concerning alleged exchange-control infractions involving Banco Agricola y Comercial de Andorra, the bank into which Mr. Parretti's checks were said to be deposited.  Since 1987, Mr. Parretti has become a high-profile investor in Spain's real-estate and hotel industries.  He still faces charges in Italy of falsifying the financial records of a newspaper concern he managed several years ago.  Initial claims for regular state unemployment benefits rose to a seasonally adjusted 354,000 in the week ended July 15 from 335,000 in the previous week, the Labor Department said.  The number of people receiving regular state benefits in the week ended July 8 increased to a seasonally adjusted 2,247,000, or 2.2% of those covered by unemployment insurance, from 2,124,000 in the previous week, when the insured unemployment rate was 2.1%.  Counting all state and federal benefit programs, the number of people receiving unemployment benefits in the week ended July 8 rose to 2,233,400 from a revised 1,865,000 a week earlier.  These figures aren't seasonally adjusted.  The British government lifted restrictions on the marketing ties between British Telecommunications PLC and Mitel Corp., its 51%-owned Canadian manufacturing subsidiary.  The decision will allow the two companies to broaden their cooperation in marketing Mitel's telecommunications equipment, Mitel officials said.  Shares of Mitel, based in Kanata, Ontario, rose 37.5 cents to close at $3.625 in New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday.  Mitel officials declined to comment on whether the lifting of the marketing restrictions would prompt a bid by British Telecom for the Mitel shares it doesn't already own.  Speculation about such a bid has contributed to recent strength in Mitel's share price.  The restrictions were imposed in 1986 when British Telecom purchased its Mitel interest.  The measures were prompted by British government concerns that the British market for telephone switching equipment would become less competitive as a result of Mitel being controlled by British Telecom, Britain's main supplier of telephone service and equipment.  The restrictions limited British Telecom's purchases of Mitel equipment to British Telecom's 1985 purchase level of about 40 million Canadian dollars (US$33.8 million).  The restrictions also required British Telecom and Mitel to keep their British marketing activities separate.  Mark Lawrence, an analyst at Prudential-Bache Securities Canada Ltd., said removal of the restrictions will benefit Mitel in the long term but won't have any impact on earnings over the next 18 months.  Mitel President John Jarvis said lifting the restrictions will "provide us with the opportunity to demonstrate the full potential of the British Telecom-Mitel collaboration."  Mitel grew rapidly in the 1970s and early 1980s, producing telephone switching equipment for small and medium-size businesses.  It moved into the red in 1983 as a result of a softening of the market and technical problems with its new digital switches.  The company moved back into the black in fiscal 1989 ended March 31, registering net income of C$22.2 million on revenue of C$432.1 million.  Mitel, which has closed plants and cut back on its work force in recent years, is currently operating at about 65% to 70% of capacity, company officials said.  Mr. Jarvis said Mitel is looking to acquire a U.S. distributor to strengthen its U.S. distribution channels.  The U.S. accounted for 37% of its sales in fiscal 1989.  Mitel claims to be the leading supplier in the U.S. of switching equipment serving 100 lines or less.  UNICORP CANADA Corp. said the staff of the Ontario Securities Commission said it violated Canadian securities laws in a 1985 takeover attempt.  A previous edition inaccurately said the opinion was issued by the commission itself.  (See: "Enterprise Brief -- Dunkin' Donuts Inc.: Chain Gets Order Blocking Kingsbridge's Tender Offer" -- WSJ July 27, 1989)  The Commerce Department, upholding trade complaints filed by American Telephone & Telegraph Co. and Comdial Corp., issued preliminary rulings that manufacturers of business telephone systems in Japan, Taiwan and South Korea are "dumping" their products in the U.S.  The rulings, if upheld, could lead to punitive duties on the imports, which were valued at more than $1.3 billion in 1988.  Dumping is selling in the U.S. at prices below the cost of production or the homemarket prices.  The department's handling of the cases could signal that it is taking a tougher stance in dumping cases.  At least one foreign manufacturer, Japan's Matsushita Electric Industrial Co., said the department's requests for information were so onerous that it decided to stop cooperating with the investigation.  "We withdrew because the demands made by the department were completely and unnecessarily onerous," said A. Paul Victor, one of Matsushita's lawyers.  "It was worse than a Peat Marwick audit."  A Commerce Department aide said that because the agency couldn't obtain complete price data, it used the "best information available" to make its preliminary determinations.  Much of that information was simply lifted from the AT&T complaint, he admitted.  That may explain some unusually high "dumping margins" -- the department's calculations of the extent to which the systems are being dumped.  For instance, the department said the margins were 178.93% on telephone systems manufactured by Matsushita, 136.77% on those from Toshiba Corp., and 129.73% on those from the Taiwanese subsidiary of Japan's Nitsuko Ltd.  These margins, which allegedly represent the ratio between the products' U.S. and home-market prices, would equal the amount of penalty duties that will be imposed if the department's preliminary finding is upheld.  These high dumping margins could drive up the retail prices on these office-phone systems.  Even though the finding on telephones is still a preliminary one, importers of the affected products have to make cash deposits or post bonds with the Customs Service to cover the potential duties until the inquiry runs its full course.  The clear winner, at least for this round, is AT&T.  Its own telephone systems could have much easier sailing if foreign competitors are forced to raise their prices.  Comdial, which joined AT&T in the petition, is a smaller manufacturer based in Charlottesville, Va.  The department assigned much smaller dumping margins to South Korean suppliers, who reportedly cooperated fully with the inquiry.  These margins were 9.33% for the Samsung Electronics Co. affiliate of Samsung Group, 6.09% for the Gold Star Co. subsidiary of Lucky Gold Star Group, and 7.79% for other Korean brands.  The department said U.S. imports of the telephone systems totaled $775 million from Japan, $341 million from Taiwan, and $226 million from South Korea.  Besides putting off Matsushita with its demands for information, the Commerce Department invoked a rarely used provision of trade law to ask Nitsuko's Taiwanese subsidiary for information about the pricing policies of its Japanese parent.  Lawyers following the case reported that Nitsuko failed to comply with that request, saying the request imposed too heavy a burden and that the deadlines were short.  A spokesman for AT&T said the department's action "represents major progress on the way to the ultimate result we seek -- elimination of unfair pricing in the U.S."  He said the company is "committed to being a profitable competitor in the small-business communications marketplace, and once this pervasive underpricing ends, we intend to be very successful."  AT&T had hesitated for many months to bring the dumping cases for fear doing so could hurt the company's efforts to expand its overseas business.  "Japan and Korea are important to AT&T's global thrust," the spokesman said.  RJR Nabisco yanked its Winston and Camel accounts from ad agency McCann-Erickson, and awarded the cigarette brands -- which together billed more than $55 million last year -- to two other agencies on its roster.  RJR said FCB/Leber Katz Partners will handle advertising for Winston, while Young & Rubicam picks up Camel.  FCB/Leber Katz, the New York outpost of Foote, Cone & Belding Communications, already handles advertising for Salem, Vantage and Ritz as well as some other Nabisco products.  Young & Rubicam currently handles More, Now and Chelsea cigarettes.  The loss deals a severe blow to McCann-Erickson, and is perhaps the worst of a series of setbacks suffered recently by the Interpublic Group of Cos. unit.  The agency's New York office lost the $20 million to $25 million American Express Gold Card account and the $15 million to $25 million Shearson Lehman Hutton account earlier this year -- losses only partially offset by some small wins.  In May, the agency's top creative executive, John Nieman, jumped ship for D'Arcy Masius Benton & Bowles.  Meanwhile, McCann-Erickson's carefully cultivated relationship with RJR management had suffered since last year's acquisition of RJR by Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. Edward A. Horrigan Jr., former chairman of RJR's tobacco unit, had been close to several top McCann-Erickson executives; that close relationship hasn't been duplicated with the new leadership.  In an effort to strengthen its management, McCann-Erickson said yesterday that Sean Kevin Fitzpatrick, currently vice chairman of its sister company Lintas:Campbell-Ewald in Detroit, will become McCann's U.S. vice chairman and chief creative officer.  Mr. Fitzpatrick, who will succeed Mr. Nieman, is a highly regarded creative executive credited with Chevrolet's hugely popular "Heartbeat of America" campaign.  Mr. Fitzpatrick will work on a special project at Interpublic before moving to McCann-Erickson.  McCann-Erickson's sudden firing came amid criticism of its Camel "Old Joe" cartoon-camel campaign, which some consumer groups claim encourages children to smoke.  The move also came as Winston, the nation's second-largest-selling cigarette after Marlboro, is suffering further declines in market share -- a decline that a series of ad campaigns has failed to stem.  Industry executives say RJR has long been planning to yank the Winston account, and decided to move Camel, too, in order to consolidate at agencies where it is large enough to wield considerable clout.  Industry executives also believe the move signals that RJR doesn't plan to increase ad spending on some cigarette brands -- and may even slash spending as the company struggles to pay down debt from last year's buy-out.  "I think the changes were made mostly because they anticipate that their cigarette spending isn't going to grow dramatically," said one ad industry executive familiar wtih RJR.  "If you've got four agencies and don't have much money to spread around, you don't need as many agencies."  RJR's other agency, Winston-Salem, N.C.-based Long, Haymes & Carr, is unaffected by yesterday's moves.  An RJR spokeswoman attributed the switch simply to "streamlining our agency relationships.  We're in the process of restructuring our company, and we're looking for every way we can to streamline what we do."  Winston's market share has been steadily falling for years.  Its recent advertising hasn't been memorable; even RJR staffers and ad agency executives couldn't recall its latest campaign slogan when asked yesterday. (For those of you who can't either, it's got a sports theme with the tagline "Winning Taste.")  Winston commanded a 10.7 share of the market in 1988, down from 11.1 in 1987, according to Wheat First Securities, Richmond, Va.  For the 12 months ended June 30, Winston's share fell again, to 10.2.  Even as Winston's grasp on the market slipped, however, McCann-Erickson's latest campaign for Camel appeared to be a rousing success.  Buoyed by the high-profile, if somewhat goofy, Old Joe cartoon campaign, the brand's filtered cigarettes grew to a 2.9 share in 1988 from 2.7 the year before and 2.6 three years before that, according to Wheat First; its smaller, nonfiltered cigarette business continued to decline slightly each year.  "We're very pleased with the results the overall campaign has achieved," the RJR spokeswoman said.  But the Camel campaign has sparked outcries in some circles.  It was widely derided Tuesday -- the day before McCann-Erickson was fired -- at a congressional subcommittee hearing on a bill to restrict cigarette advertising.  James W. Johnston, RJR's chairman and chief executive officer, even wrote a letter to Rep. Gerry Sikorski (D., Minn.) apologizing for one of the ads, which explains how to pick up girls at the beach.  "This ad should never have run," Mr. Johnston said in his June 16 letter.  "I apologize to you and others who were offended by it and can assure you that it will never run again."  Also at Tuesday's hearing, a former model for Winston cigarettes testified that the Winston ads were aimed at young people.  According to Leading National Advertisers, Camel spent $24.4 million on advertising in 1988, while Winston spent $30.3 million, not including spending on sports promotions.  Some ad agency executives, however, contend that actual billings are far greater, since LNA doesn't count all non-broadcast media.  Young & Rubicam wouldn't comment, but Stanley Katz, chairman and chief executive of FCB/Leber Katz, said his agency was "thrilled" to handle both Winston and Salem, RJR's two largest brands.  Turning around Winston's declining fortunes "is going to be very difficult.  Reynolds knows it's going to be very difficult and we're realistic about that," he said.  But he added, "We're very optimistic."  At McCann-Erickson, meanwhile, a spokeswoman said, "We don't dispute the fact that it is in RJR's best interest to consolidate.  We only regret that we're the odd man out."  McCann-Erickson still retains RJR tobacco business in 19 countries abroad, handles tobacco direct marketing, and advertises crackers and other RJR Nabisco brands in the U.S.  ---  Ad Notes....  NEW ACCOUNTS: New York ad agency LGFE, formerly known as Lord Geller Federico Einstein, picked up three accounts totaling $15 million: Fasolino Foods Co., North Bergen, N.J.; Palm-Aire Spa Resort and Country Club, Pompano Beach, Fla.; and Citizens for a Drug Free America, a new citizens action group in Washington.  NEWSPAPER SPENDING: Newspaper Advertising Bureau, New York, lowered its 1989 forecast of U.S. newspaper ad expenditures to a 5% increase from a 6% gain.  A spokesman said the revision was made to reflect a slowdown in classified ad growth and less optimistic expectations for the economy for the rest of 1989.  The Japan Fair Trade Commission warned beef importers to disband an organization that it says ran an illegal cartel for three years.  After a nearly yearlong probe, the commission concluded that the Beef Importers Council, to which 36 Japanese trading companies belong, operated a cartel between October 1985 and October 1988.  The commission requested an immediate breakup of the council, "so a cartel will never be formed again," according to Mitsuru Suzuki, a commission investigator.  "By fixing each company's share, the cartel prevented free competition in the market for imported beef, which is a violation of the anti-cartel law," he said.  Mr. Suzuki said the trading houses -- which included Mitsubishi Corp., Mitsui & Co., and C. Itoh & Co. -- had fixed the share of imported beef each would sell to the semigovernmental Livestock Industry Promotion Corp. before actual bidding took place.  "We take the warning seriously," said Junichi Mizusuna, a representative of the Beef Importers Council.  But he declined to comment on whether the council would disband.  The commission urged the Livestock Industry Promotion Corp. to stop providing trading houses with a calculation of their "recommended share" of beef imports, which "played a major role in encouraging the illegal cartel," investigator Suzuki said.  Adnan Khashoggi was released from jail after a U.S. appeals court judge cleared the way for the Saudi arms merchant to post bail of $10 million.  The U.S. Attorney's office in Manhattan had asked the appeals court to revoke a district judge's order setting the bail, claiming that the bail conditions wouldn't guarantee Mr. Khashoggi's appearance at trial.  But Judge Lawrence Pierce denied the motion.  Last Wednesday, Mr. Khashoggi pleaded innocent to charges of obstruction of justice and mail fraud.  He has been accused of helping former Philippine President Ferdinand Marcos and his wife, Imelda, hide assets that the Marcoses allegedly stole from the Philippines.  Mr. Khashoggi was extradited from Switzerland last week.  Judge John Keenan, whose order setting bail was upheld, scheduled the trial to begin March 14.  As part of the bail order, Mr. Khashoggi also is required to wear an electronic monitoring bracelet and meet other conditions.  MAI Basic Four Inc. dropped its hostile tender offer for Prime Computer Inc., but said it still plans to forge ahead with a proxy fight for control of the computer company's board.  The move came one day after J.H. Whitney & Co., which agreed to acquire Prime in a transaction valued at $1.2 billion, said that its bankers, Bank of Boston Corp. and Chemical Banking Corp., demanded that Whitney arrange "substantial additional" financing because of Prime's weak operating results.  Prime posted a $19 million loss on a 6.5% decline in sales for the second quarter, raising some doubts among the banks whether Prime has enough cash flow to cover the heavy interest expenses from the acquisition.  In dropping its tender offer, MAI, of Tustin, Calif., said it couldn't get extensions of its financing commitments from Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. and Merrill Lynch & Co. "because of frequent changes which have occurred in Prime's estimates and projections of its results of operations for the current year, the announcement by J.H. Whitney that it was having difficulty financing its tender offer for Prime common stock, and certain concerns which have arisen with respect to Prime's historical financial statements and financial projections."  In Natick, Mass., Prime said it has "confidence that the Whitney acquisition of Prime will be consummated."  It added that it rejected a suggestion it said MAI made that Prime reimburse some $25 million in MAI expenses if MAI maintained its tender offer as an alternative to J.H. Whitney's.  Prime said that suggestion was conditioned on MAI's obtaining extensions of its financing for the offer.  Prime also changed the terms of its stockholder-rights plan making them effective when a third party acquires 10% or more of Prime's stock.  Previously the trigger point was 20%.  Whitney partners were unavailable for comment yesterday.  Prime's shares rose 50 cents each to close at $16.25 in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  The combination of MAI's action and J.H. Whitney's announcement Wednesday had arbitragers wringing their hands.  "Where does this mess end up?" asked one frustrated arbitrager.  "Everyone had been saying that if Whitney goes home, you still had {MAI} at $19.50.  Now you just have Whitney."  MAI will focus on a plan it unveiled last week to unseat Prime's seven-member board, and force a sale of Prime's minicomputer business to MAI for $450 million in cash and $150 million in debentures.  Proceeds from the sale would be used to buy back Prime shares on the open market.  By selling its traditional minicomputer business, Prime would be left with the computerized-design equipment business it acquired last year for $435 million.  MAI said it will soon file proxy solicitation materials with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Prime Wednesday adjourned its annual meeting until Aug. 9.  Since Whitney emerged as a friendly suitor last month, analysts had given MAI's bid little chance of succeeding.  Whitney has offered $21.50 a share in cash for 49.5 million Prime shares and $22 face amount of debentures for 13 million additional shares.  MAI's offer, which expired at midnight last night, was for $19.50 a share cash for 49.5 million shares and $21 face amount of debentures for the remaining shares.  But with Whitney's current difficulties in financing the bid, MAI appears to have a much better chance of succeeding, analysts said.  "It may be the only alternative investors have, if Whitney indeed can't get the money," said Robert M. Johnson, a technology analyst with Rotan Mosle Inc. in Houston.  "If no deal goes through, the value of Prime's stock would fall back to the $10 to $12 range."  MAI originally offered $20 a share for Prime, but cut its offer on June 1, saying that Prime's financial condition had deteriorated.  And some analysts, including Mr. Johnson, said Whitney could do the same, given the latest losses at Prime.  Investors and analysts are divided on the merits of MAI's proposal to buy Prime's minicomputer business.  One bondholder said Prime "would have to be brain-dead to reject it," since the minicomputer business is rapidly declining.  However, Jay P. Stevens, an analyst with Dean Witter, said the plan wouldn't work because the remaining Prime would consist only of computerized-design equipment, known as CAD/CAM, and would be highly leveraged.  He said the slow growing minicomputer business doesn't require much research and development funding and spins off cash.  When Simon Tookoome began selling his drawings in the late 1960s, he was lucky to command $5 or $10 each.  Today, the 55-year-old Canadian Eskimo routinely sells each drawing through his local cooperative at Baker Lake, in Canada's Arctic, for $300 or more.  Many Canadian Eskimos (or Inuit, as they call themselves) once earned a living mainly by hunting and trapping.  Today, they are thriving as artists, some earning in excess of $100,000 annually.  A whalebone drummer by Inuk David Atchealak fetched over $37,000 at a recent art auction at Waddington's in Toronto, the highest price reportedly ever paid for an Inuit work.  Corporations such as Toronto Dominion Bank and Rothman's Inc. boast large Inuit art collections.  And Amway Corp.'s Japanese subsidiary recently put up $1 million to sponsor an exhibit by Inuit artists that opened in New York in June.  The Inuit artists are prospering because they are using modern business methods to solve their core problem: the producing and marketing of art in the far-flung Arctic.  They own and operate small co-op businesses that collect their work and sell it to "southern" dealers and buyers in North America and abroad.  As such, the Inuit experience may serve as a guide to other groups trying to profit from ethnic arts and crafts.  Indeed, American Indian groups seem to have enjoyed their biggest commercial success when they went the co-op route.  And the success stories have begun attracting investors, most notably big Japanese financial houses, including Daiwa Securities Corp.  It is the all-encompassing nature of the 1980s-style cooperatives that has made them effective.  They don't just peddle art.  They stockpile raw material for the artists for the cold winter months when the region is impassable.  They collect key data on prices and market trends and act as auditors and bookkeepers.  Regularly, they organize workshops to help artists with new design ideas and new media.  And, in the beginning, by regulating production and the quality of prints, they also helped maintain a high level of prices.  But success also has hurt the Inuit co-ops.  Many of the top artists they helped establish have defected, choosing to deal directly with galleries and potential buyers.  "Why do I need to sell to the co-op when I can get a better deal from the south?" asks Bart Hanna, a Inuk sculptor from Igloolik in Canada's Northwest Territories.  Some see so much commercial exploitation that the purity of the art form has been tarnished.  Still others decry the growing layers of bureaucracy.  Says Alma Houston, who helped start Cape Dorset -- one of the first co-ops -- on Canada's Baffin Island in 1961: "Some of them have gotten too pedestrian, they lack imagination."  If the co-ops are going to successfully fend off competitors, the artists will have to once again be involved in the co-op and new marketing ideas will have to be found.  If the co-ops want to continue as leaders in promoting and selling Inuit art, she says, "they will have to smarten up."  Still, "without the co-ops, Inuit art wouldn't be as well-known as it is today," says Gunther Abrahamson in Ottawa, a retired government official who helped develop the first Arctic co-ops.  Nor, possibly, would there be thriving art industries in other native American cultures.  Today, cooperative businesses owned and operated by artists are playing a pivotal role in marketing the art of tribal artists all across North America.  "Cooperatives not only have facilitated the sale of works of art by native Americans, they also have created a forum where the traditions and styles of native American art can be handed down from generation to generation," says Halsey North, a New York art-group consultant.  In Cherokee, N.C., for example, Qualla Arts & Crafts Mutual Inc., sells the work of nearly 300 Eastern Cherokee artists and craftsmen through a retail store and a mail-order catalog.  And in addition to buying $15,000 to $20,000 of work from many artists, it also mails to each artist two dividend checks each year, amounting to about 5% of their total sales.  Qualla, which began operating in 1946, earns most of its revenue from its store in Cherokee, selling items like arrowhead ash trays that cost $4 and sculpture priced at $900.  The items are also marketed through a mail-order catalog: 30,000 or so were mailed in the past three years.  In addition, the co-op sells the art work at state fairs and exhibitions and represents artists in dealing with commercial buyers.  For the Cherokee, most of whom prefer a rural, isolated existence, "the art couldn't have been sold without the co-op," George Holt of the North Carolina Arts Council says.  In Alaska, artists' co-ops have successfully bridged the problem of distance and fragmented markets, adds Jean Flanagan Carlo of the Institute of Alaska Native Arts, Fairbanks, Alaska.  Two or three times a year, the co-ops sweep through the state providing raw materials, such as stone and fabric, and buying work to sell to buyers in the cities.  Says Ms. Carlo, "None of the artists have the resources to do this on their own."  Nowhere did artists need co-ops more than in the Arctic.  The Inuit live in scattered settlements, days of travel away from each other and far from their markets.  And in the early days, there was no market to speak of.  Says Mr. Tookoome: "I had to sell to anyone and take any price they would give me."  The promotion of Inuit handicrafts began when the Canadian Handicrafts Guild sent Ms. Houston, a teacher, and her husband, Jim Houston, an art collector, to the north to encourage development of local industries among the Eskimos.  The two established Cape Dorset's co-op with the help of the government and local Inuit artists.  Among the first accomplishments of co-ops like Cape Dorset was to develop a system for producing and selling art.  Traditionally, each artist would sail up to the quarries and bring back, at most, two or three stones for carving.  If the weather was bad or the rivers froze, they wouldn't travel at all.  To remedy the problem, the co-op rented large 40-foot boats and brought back enough stones for a season.  As for buying work, the co-ops were open year-round, a sharp contrast to the days when a potential buyer would appear maybe once a year.  "We created a stable market," says Ms. Houston.  By the mid 1960s, the 30-or-so Arctic co-ops asked the Canadian government for help in organizing a central marketing system.  In response, the government established Canadian Arctic Producers and financed its early operations.  But it wasn't until the 1970s that the marketing group began to have an impact.  By that time, notes Bill Lyall, a senior marketing official, "we had established a regular channel of distribution and a group of dealers aggressively promoting Inuit art."  Ford Motor Co. agreed to buy the Associates Corp. consumer and commercial finance unit of Paramount Communications Inc. for $3.35 billion.  Paramount, which recently lost its battle to take over Time Inc. with a $12 billion hostile bid, said it expects to realize net proceeds of about $2.7 billion on the sale, and to report an after-tax gain of about $1.3 billion.  Paramount had announced last spring that it planned to sell the Associates unit to focus on its entertainment and communications businesses.  Ford plans to operate Associates as a separate entity in its Ford Financial Services Group.  The acquisition is the largest ever by the group, and comes at a time when the auto maker is aggressively trying to cushion itself from a downturn in the auto industry.  Ford officials said last year they expected financial services to make up 30% of the company's earnings over time.  Ford immediately moved toward that goal by doubling the size of its First Nationwide Financial Corp. unit through acquisitions and federally assisted takeovers, making it the nation's second-largest thrift holding company.  "Our purpose in emphasizing the financial services business is to provide a layer of stability to offset the cyclical times of the auto industry," said George V. Brown III, executive director of strategic planning for the financial services group.  "There's nothing Ford can do about the cyclicality of the auto business, but there is something we can do about the cyclicality of the company's earnings."  The Associates acquisition increases the asset size of Ford's financial services group 14% to $114 billion.  However, the push to increase the financial services operations hasn't paid off yet.  The No. 2 auto maker, reporting second-quarter earnings yesterday, said that profit from its financial services group declined nearly 20% to $173 million, primarily because of lower net interest margins.  Associates, based in Dallas, is the nation's third-largest independent finance company as measured by total capital funds.  It provides a range of consumer finance, commercial finance and leasing, and related insurance products.  In addition to its U.S. operations, the company has offices in the U.K., Japan and Canada.  Ford officials said they were determined to acquire Associates when they learned in April that Paramount planned to put it up for sale.  "We've admired this company for a long, long time," Mr. Brown said.  "It's a strong company and a strong management team."  Ford said Associates will significantly increase its role in consumer lending, particularly home-equity loans.  However, Mr. Brown said the auto maker won't attempt to merge Associates with any of its other financial services units.  Reece A. Overcash Jr. will remain chairman of Associates, reporting to Kenneth Whipple, a Ford executive vice president and president of the financial services group.  Although Paramount never disclosed how much it expected to get for Associates, the company indicated when the unit was first put on the block that it could fetch $3 billion to $5 billion.  Mark Manson, an analyst at Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette Inc., said the price is "within 10% of what we had been looking for."  Some on Wall Street have suggested that a sale of Associates would put pressure on Paramount to make a sizable acquisition, both to use the cash and to replace the profits from the unit, which accounted for 46% of Paramount's operating profit in 1988.  Moreover, analysts have said that the cash from a sale would make Paramount a more attractive target.  But Mr. Manson said the sale doesn't put any serious pressure on Paramount.  "It doesn't change Paramount's situation because everyone has assumed it would be done," he said.  "The fact that a sale has been executed doesn't change that."  He also said having the cash on hand "doesn't make Paramount any easier to take over."  He said Paramount's chairman and chief executive officer, Martin S. Davis, "has always said the company is for sale at the right price anyway.  Now the element of uncertainty as to how much the Associates is worth is removed."  After failing in its bid for Time, Paramount said it was looking at other options to meet its goal of expanding in the entertainment and communications businesses.  Prior to making its bid for Time, the company was said to be looking at a number of possible candidates, including McGraw-Hill Inc., Viacom Inc. and Tribune Co.  It isn't clear whether the company would be prepared to make another hostile run in the wake of Time's success in the Delaware courts in thwarting its offer.  In a statement accompanying the announcement, Mr. Davis called the sale "the final step in our strategic development into a pure communications company, with operations solely in the entertainment and publishing fields."  He added: "It is our intention to aggressively build these core businesses and accelerate our growth world-wide."  CBS Broadcast Group Chairman Gene F. Jankowski resigned to form a company that will acquire local television stations, one year after he was pushed out of the top job he had held for 11 years in running CBS Inc.'s only major business group.  Mr. Jankowski, 55 years old, becomes the last of nine top executives to have left CBS since it was taken over three years ago by Laurence A. Tisch, who controls a 24.9% stake in the company and is its president and chief executive officer.  Mr. Jankowski, a 28-year CBS veteran, is forming Jankowski Communications Systems Inc. and said he already is discussing several possible acquisitions.  Mr. Jankowski said he is leaving CBS now because the time is right for buying local stations affiliated with the three major networks.  Prices have fallen sharply as more outlets have gone onto the market.  "I feel terrific," he said.  "After three decades, it's time for a new venture, one of my own making."  But it was also clear that Mr. Jankowski had little left to do at CBS.  In July 1988, Mr. Tisch moved Howard Stringer, then president of the CBS network's news division, into Mr. Jankowski's job as president of the overarching CBS Broadcast Group, which encompasses the network, TV stations and radio stations -- the only major business CBS has left.  In a statement, Mr. Tisch and CBS's founder and chairman, William S. Paley, praised Mr. Jankowski's long tenure, while Mr. Jankowski cited his "wonderful" career and CBS's "excellent position for future success."  CBS has been the third-place network for two years.  Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. hired Joan Caridi, a senior Oppenheimer & Co. official, as its compliance director.  A securities firm's compliance director is a legal watchdog who makes sure the firm and its employees don't violate securities laws.  The job is considered particularly important at Drexel in the wake of Drexel's agreement to plead guilty to six felonies and pay a record $650 million in fines and restitution for securities-laws violations.  In a related settlement with the Securities and Exchange Commission, Drexel agreed to strengthen its oversight by appointing new officers and implementing procedures approved by the commission.  In appointing Ms. Caridi, Drexel officials overruled the firm's chairman, John Shad, people familiar with the decision said.  His choice for the compliance post was Ida C. Wurczinger, a Washington, D.C., attorney who served as Mr. Shad's assistant while he was SEC chairman, the people said.  Ms. Caridi's appointment was approved by the SEC, Drexel said.  Ms. Caridi, who will join Drexel Aug. 7, has worked the past five years at Oppenheimer, most recently as senior vice president and associate general counsel.  A graduate of Brooklyn Law School, Ms. Caridi previously worked in the legal department at Lehman Brothers, Kuhn Loeb Inc., a predecessor of Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., and the law firm of Sherman & Sterling.  At Lehman, Ms. Caridi worked with Saul Cohen, who was recently appointed Drexel's general counsel.  Ms. Caridi didn't return phone calls to her office.  A Drexel spokesman declined to comment on the decision to overrule Mr. Shad.  Ms. Wurczinger is a senior associate at the law firm of Sullivan & Cromwell, but she hasn't been employed directly by a securities firm, people familiar with the decision said.  A secretary for Ms. Wurczinger said she couldn't be reached.  Mr. Shad "lost out in his bid because Ms. Caridi is considered more qualified for this job," said a person with knowledge of the Drexel appointment.  Bigger Down Payments  Stifle Home Buying  DOWN PAYMENTS have become the biggest barrier to homeownership, and the hurdle is getting higher.  Although mortgage-interest rates in many areas have fallen below 10% for the first time in more than a year, more lenders and builders now require 20% down, particularly in high-cost markets.  That's double the traditional 10% down payment.  "The down payment is certainly the biggest constraint" for buyers, says Kenneth T. Rosen, chairman of the Center for Real Estate and Urban Economics at the University of California at Berkeley.  He adds that high housing prices and high rental costs combined make it increasingly tough for would-be buyers to save enough for a down payment.  In pricey regions, down payments for a median-priced home these days may run $50,000 or more, an amount few new buyers have accumulated.  A study by the Joint Center for Housing Studies at Harvard University and the Massachusetts Institute of Technology says a relaxation of down-payment requirements, plus a drop in mortgage rates of 1 1/2 percentage points, would open the housing market to 670,000 more households in the 25-to-34-year-old age bracket.  Now, only 1.3 million, or 11.5% of renter households in the 25-to-34-year-old group, can buy a starter house.  Because of the down-payment barrier, homeownership rates for people 25 to 29 years old dropped to 36.2% last year from 43.3% in 1980.  For the 30-to 34-year-old group, the homeownership rate fell to 52.6% from 61.1% in 1980.  The growing down-payment problem for home buyers, however, is creating an opportunity for some people.  Investors have been raking in big profits with "shared-equity" mortgages in which they help buyers with down payments in exchange for a share in any increase in the house's value.  Rents Keep Climbing  In West and Northeast  FOR PEOPLE who can't afford to buy and are still renting apartments in the West and Northeast, there's more bad news.  In the Northeast, median rent prices last year jumped to a record $420 a month from $408 in 1986 and $350 in 1980.  And in the West, rental rates hit $470 a month, up from $468 in 1986 and $389 in 1980, the Joint Center for Housing Studies says.  In the South and Midwest, which have an oversupply of multifamily units, rents have fallen or remained stable.  In the South, rents hover at $335, down from about $345 a month in 1985; Midwest rents are around $350, about the same as in the mid-1980s.  The reason for the higher rates "is straight supply and demand," says Jonathan Kempner, executive director of the National Multi-Housing Council.  Construction of multifamily units has fallen everywhere because the 1986 tax code removed tax incentives for builders.  The West and the Northeast have been affected most because of heavier demand from residents, more of whom are renting because they can't afford home prices in their areas.  Property Exchanges  May Lose Their Appeal  CONGRESS, looking for ways to raise more tax revenue, may chisel away more of the investment benefits of tax-deferred property exchanges.  Such exchanges have appeal because they allow investors and property owners to swap property while deferring tax payments on the property they acquire.  Investors can exchange property indefinitely and never pay taxes, even when it's passed on to offspring.  But exchanges have been under mounting congressional attack.  In 1987, Congress approved a $100,000 ceiling on gains investors can claim through exchanges in a single year.  Now, under a proposed bill in the House Ways and Means Committee, the appeal of the exchanges would diminish even more.  In the most significant proposal, the committee voted to limit exchanges only to properties similar or related in use.  An apartment building, for instance, couldn't be swapped for raw land, and a motel couldn't be exchanged for a shopping center.  Both trades are now allowed.  By restricting exchanges, congressional sources say some deals now granted tax-deferments would become taxable.  Another proposal requires investors to hold property for at least a year after a swap; there currently is no time constraint.  Congressional sources say the one-year period would discourage frequent tax-free swaps.  The bill would generate revenue of more than $1 billion over five years starting in 1990, according to congressional estimates.  But the real-estate industry disagrees with those estimates.  Executives of real-estate trade groups say clamping down on exchanges will only discourage people from doing them.  Because exchanges often include three transactions -- one of which typically involves a sale-tax revenue from the cash deal would be lost.  Odds and Ends  HOME PRICES in the U.S. are expected to increase by 10.5% this year, up slightly from the 10.3% jump last year, Chicago Title & Trust Co. says.  Prices in Washington, D.C., are expected to jump 16.2%, followed by San Diego at 13% and Detroit at 11.9%.  The smallest increases are projected in the Miami-Fort Lauderdale area (6.2%), followed by New York (6.5%) and the Kansas City area (8.5%). . . .  U.S. and foreign investors are expected to spend $300 billion on U.S. real estate between now and 2000, estimates Arthur Andersen & Co.'s Real Estate Services Group and housing economist Michael Sumichrast.  Ziff Communications Co. named Eric Hippeau publisher of Ziff-Davis Publishing Co.'s PC Magazine, succeeding Bill Machrone.  Ziff-Davis is a subsidiary of Ziff Communications.  Mr. Hippeau had been publisher of InfoWorld, which is owned by International Data Group.  Mr. Machrone remains editor in chief of PC Magazine and takes a new post as its publishing director.  In addition, Claude Sheer was named publisher of Ziff-Davis's PC Week, succeeding J. Scott Briggs.  Mr. Briggs becomes a senior vice president of Ziff-Davis.  Mr. Sheer also takes the new post of publishing director of Digital Review, where he had been publisher.  He remains publisher of Government Computer News.  Bill Dwyer, currently special assistant to the president of Ziff-Davis, was named publisher of Digital Review.  Separately, Jeffrey Miller was promoted to publisher of MacUser, from associate publisher.  He succeeds Martin Mazner, who resigned to become executive vice president of ComputerWare, a Palo Alto, Calif., retailer.  Digital Review, Government Computer News and MacUser are owned by Ziff-Davis.  Two rating concerns downgraded about $6 billion in securities of First Interstate Bancorp, citing concern about continuing large losses from real-estate loans by the bank holding company's Arizona and Texas subsidiaries.  Moody's Investors Service Inc. said it lowered its ratings on the Los Angeles company's debt to Baa-1 from single-A-2, and on First Interstate's major subsidiary banks in seven states.  Standard & Poor's Corp. said it downgraded its ratings on the parent's senior debt to single-A-minus from single-A, subordinated debt to triple-B-plus from single-A-minus, preferred stock to triple-B from triple-B-plus, and commercial paper to A-2 from A-1, among other changes.  Moody's said First Interstate is poorly protected against problem real-estate markets in Arizona and Texas, and that it expects the company to continue making "very high charge-offs and provisions" against earnings.  S&P cited similar reasons, and said First Interstate's capital position would remain "weak over at least the intermediate term," absent a restructuring or an attempt to build capital externally.  First Interstate said it was disappointed by the actions, and that its plans should produce "continued improvement in performance, operation fundamentals, expense reduction, capital formation and core earnings."  It said Moody's cited its "very strong core profitability" and success in reducing troubled Third World debt.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, First Interstate shares closed at $62 a share, down 12.5 cents.  The Commerce Department ruled that imports of steel rails from Canada are being subsidized by the Canadian government and have been sold to U.S. buyers at unfairly low prices.  The ruling could lead to the imposition of penalty duties on the imports if the U.S. International Commission rules that they are injuring a U.S. industry.  The investigation began after Bethlehem Steel Corp. filed a petition against the Canadian imports, which total more than $100 million annually.  The department said Sydney Steel Corp. and other Canadian companies have received large government subsidies.  It said Algoma Steel Corp. Ltd. and other Canadian exporters also are "dumping" steel rails in the U.S.  Dumping is defined as selling at prices below production costs or home-market prices.  In a decision putting copyright concerns ahead of free-press interests, a federal judge ordered that a manuscript about L. Ron Hubbard be turned over to his authorized biographer for inspection before publication.  U.S. District Judge Louis Stanton ruled that New Era Publications International had reason to believe its copyrights might be violated by the planned book on the late Mr. Hubbard, who died in 1986.  The judge said permitting New Era to see Carol Publishing Group's edited manuscript before publication "does not invade Carol's editorial process."  New Era has certain exclusive copyrights for some of Mr. Hubbard's private papers for the purpose of writing the authorized biography of the late founder of the Church of Scientology.  New Era is a Copenhagen publisher of Scientology books.  Scientology, founded by Mr. Hubbard, teaches that spiritual competence is achieved by "erasing" mental images in the unconscious mind that cause irrational behavior.  If New Era, prior to publication, found what it believed to be unauthorized use of copyrighted material in the Carol Publishing manuscript, New Era could sue to enjoin release of the planned book.  The ruling is part of a recent trend in federal courts in New York toward strengthening protection for copyrighted materials quoted in books.  A panel of the Second U.S. Circuit Court of Appeals in New York recently ruled in New Era's favor in another case pitting copyright protection against First Amendment interests.  That decision is pending before the full appeals court.  "This is the latest example of copyright law being used to overcome well-established First Amendment principles," said Floyd Abrams, a First Amendment lawyer in New York.  He added: "It's deeply disturbing for a court order to require a manuscript of a critical work to be turned over to the party being criticized on the mere suspicion that it may infringe the copyright law."  In the earlier appeals-court case, the panel ruled that a different book about Mr. Hubbard infringed New Era copyrights.  But the court didn't grant any injunctive relief because the book had already been published abroad.  The court also said New Era should have acted sooner to protect its copyrights.  In the case before Judge Stanton, the judge said the appeals-court decision in the earlier case implied that a court could have ordered the manuscript be turned over to New Era before publication.  The book in the earlier case drew on documents provided by Jonathan CavenAtack, the author of the new book planned by Carol Publishing of New York.  New Era claims Mr. Caven-Atack's manuscript will infringe its copyrights.  The appeals court found that the earlier book's use of Mr. Hubbard's boyhood diaries, provided by Mr. Caven-Atack, violated the copyrights.  Carol Publishing told Judge Stanton that the book it plans to publish contains only previously published materials that fall under the fair-use doctrine of the Copyright Act.  The company also argued that pre-publication disclosure of the document would violate the First Amendment.  Judge Stanton, however, said First Amendment protection against prior restraint of publication didn't apply in this case because governmental suppression isn't involved.  Carol Publishing attorneys and executives couldn't be reached to comment on the judge's decision.  The judge said that while pre-publication disclosure "might not be justifiable as a general practice, it is appropriate here where New Era has put forth evidentiary grounds for expecting infringement."  The Labor Department cited Friction Division Products Inc., a brake manufacturer in Trenton, N.J., for $2.7 million in fines and sought court action to compel an asbestos cleanup at the company's plant.  As part of the unusually strong enforcement action, the department's Occupational Safety and Health Administration posted three "imminent danger" notices at the plant.  The notices warned the company and its workers that respirators and other protective equipment must be used, and that proper hygiene and "housekeeping" steps must be taken to prevent asbestos accumulation and employee exposure to asbestos hazards.  Asbestos, a cancer-causing substance, is used in brake linings.  Its use in all U.S. manufacturing is to be phased out by 1997.  At a news conference here, Labor Secretary Elizabeth Dole and other department officials said that Friction Division Products consistently failed to clean up the asbestos pile-up at the plant, despite past OSHA citations and the company's previous agreement to abate the hazards.  "The company has shown itself to be recalcitrant and unwilling to take appropriate actions to correct the serious hazards to its employees' health for which it has been cited repeatedly," said Alan McMillan, acting chief of OSHA.  Friction Division Products couldn't be reached for comment.  Meanwhile, OSHA standards were a focus of a House subcommittee hearing on allegations that the White House budget office has blocked or seriously diluted many federal regulations.  Some OSHA officials and other witnesses told the House legislation and national security subcommittee, a Government Operations Committee unit, that the Office of Management and Budget has frequently used provisions of the Paperwork Reduction Act in a way that undercut their regulatory efforts.  John Martonik, deputy director of health standards for OSHA, said that the OMB used that law in opposing an important OSHA workplace-testing proposal for a pending standard to restrict the use of methylenedianiline.  The chemical, used in paints and other products, has been shown to pose cancer and liver-damage dangers, he said.  But the budget office forced OSHA to scrap its plan to require employers to measure the amount of the chemical spewed into the air over eight hours and to have workers tested for liver function as involving undue "paper work" burdens, Mr. Martonik said.  The Nasdaq Composite Index advanced to within three points of its all-time high as some technology issues continued to rebound and two new issues sparked interest.  The index rose 0.7%, or 3.36 points, to 452.48.  Its record close of 455.26 was set Aug. 26, 1987.  Volume improved to 140.3 million shares from an average of 120 million in the first three days of the week.  Richard Bruno, head of over-the-counter trading at PaineWebber, said that despite recent disappointing earnings news from several high-profile companies whose shares trade on Nasdaq, some investors are beginning to buy OTC stocks again.  The reasons, according to Mr. Bruno: rising stock prices and falling interest rates.  All Nasdaq industry indexes were up yesterday, led by the utilities, which gained 9.43 to 719.39.  The insurance index jumped 4.92 to 524.58, while the industrials rose 3.43 to 439.27.  Transportation stocks added 1.97 to 452.04.  The index of savings-and-loan and regional bank stocks was up 1.82 to 530.72, while the bank index, which includes small savings banks, improved 1.68 to 473.14.  Among bigger issues, the Nasdaq 100 Index of nonfinancial issues surged 1.4%, or 5.72, to 425.51.  The Nasdaq Financial Index gained 0.7%, or 3.14, to 444.04.  MCI Communications continued to recover from last week's sell-off, gaining 1 1/4 to 39 3/8 on 2.4 million shares.  Apple Computer rose 1 to 39 1/4 on 1.5 million shares.  Intel gained 1 to 29 1/2 on 1.3 million shares.  LIN Broadcasting lost 1 to 110 1/8 on 1.1 million shares, while McCaw Cellular Communications rose 1 to 39 3/8 on 557,000 shares.  Talks concerning McCaw's $110-a-share bid for LIN seem to have stalled.  But LIN said it told McCaw that "there is ample time" before the 9 a.m. Monday deadline set by LIN to negotiate a definitive agreement at $127.50 a share.  On Wednesday, McCaw urged LIN to reconsider its "seemingly arbitrary deadline."  McCaw also said it considered its $110-a-share bid "full and fair."  Two new issues began trading yesterday.  Prime Bancshares rose 1 1/2 from its initial offering price to 11 1/2 as almost 672,000 shares were traded.  GZA GeoEnvironmental Technologies jumped 1 5/8 to 13 5/8 on 964,000 shares.  Jiffy Lube slipped 3/4 to 3 1/8 on 1.3 million shares.  Late Wednesday, Pennzoil converted $15 million of subordinated debt and paid an additional $20 million in cash to take an 80% interest in the franchiser of auto-service centers.  The move is part of troubled Jiffy Lube's plan to restructure its debts.  Last week, Jiffy Lube reported a net loss of $38.3 million for its fourth quarter, which ended March 31.  The company had earned $2 million a year earlier.  One investor who has sold Jiffy Lube shares short figures that with Pennzoil holding an 80% stake valued at roughly $35 million, Jiffy Lube has a total market value of nearly $43.8 million.  Before the Pennzoil transaction, other holders owned a total of about 15 million Jiffy Lube shares.  The investor estimates that their 20% stake is now valued at about $8.8 million, or roughly 60 cents a share.  Short sellers borrow shares of a stock and immediately sell them, hoping to profit from a price decline.  The idea is that if the price falls, the investors can replace the borrowed shares at a lower price.  A Pennzoil spokesman declined to comment on the short seller's calculations.  But a Jiffy Lube spokeswoman said, "Pennzoil looked at the value of the company's franchise system rather than the bottom line in deciding to invest in the company."  After the market closed, Sun Microsystems said it will report a loss for its fourth quarter ended June 30 that is "likely to be in the $20 million to $26 million range."  Sun Microsystems finished at 16 1/4, up 5/8, on 478,000 shares.  In the year-earlier fourth quarter, the company earned $25.3 million, or 33 cents a share, on revenue of $365 million.  As a result of the fourth-quarter loss, Sun Microsystems said, full-year earnings would be in the range of 72 cents to 78 cents a share, compared with fiscal 1988 earnings of $66.4 million, or 89 cents a share.  ---  IPO WATCH: Smith Corona's initial public offering will begin today on the New York Stock Exchange, with about 14.8 million shares priced at $21 each -- below the $23 to $25 range originally planned by underwriters led by Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.  The price was reduced, even though many market indexes are at or near their all-time highs.  Shearson officials didn't say why the price was cut.  But several analysts who follow new issues had noted that the company would be highly leveraged after the offering and considered the Smith Corona shares too expensive at the price range originally proposed.  Thomson Consumer Electronics Inc., a unit of Thomson S.A. of Paris, said it is developing a television tube that would provide a much wider picture than is currently available.  The new tube would have a width-to-height ratio of 16 to 9.  Tubes currently in use have a 4-to-3 ratio.  Thomson, which sells consumer electronics products in the U.S. under the RCA and GE brands, said it has committed $75 million to expanding its plant in Marion, Ind., which would make the wide-screen tubes "when the market demands it," according to D. Joseph Donahue, Thomson's senior vice president, technology and business development.  General Electric Co. of Fairfield, Conn., sold its consumer electronics business to Thomson 18 months ago.  The new tubes are part of a joint effort toward an advanced compatible television system that Thomson is working on with GE's NBC TV network and the David Sarnoff Research Center in Princeton, N.J.  Mr. Donahue called wide-screen TV a necessary first step toward a U.S. high-definition TV system that will provide much sharper images.  Enron Corp. signed a natural-gas supply and transportation contract with Arkla Inc.'s Entex unit for an estimated total value of about $1.2 billion to $1.5 billion, at current gas prices, over a 12-year period.  The long-term contract is one of the largest ever for Enron, a natural-gas marketer and operator of the nation's lengthiest pipeline-network.  Entex is a Houston gas-utility unit of Arkla, a Shreveport, La., pipeline and public-utility concern.  Additionally, Enron has extended an existing contract with Entex by five years.  The new contracts between Houston Pipe Line Co., an Enron unit, and Entex should increase Entex's annual gas purchases and volume of transportation from Houston Pipe Line to 65 billion cubic feet of gas from 40 billion cubic feet of gas.  Enron common stock rose 37.5 cents to close at $47.50 a share in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  The group led by Sir James Goldsmith blasted B.A.T Industries PLC for hiring Kroll Associates, a corporate investigations concern, in response to the Goldsmith group's #13.2 billion ($21.87 billion) bid for B.A.T.  Hoylake Investments Ltd., the unit of Sir James' Anglo Group PLC that is bidding for B.A.T, said Hoylake and Anglo "deplore" the tobacco-based conglomerate's use of "a detective agency."  Hoylake added that Anglo Group director Lord Peter Rawlinson has resigned from the European advisory committee of New York-based Kroll.  Kroll is known in takeover battles for seeking damaging information about the business careers of its clients' adversaries.  In this case, B.A.T could submit findings to insurance regulators in both the U.S. and Britain who must approve the fitness of insurance-company buyers.  B.A.T said it hired Kroll to determine the true owners of several "nominee companies" with interests in Hoylake.  A B.A.T spokesman said Kroll's research would be limited to business-related information about Hoylake group members, and wouldn't extend to their private lives.  Two Detroit pension funds said they plan to nominate eight directors for Income Opportunity Realty Trust's board in an effort to replace the current management.  The funds, the Policemen and Firemen Retirement System and the General Retirement System of the city of Detroit, have been trying to acquire the real estate investment trust through a $9-a-share, or $26.5 million tender offer, which now is scheduled to expire next week.  However, a San Francisco judge has blocked that offer while he tries to determine if securities laws were violated.  The funds said they will try to elect their slate at Income Opportunity's annual meeting Aug. 8.  They said they hope to distribute proxy materials as soon as they receive regulatory clearance.  The funds said they hope to oust as trustees Gene E. Phillips and Williams S. Friedman, two former executives of Southmark Corp., a troubled real estate company that recently sought bankruptcy-law protection.  Income Opportunity couldn't be reached for comment.  On Wednesday, June 14, Robert Parr, a real-estate man and former British fighter pilot, lay in bed in a clinic here receiving, in an unauthorized though not illegal experiment, what was to be his last infusion of Compound Q.  As the drug, an extract of Chinese cucumber, dripped into veins of Mr. Parr and his fellow volunteers, they talked of what they would do if it gave them a reprieve from acquired immune deficiency syndrome.  "Nobody knows I have this {disease}," Mr. Parr confided.  "I've got 14 people working for me, and if they find out, they'll leave me.  I could never tell them."  "Do you really believe that?"  Bob Barnett, a 36-year-old patient, recalls asking.  "I remember thinking, how sad . . . how wearing.  He was very quiet, far away."  On Thursday, all of the volunteers except Mr. Parr went home to soothe their sore muscles.  He had trouble urinating.  He remained at the treatment center several hours longer and then went home, where he lapsed into a coma, and was rushed to Mount Zion Hospital.  On Friday he awakened, but later vomited in his sleep, causing pneumonia.  On Saturday at 10:30 a.m., after his breathing tubes were removed at his family's order, he died.  In one of the AIDS epidemic's bitter ironies, Mr. Parr's hope for privacy was dashed along with his hope for reprieve by his death in the federally unsanctioned human experiment.  Was his death the consequence of heroism or of folly?  Was it the disease, the drug or the politics and protocols of drug approval that forced him into the experiment and really killed him?  The reasons are now being investigated by the Food and Drug Administration.  Yet, whatever the findings, it is already apparent that the Compound Q experimenters and other therapeutic mavericks are helping push forward a revolution in American drug development.  The issues of the speed of testing and access to drugs have been forced by a variety of AIDS activists.  Although the Compound Q experiment has created crisis and confrontation, activists in other groups are harnessing the current sense of urgency to seek rapprochement with the medical establishment.  As a consequence, the development of experimental drugs to deal with AIDS seems likely to accelerate.  Even more important, the drugs will be tested faster and on more patients.  A laboratory-minded research elite, allied with the FDA, has become willing to relinquish some of its control over research and testing to what AIDS activists call the "community" -- AIDS sufferers around the country and the doctors and others who treat them.  By cooperating with community research and testing efforts -- which will receive federal grants -- the FDA and top researchers hope to enhance the safety and scientific validity of such efforts.  More AIDS patients, for their part, will get faster and easier access to experimental drugs and will realize any benefits.  They also will endure the risks.  But as most of them see it, they have nothing to lose.  ---  Martin Delaney is one of the most radical of the rebels.  Subdued and silver-haired, he doesn't look the part.  But he is the architect of the unsanctioned Compound Q study.  A Jesuit seminarian who fled the priesthood just before being ordained, the 44-year-old businessman became an activist in 1985.  He founded Project Inform, a group pledged to fight medical bureaucracy by helping AIDS patients manage their own treatment.  It wasn't only being gay in a time of AIDS that made Mr. Delaney an activist.  Other fires helped forge his radicalism.  During the '60s, he was moved by Martin Luther King's brand of muscular religious activism.  The son of a Chicago machinist loyal to the late Mayor Richard Daley -- he even posed for a boyhood picture on "da Mayor's" knee -- he had always been a conservative Democrat.  Then he was arrested during the brutal police crackdown on anti-war protesters at the 1968 Democratic convention.  He was released, he says, only after a $600 family payoff to the police.  "That was it for me and politics," he says.  "I had a deep distrust of authority, though I still wasn't a radical troublemaker.  It wasn't in my gut."  Not yet, anyway.  It took a medical crisis unrelated to AIDS to fix his course.  Chronic hepatitis, then epidemic in the gay community, left Mr. Delaney frail and sallow.  To all appearances he was dying of liver failure when he started treatment in a clinical trial of two new drugs at Stanford University in 1980.  Though they saved his life, he says, the treatment riddled his limbs with permanent nerve damage that made him feel "like my feet were on fire.  "Was it worth it?  Yes]" he says, even though he now must take methadone, the potent heroin substitute, for his pain.  He is angry that the treatment was abandoned as too toxic.  "I saw five people die of chronic hepatitis," he says.  "I of all people should understand {that} the decisions about risk and benefit should be made by doctor and patient, not by some pinheaded bureaucrat in Washington."  So when the AIDS epidemic struck, he says, "I was ready for a fight."  Still, amid a fractious chorus of desperate activists, Mr. Delaney's voice seemed cool and moderate.  It won a measure of trust from a top federal health figure, Anthony Fauci of the National Institutes of Health.  Mr. Delaney published news of popular if unproven remedies such as ribavirin and isoprinosine.  He chided regulators.  He debated FDA Commissioner Frank Young on ABC's "Nightline" in 1987, and watched as "my clients headed for the hills," all but collapsing his business in producing videotapes for electronics training.  But his Project Inform grew to six hotlines and 60 volunteers.  When scientists at the University of California, San Francisco, and Genelabs Inc. of Redwood City, Calif., published a test-tube study of Compound Q this year, the gay community was euphoric.  In the laboratory, the compound killed infected cells and spared healthy ones.  Guerrilla importers didn't wait for a study at San Francisco General Hospital.  Men gulped crude extract of cucumber; seizure, coma and death were reported.  To discourage such dangerous self-treatment, Project Inform says it joined with the importers.  It enlisted longtime AIDS-drug courier Jim Corti, a Los Angeles nurse, to obtain the purified drug from Shanghai and mail it from Tokyo to the U.S.  Mr. Delaney recruited San Francisco pediatrician Lawrence Waites and immunologist Alan Levin, an academic with a history of selling unproven biologics among other drugs for AIDS.  They planned a "treatment group" of 42 patients in four cities.  Skipping the cautious, graduated doses of the classic safety trial, they leaped straight to chemotherapeutic-dose levels like those used in China to treat tumors.  Along with early reports of lowered virus levels in the blood, the group experienced a death, a suicide, and several instances of dementia in patients with prior brain infection.  "It was a mistake," says Dr. Fauci of the NIH.  While granting Mr. Delaney's good intentions, he warns, "If people feel they can go off and do whatever they want, the potential for disaster is great.  Sooner or later, a disaster will happen."  Other researchers were even more outspoken.  Paul Volberding, AIDS chief at San Francisco General Hospital, condemned the action as a disservice to patients.  "Bad medicine," said his colleague Jim Kahn, who is running the official Compound Q study at the hospital.  New York AIDS specialist Joseph Sonnabend says, "It's dangerous.  They're experimenting on human beings."  A wounded but adamant Mr. Delaney replies: "They just won't look at the risk of doing nothing.  They ought to scream about the pace of drug development, not attack us.  When is this country going to start acting like there's an epidemic going on?"  People with AIDS were using the compound anyway, he says, but in unsupervised and dangerous fashion, making it necessary to offer supervised access to the drug.  Moreover, he insists, his findings -- that Compound Q could be toxic to AIDS patients with brain infection -- could serve as an early warning to others.  "Yes," counters Ellen Cooper, the FDA's antiviral products chief, "but at what cost?  The maximum dose in safety studies usually stops well short of death."  For the most part, however, Mr. Delaney's clients hold with his view that, since 150 AIDS patients die each day without access to the most experimental of drugs, they should be able to choose their risks.  "We're unwitting victims of the system," says one of them, Bob Barnett.  "They don't want to give us something toxic that might kill us, when we already have something in us, a virus, that's very likely to do it anyway."  Mr. Barnett, a former radio-station manager, says the infusions made him as stiff and sore as he would feel after a bout of flu.  Then he says his energy level improved, though his blood work is worse, with more anemia and fewer T-cells.  "I can't say I have faith that this drug works," he says.  "But if I wait for the medical research industry to come up with answers, it won't be for me."  Never a gambler before, he says AIDS has made him a risk-taker.  "Life is short," he says.  "Who am I to fool myself and think I'll live 40 or 50 years, retire, and drive around Arizona in my Airstream trailer?"  For Tandy Belew, a 41-year-old graphic artist with a degree of brain infection, the treatment was very rough going.  After he took Compound Q, his AIDS symptoms, which had receded, returned.  Then he became utterly disoriented until he ceased all drugs.  "I was gone," he says.  "I went to the bathroom in the kitchen.  I kept asking what time it was, and hummed the theme from 'Indiana Jones.'"  Robert Pitman, a 48-year-old job counselor, is thrilled to see the virus levels in his blood plunge to one-fifth their former level.  But the infusions left him "very tired, my muscles sore and achy, and I don't stand up as easily," he says.  Mr. Delaney maintains that his experimental therapy rests on solid legal ground.  "We're not promoting anything, not selling anything," he says.  "There was no smuggling in this, nothing illegal."  Project Inform acted as courier between the U.S. source -- Mr. Corti -- and patients who had requested a personal supply of the drug, which they then took to Drs.  Levin and Waites for administration.  The FDA has been tolerant of importers who limit themselves to bringing in personal, three-month supplies of a drug and who eschew promotion and profiteering.  But the FDA might constrain imports if its investigation concludes that Compound Q is too toxic.  "If it's found unsafe, we can put out an import alert and stop {a drug}," says Stuart Nightingale, the agency's associate commissioner for health affairs.  "That's an option, but we have to await the outcome of the investigation."  In general, the FDA hasn't meddled much with the AIDS self-help movement.  Even as Mr. Delaney and his patients await the outcome of the investigation into Compound Q, AIDS "buyers' clubs" are thriving.  They offer a menu of imported and domestic herbs, pharmaceuticals and food supplements to roughly 4,000 clients in New York and San Francisco alone.  This strikes many physicians as rash.  But spaces in orthodox clinical trials are still far too few.  New York physician Nathaniel Pier says, "I see eight to 10 antibody-positive patients a day," many with no option but so-called alternative treatments.  Says William Case, executive director of the People with AIDS (PWA) Coalition of New York: "Frustration forces people to experiment."  ---  A ride on an industrial elevator to the fourth floor of an old building on West 26th Street in New York brings you to the office of the PWA Health Group, a buyers' club.  Here the group stocks a refrigerator with AL-721, an egg lipid concoction.  Stacks of red, white and blue Japanese packing boxes hold three-month supplies of dextran sulfate, the Japanese antihypertensive still used by some AIDS patients despite a recent San Francisco study that has led many academics to conclude it doesn't work.  The group's executive director, Derek Hodel, tanned and crewcut, makes a good advertisement for its services.  He says the group sells at cost plus overhead.  The group forwards individual orders of various drugs obtainable abroad to agents who ship them via Federal Express or DHL.  A hot product is hypericin, a German antidepressant derived from saint-john's-wort, an herbal plant that has attracted interest because of recent test-tube studies.  The group sells "German enzymes," pancreatic products similar to those made notorious as unproven cancer remedies.  "We recently started obtaining fluconazole, a Pfizer product approved all over Europe and Japan, for cryptococcal meningitis," Mr. Hodel says.  He calls it "scandalous" that it has taken so long for the drug to be used here.  An emaciated client wanders in.  Mr. Hodel directs him to a colleague for help, and resumes.  "In fiscal 1989, we did just under $1 million in sales," he says.  "But we'd love to see our role diminish" through community trials or increased distribution of drugs.  The drive for patient participation, the pleas for urgency and access to drugs, the ad hoc experiments and protests now are having a palpable impact on the once-leisurely pace of American research.  "If people weren't sitting in at FDA, and chaining themselves to the wall of Burroughs Wellcome Co. {the maker of AZT}, none of this would be happening," acknowledges one chagrined scientist.  "This is the way revolutions happen," says Jerome Groopman, a researcher at Harvard University and the New England Deaconness Hospital in Boston.  "There's a vanguard, quite radical and often off-the-mark.  Then there's a process of moderation with more reasonable solutions.  It's causing a revolution in experimental trials."  ---  As Mr. Hodel closed shop on a recent Friday night, a summit meeting of sorts was taking place 90 blocks uptown in a steamy room at Columbia University.  Most of those attending were either activists or established institutional research authorities.  They came in the spirit of rapprochement, to bridge the gulf between patient and scientist, between rigid scientific protocols and unrestrained self-medication.  The meeting was called by the Community Research Initiative of New York and the County Community Consortium of San Francisco.  Both groups are committed to bringing officially sanctioned research to the grass-roots level, involving local doctors and patients in it.  For years there had been sniping between the activists, on one hand, and research officials from the National Institutes of Health and regulators from the FDA, on the other.  Now, says White House physician Burton Lee, there was to be "a marriage of the brain trust with the people in the trenches."  Members of an activist group called the AIDS Coalition to Unleash Power (ACT UP) had once passed out purple Kool Aid as symbolic cyanide to researchers they accused of committing Jonestown-style murder on people with AIDS by not increasing the pace and scope of research and testing.  Now they sat studiously listening to arcane talks on how to get solid scientific statistics and how to achieve tax-free status for community drug-trial groups.  "FDA is still the enemy," said William Cooper, medical director of San Francisco's Community Research Alliance, another grass-roots group.  "But this meeting is superb.  It seeks a common ground between conservative doctors and advocates.  They don't speak the same language."  Martin Delaney's work in San Francisco was never far from the minds of those attending the meeting.  Michael Callen, an AIDS patient who founded the Community Research Initiative, said he respected Mr. Delaney but added, "I can't countenance the principle that people can conduct an unregulated trial of Q.  It is a poison."  The answer isn't unsanctioned trials, he said, but community research in cooperation with the FDA.  Within months, Dr. Fauci said, the NIH will award $6 million in grant money to community-based trials, and it has asked President Bush to double that amount next year.  "Sometimes the design of a classical drug trial seems very cold and aloof," Dr. Fauci acknowledged.  He said his recent proposal to distribute new drugs to patients who can't qualify for official trials, and his initiative to involve doctors and patients in local communities, could go far toward broadening access to experimental drugs and putting people before protocols.  Others suggested the mobilization of a kind of domestic Peace Corps to administer community trials.  Mathilde Krim of the American Foundation for AIDS Research, which sponsored the meeting, said community trials were the missing link between lofty research institutions and the myriad poor and desperate patients.  Dr. Fauci has put his reputation on the line by endorsing the ability of community trials to produce drug studies sufficiently reliable for the FDA to consider in drug approval.  But there is a successful precedent: Community research on the drug aerosol pentamidine as a preventative for the often fatal AIDS pneumonia PCP.  More such advances are needed.  "The best thing you can do for us," Dr. Fauci exhorted the crowd, "is to succeed."  An accord between the consumer electronics industry and the recording industry clearing the way for the introduction of digital audio tape technology in the U.S. was formally announced today, but the road still isn't clear for DAT.  The agreement recommends that Congress pass legislation to require copy-restricting circuitry in all DAT machines sold in the U.S.  Under the "serial copy management system," DAT machines would allow consumers to make high-quality copies of original material such as prerecorded DAT tapes, digital compact disks and digital broadcasts, but would prevent consumers from making subsequent copies from the first copy.  The agreement does not affect taping done with standard analog cassette recorders.  The agreement was signed by 12 Japanese and three European electronics manufacturers, as well as by two recording industry trade groups.  But today's announcement does not resolve all the differences between the two parties, because it does not address the issue of royalties for recording artists.  While the recording industry has long held that the free availability of DAT recorders would invite wholesale copyright violations, the consumer electronics industry has insisted that home taping is a consumer's right.  Small investors' rekindled ardor for stock mutual funds was evident in June as investors poured $1.2 billion more into these funds than they withdrew -- the largest monthly inflow this year.  Meanwhile, assets of all types of funds in June swelled to a record of nearly $900 billion, according to the Investment Company Institute, a Washington trade group.  In the stock-fund category, the month's net inflow surpassed the $1 billion of May and marked a turnaround from a $216 million outflow in June 1988.  June's total inflow into stock funds included money from two sources.  About half came from reinvestment of funds' dividends.  The rest was new money.  June marked the third consecutive month of positive inflows of new money into stock funds, after 15 months of outflows.  The rebound is continuing this month as stock prices flirt with record highs, analysts said.  At T. Rowe Price Associates Inc. in Baltimore, for instance, sales of stock funds this month already have exceeded the June level, while redemptions of fund shares have been halved from recent months.  "With equities recovering, people's confidence is improving," says Steven Norwitz, a T. Rowe Price vice president.  Net sales of bond funds surged to their highest level since July 1987, buoyed by rising bond prices, the institute said.  Bond funds posted net sales of $1.7 billion in June, eclipsing the $880.4 million of May and $530.4 million of June 1988.  Assets of all mutual funds edged up 1.5% in June, to $899.4 billion.  The bulk of the asset growth was triggered by continuing strong inflows into money-market funds, despite slumping yields in the past several weeks.  This month, "you still have that strong short-term {money-market} fund activity," said Avi Nachmany, an analyst at Strategic Insight, a mutual-fund research firm.  Sales of stock and bond funds industry-wide this month probably will about match June levels, Mr. Nachmany predicted.  Investors continue to flock to the more conservative stock portfolios.  Growth-and-income funds, which combine hefty dividends with the goal of capital appreciation, led all other stock-fund categories in sales for June.  Among bond funds, long-term municipal funds captured the top spot.  Managers of stock funds increased their cash holdings in June to 9.8% of assets from the 9.2% level in May.  But the June level still lags behind the 10.1% of June 1988.  Higher cash hoards can buffer a fund from market declines but can be a drag on performance in rising markets.  TELE-COMMUNICATIONS Inc., Denver, began an offer to buy back, at face amount plus interest, its $450 million of 11.125% senior subordinated debentures due Oct. 1, 2003.  The company plans to refinance the debt at a lower interest rate.  Tele-Communications, with interests in cable television and movie theaters, said it will use existing bank credit facilities to finance the buy-back.  The offer, which expires Aug. 23, is subject to agreement by holders of a majority of the debt to delete a provision in the original offering that restricted dividends and stock buy-backs.  Energy Secretary James Watkins vowed to reverse a Reagan administration trend of trying to slash funding for research into solar energy, renewable energy and conservation.  Mr. Watkins said in an interview that he will seek, in the next Bush administration budget request, to keep the programs running at levels "not unlike that which eventually has been negotiated each year with Congress."  Mr. Reagan sought cuts in the alternative-energy field through most of his presidency.  Congress traditionally rejected those cuts.  Mr. Bush didn't change the Reagan request in his first budget.  "We in the Department of Energy have short-changed very legitimate areas of increased emphasis in those programs," Mr. Watkins said.  He said the administration will increase its request for the programs during the next two years "to something we all agree makes sense."  Mr. Bush's fiscal-1990 budget request, identical to Mr. Reagan's, sought $112.4 million for research into technologies such as solar, wind and geothermal, a decrease from Congress's fiscal-1989 appropriation of $149 million.  For energy-conservation research and grants, Mr. Bush requested $96 million, far below Congress's fiscal-1989 funding level of $373 million.  GOLDEN WEST FINANCIAL Corp. said its board declared a 2-for-1 stock split and increased the common-stock dividend 14% to 16 cents a post-split share.  The Oakland, Calif., thrift holding company said it will have about 63 million shares outstanding after the split, payable Sept. 11 to holders of record Aug. 15.  ARGONAUT GROUP Inc. said its board declared the insurance concern's initial cash dividend and authorized the Los Angeles company to purchase as many as two million of its common shares.  The initial dividend of 25 cents a share is payable Aug. 22 to stock of record Aug. 8.  Argonaut said it intends to pay the same amount quarterly for an annual rate of $1 a share.  Slow sales are causing General Motors Corp. to extend the model-changeover shutdown at its Chevrolet Corvette plant in Bowling Green, Ky.  The plant will return to work the week of Aug. 14 instead of the week of Aug. 7, as originally planned.  Corvette inventories stood at a 126-day supply on June 30, according to Ward's Automotive Reports, an industry publication.  GM also has shut down plants in Fairfax, Kan., and Doraville, Ga., for two weeks ending Aug. 7, because of parts shortages.  Both plants recently had reopened after being been closed for several weeks for model changeover and inventory adjustment.  Sales have been slow for the Grand Prix cars produced in Fairfax and for the Cutlass Supreme cars produced in Doraville.  At the end of June, GM had a 131-day supply of Grand Prix cars.  Meanwhile, the nine domestic car makers planned to produce 86,851 cars this week, 18% more than the 73,541 cars built a year ago.  So far this year, the manufacturers have made 4.1 million cars, down about 30,000 cars from last year's levels.  @ ---  @ This Last Yr.  Ago -Yr. to Date- %  @ Week-e Week-r Week 1989 1988 Chg.  @GM 24,256 29,498 12,706 1,902,846 1,941,891 - 2  @Ford 32,616 26,259 38,068 1,021,540 1,083,822 - 6  @Chrysler 5,300 4,072 5,954 541,413 639,975 -15  @VW-b 0 0 0 0 35,839 ...  @Honda 7,570 7,302 7,290 220,195 212,556 + 4  @Nissan 3,228 2,436 2,858 67,349 59,194 +14  @Nummi- 4,000 4,118 3,185 118,418 95,987 +23  @Mazda 4,260 4,186 3,480 132,290 60,685 +118  @Toyota 3,600 3,525 0 64,205 d ...  @Diam.Star 2,021 1,648 0 31,707 d ...  @Industry 86,851 83,044 73,541 4,099,963 4,129,949 - 1  b-Volkswagen ceased U.S. production in July 1988. d-for percentage greater than 999% e-Estimated. r-Revised. -Includes Chevrolet Prizm and Toyota Corolla.  Three major airlines reported higher quarterly earnings in the wake of rising fares and fallout from the strike at Eastern Airlines.  UAL Corp., the Chicago-based parent of United Airlines, said second-quarter earnings rose 14% to $141.1 million, or $6.52 a share, from $124.2 million, or $5.77 a share, a year earlier.  Delta Air Lines, Atlanta, declared a special 50-cents-a-share dividend to shareholders after it reported that fiscal fourth-quarter earnings soared 85% to $190.8 million, or $3.87 a share, from $103.3 million, or $2.11 a share, for the 1988 quarter.  USAir Group Inc., Arlington, Va., said second-quarter earnings rose 8.9% to a record $100.7 million, or $2.29 a share, from $92.5 million, or $2.14 a share.  The profit increases were generally in line with expectations of Wall Street analysts.  "It was a terrific quarter," said Jack Hunter, airline analyst at Howe Barnes Investments Inc., Chicago.  As expected, Chicago-based Midway Airlines Inc. said profit from operations plunged 39%.  The carrier is embroiled in a costly fare war with Southwest Airlines for service between Chicago and Detroit.  Midway reported operating earnings of $5 million, or 45 cents a share, compared with $8.2 million, or 74 cents a share.  Gains from tax-loss carry-forwards in both periods made net income $5.1 million, or 46 cents a share, down 48% from $9.7 million, or 88 cents a share.  Midway stock fell 25 cents a share yesterday to close at $15.50 in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  New York-based Pan American World Airways and Houston-based Texas Air Corp. are the two major U.S. carriers that have yet to report quarterly results.  Some industry analysts expect Texas Air to report a profit because of a gain from the sale to Donald Trump of the shuttle operated by its Eastern Airlines unit.  The Eastern strike continued to be a windfall for Delta, which is usually Eastern's biggest competitor, especially in Atlanta, Delta's home base and Eastern's biggest hub.  But the machinists strike at Eastern, which started March 4, decimated that carrier's operations and sent many would-be Eastern passengers to Delta.  In addition to the Eastern strike, Delta cited traffic gains from its merger with Western Air Lines for its increased profit.  It said fiscal fourth-quarter revenue jumped 23% to $2.31 billion from $1.87 billion.  Delta stock fell $1 yesterday to close at $71.25 in Big Board trading.  Most U.S. carriers during the second quarter were able to raise ticket prices despite the fare cuts that Eastern initiated as it began slowly rebuilding service.  At United Airlines, yield per mile, a measure of what passengers pay to fly, jumped 14% to 12.6 cents.  Second-quarter revenue rose 10% to $2.52 billion from $2.29 billion.  Industry analysts said United also benefited from a two-tier wage scale as it hired pilots and flight attendants.  The scale, which was adopted several years ago, lowered the pay of beginning employees.  Some analysts expect United to hire several hundred pilots this year.  Despite the earnings report, UAL stock fell $1.75 in Big Board trading yesterday to close at $182.75 a share.  UAL, which has been the subject of takeover speculation, announced yesterday that it strengthened a shareholder-rights plan designed to make a hostile takeover difficult.  Earlier this week, UAL stock rallied in the wake of a report that Los Angeles investor Marvin Davis, a loser in the bidding competition for NWA Inc., parent of Northwest Airlines, had bought about a 3.5% stake in UAL.  USAir Group attributed its earnings gains primarily to stronger traffic.  Second-quarter traffic at its Piedmont Airlines unit grew 18.1%, and its USAir unit was up 7.9%.  USAir Group said yield at the two airline units grew only slightly in the second quarter from the 1988 quarter because of a Kids Fly Free program and price competition in California.  USAir Group revenue in the second quarter rose 16% to $1.73 billion from $1.49 billion a year earlier.  Its stock fell 25 cents to close at $49.75 a share in Big Board trading yesterday.  Another shot of Federal Reserve easing kept the stock market party alive, and this time bond buyers joined in.  The dollar ended mixed.  For the seventh time this month, the Dow Jones Industrial Average established a post-crash high, climbing 22.38 points to 2635.43 in heavy trading.  Broader market indexes again hit record levels, with Standard & Poor's 500-stock index closing at 341.99.  Long-term bond prices came close to rising a full point, or $10 for every $1,000 face amount.  The dollar fell against the yen but gained against the mark.  Confirmation that the Federal Reserve had eased another notch on short-term interest rates was the catalyst for the stock and bond gains.  The federal funds rate -- the interest rate banks charge one another for short-term loans -- settled at 9% Wednesday, down from 9.25%.  It marked the third time this summer that the Fed allowed the rate to decline.  Financial markets also got a boost from a government report that showed second-quarter gross national product expanding at an annual rate of 1.7%, compared with a revised 3.7% rate in the first quarter.  The sluggish growth was slightly below the 2% that economists had predicted but still in line with the belief that the economy is on course for a so-called soft landing -- moderating growth with lower inflation and falling interest rates but no recession.  The announcement that Squibb and Bristol-Myers will merge injected speculative fever into the stock market, especially in the drug sector.  Traders said institutional investors are becoming more active in the market, as reflected in the rise in trading volume this week.  The fed funds cut and the lower than expected second-quarter GNP also stimulated activity in the bond market, which had been moribund in recent sessions.  Currency traders, meanwhile, said most players in that market have been expecting a slowing economy and falling interest rates.  Thus, the GNP report and the fed funds cut had little impact on the dollar.  In major market activity:  Stock prices rallied in heavy trading.  Volume on the New York Stock Exchange totaled 213.7 million shares, the highest in well over a month.  Advancing issues on the Big Board were ahead of decliners, 1,021 to 496.  Bond prices rose in active trading.  The yield on the Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond slipped to 8.02%.  The dollar was mixed.  In late New York trading the currency was quoted at 1.8782 marks and 139.26 yen, compared with 1.8675 marks and 140.02 yen late Wednesday.  The House Ways and Means Committee approved legislation that would raise the legal ceiling on the federal government's debt to $2.87 trillion through Oct. 31.  The measure, passed by a voice vote, would set the debt ceiling $10 billion higher than a pending Senate bill would.  But Treasury officials estimate that even the House panel's bill would fall $5 billion short of the level needed to keep the government operating through October.  Both the House and the Senate are expected to act on their versions of the legislation next week.  Under both measures, the debt ceiling would revert to the current level of $2.80 trillion Nov. 1, so Congress would have to act on another debt-limit bill this fall.  Congressional budget writers believe legislation to enact a longer-term extension then could be a vehicle for a possible budget agreement between lawmakers and President Bush for fiscal 1991, which begins Oct. 1, 1990.  The Treasury estimates that the current debt ceiling will be met by mid-August, when Congress will be in a monthlong recess.  Both the current pending Senate and House bills also would provide that Treasury-issued zero-coupon bonds, which pay interest upon maturity rather than periodically, be counted under the debt limit at their current accrual value rather than face value.  That accounting change would reduce the amount of federal borrowings subject to the debt limit by about $15 billion, according to the Treasury, which requested the change.  Last year, the Treasury issued zero-coupon bonds to help refinance Mexico's debt and may issue more in connection with other international debt problems and to deal with the savings-and-loan problem.  PaineWebber Inc. was ordered to pay $500,000 in damages to a client for failing to take "reasonable steps" to limit the risk of his options trading, even though the client was a knowledgeable investor.  In addition, a three-member arbitration panel rejected PaineWebber's claim that the investor owed the firm $1.35 million in trading losses, commissions and interest.  The case involved Los Angeles investor Leonard A. Aaron, 71 years old, a former art supplies dealer.  Mr. Aaron's attorney in Los Angeles, Richard B. Leavitt, said that between November 1985 and October 1987, his client made as many as 9,000 options trades, running up $800,000 in commissions with a PaineWebber broker in Century City, Calif.  According to Mr. Leavitt, Mr. Aaron's account grew to as much as $3 million in the period from its original $2.5 million.  After the stock market crash, in which he lost about $2.2 million, he owed more than $1.1 million.  Mr. Aaron, who is in Hawaii, didn't immediately return a phone call to his hotel to comment.  The panel conceded that Mr. Aaron was "fully aware of and consented to most, if not all, of the transactions" and also understood that risks were involved with options trading.  Nonetheless, the panel added, the risks and "the extreme and frequent volume of trading was of such an unprecedented level" that Mr. Aaron didn't fully understand what he was exposed to.  PaineWebber, the panel added, "didn't take reasonable steps to limit or otherwise safeguard the extent of Mr. Aaron's risks and possible losses."  And it said the brokerage firm didn't comply with its own written policies requiring that "only a small portion of the client's liquid assets be exposed to the risks of option trading."  PaineWebber paid the $500,000 to Mr. Aaron last week, although the firm questions some aspects of the arbitration award.  Mr. Aaron was "adequately apprised of the risks" of his options trading and was even cautioned to "ease up" by the PaineWebber broker, "quite a number of times," according to the firm's attorneys.  The panel's finding was inconsistent, said Robert M. Berson, general counsel for New York-based PaineWebber.  "For some reason, the panel concluded that PaineWebber should have stopped him from his own trading vices," Mr. Berson said.  "There is no suggestion or indication of wrong-doing by the broker" or the firm, he said.  "Our instinct is to appeal it because we are infuriated by the conclusion," said Mr. Berson.  "But generally, you can't appeal a decision because of mistakes" by a panel of arbitrators, he said.  "Arbitrators are not held to the same evidentiary standards of courts."  He said PaineWebber believes "in the arbitration process.  We think the panel did its best in the case and came up with the wrong conclusion, based on its own opinion."  Mr. Aaron's broker, who has voluntarily left PaineWebber to join another firm, wasn't identified.  "His name is irrelevant," Mr. Berson said.  MCI Communications Corp. and Visa U.S.A. Inc. announced a joint marketing program under which Visa cardholders can use their account numbers to place long-distance calls.  The companies said the program, called VisaPhone, eliminates the need for a separate calling card.  VisaPhone charges will appear as a line item on a customer's monthly Visa statement, and MCI separately will mail details of each call.  MCI said that both domestic and international calls will be billed at standard MCI rates as well as special discount rates for residential and small-business customers who subscribe to the PrimeTime and Supersaver calling plans.  MCI and Visa wouldn't disclose the potential value of their alliance.  In recent months, American Telephone & Telegraph Co., which has issued 40 million of its own AT&T calling cards, has been studying several ways to enhance them, including using the cards as a joint telephone and general credit card.  A spokesman said a decision hasn't yet been made.  MCI and Visa are planning to introduce the service in phases, beginning in October.  Initially, MCI along with banks that issue Visa cards will be selecting 30 million top-rated cardholders for a six-month pilot.  The companies are especially interested in cardholders who travel a lot and are likely to use the calling-card service while on the road.  To reach this market, the companies are relying on highly targeted direct mail, according to Timothy Price, MCI's vice president of sales.  The companies then anticipate making the VisaPhone service available to all 120 million U.S. cardholders in the first half of 1990, and toward the end of 1990 will begin mass merchandising the service.  MCI figures it will step up its marketing as the program is rolled out, expanding to telemarketing, print and television ads.  MCI already has an arrangement with American Express under which customers' long-distance calls from the home phone and from the MCI calling card can be billed through American Express.  Mr. Price wouldn't say whether MCI plans to expand that service along the lines of VisaPhone, but he added that "there is nothing exclusive" about the arrangement with Visa.  MCI expects a hefty boost in its own customer base from the Visa arrangement.  Mr. Price said that 60% of customers who use MCI through other calling programs have signed up for MCI residential service, and he expects the Visa link to encourage similar migration to MCI residential service.  Beyond that, the technology used to integrate Visa's financial network and MCI's phone network could be applied to other payment systems, Mr. Price said.  The mayor of Atlantic City, N.J., and four other top city officials were arrested on an array of corruption charges including bribery, conspiracy, official misconduct and accepting illegal gifts.  Mayor James L. Usry, 67 years old, was arrested at his home after an eight-month investigation by the New Jersey State Police and the state attorney general's office into a variety of alleged bribe activities throughout the city government.  All together, 13 persons were arrested, including the president of Atlantic City's city council, two city council members, the chairman of the city's zoning board, the city's former housing authority director, a member of Atlantic County's governing council, and a candidate for a seat to that office.  With the mayor and three of Atlantic City's nine city council members behind bars much of yesterday, Atlantic City's remaining elected officials were unsure who was in control of the city.  According to law enforcement officials, Mr. Usry accepted $6,000 in cash last week from an undercover informant wearing a hidden tape recorder.  In exchange, Mr. Usry allegedly promised to seek a change in a city ordinance that would have permitted a motor cart franchise owner access to the city's boardwalk during the summer.  "This is just between you and me," Mr. Usry allegedly said as he accepted the cash.  Mr. Usry couldn't be reached to comment, either at his home or his office.  He was released on his own recognizance following a bond hearing in the afternoon.  Mr. Usry is a former basketball player for the Harlem Globetrotters and former assistant school superintendent in Atlantic County.  The alleged bribe is the only aspect of the criminal investigation that touched Mr. Usry.  The investigation began in November when a prominent Atlantic City businessman, Albert Black, complained to state police that he was approached by the city's former housing authority director and a business associate about paying a bribe in return for a commercial zoning change.  The criminal complaints are all based on evidence developed by Mr. Black as an undercover informant.  They allege that city officials accepted $60,000 in bribes in return for favorable zoning board votes, exemptions from city rent control ordinances and promises of influence peddling concerning an airport gift shop franchise and the proposed ordinance change regulating motor carts on the Boardwalk.  Mr. Usry, Atlantic City's first black mayor and president of the National Conference of Black Mayors, is expected to retain his mayoral office unless he is convicted, said city business administrator Carl Briscoe.  The previous mayor, Michael Matthews, pleaded guilty to accepting a bribe from an undercover federal agent posing as a businessman in search of city property for a casino.  In a market hidebound by regulations dating back nearly 160 years, the youthful new chairman of the Madrid Stock Exchange, Pedro Guerrero, is taking over on the verge of big change.  His most immediate challenge, as Spain grapples with its equivalent of London's "Big Bang," will be overhauling the market's antiquated trading and settlement systems.  "The stock exchange has to play a greater role in Spain's economy," says Mr. Guerrero, a 36-year-old stockbroker elected last week to head the exchange when new rules take effect tomorrow.  His plans range from creating a computer-services company to help brokerage firms improve services to launching Spain's first share-options market.  "An options market is very important, and the initiative has to come from the stock exchange," he says.  By 1990, he says, he will be able to detail plans.  Mr. Guerrero's election as chairman of the company that will take over responsibility for the exchange is just one of the changes shaking Spain's once-protected securities market.  Individual government-appointed stockbrokers are to be replaced by brokerage firms in which banks for the first time can be holders.  Commissions, after a transition period ending Jan. 1, 1992, will be freely negotiable.  In part, the choice of Mr. Guerrero to lead the revamped market's 51 members reflects his success as a partner in one of Spain's leading brokerage companies, Asesores Bursatiles, in which New York-based American International Group Inc. took an indirect stake of 30% in 1988.  It also illustrates a generational change.  All three previous exchange chairmen were in their fifties.  Not only Mr. Guerrero but also Luis Carlos Croissier, chairman of the new National Stock Exchange Commission, which is to supervise the new securities market, are in their thirties.  In 1984, Mr. Guerrero and another young stockbroker, Ignacio Garralda, teamed with Salvador Garcia Atance, a civil servant specializing in trade matters, to set up a brokerage for foreign institutions wishing to invest in Spain: Asesores Bursatiles.  The firm quickly took a leading place in the Spanish market.  Last year, Asesores accounted for just over 5% of total volume on the Madrid exchange, four-fifths of it from foreign investors.  Current market changes coincide with a lull in the market.  After a surge earlier this year, share prices have slipped following the government's effort to rein economic growth.  Daily trading volumes have fallen to between five billion pesetas and P6 billion ($42 million and $50 million) from around P15 billion ($126 million) a day in April.  Mr. Guerrero says he is optimistic, given Spain's strong growth.  One of his aims will be extending computerized trading, introduced in April using the Toronto Stock Exchange's CATS system and now covering 23 shares and 22% of volume.  Coinciding with the lull, shares on the computerized market have suffered.  Mr. Guerrero says this partly reflects a learning process.  Volumes are expected to increase as such companies as Repsol S.A., Spain's state-controlled oil group join the computerized market.  By the end of 1989, Mr. Guerrero says, he expects the computerized market to cover 50% of volume.  A main challenge will be improving the stock market's image.  Many family owned companies have shunned the exchange for fear of disclosure requirements and fiscal constraints a listing implies.  Institutional investors are few, and many small private investors have been driven away after burning their fingers in downturns.  To help increase public awareness of the exchange, Mr. Guerrero plans to campaign for more firms to list their shares.  Through it all, Mr. Guerrero stressed that the exchange requires a sensible approach, adding, "This isn't a casino."  The growth of the U.S. economy slowed considerably in the second quarter, the Commerce Department said, easing fears of inflation but stopping short of indicating a downturn.  Second-quarter estimates showed that real gross national product -- the total output of goods and services, adjusted for inflation -- rose at a 1.7% annual rate.  That is much smaller than the revised 3.7% rate of the first quarter, but the slowdown isn't as drastic as the numbers suggest.  The government attributes 2.2 percentage points of the first-quarter growth to a return to near-normal output levels for crops and livestock affected by last year's drought.  "It is not a knockdown blow for the economy," said Campbell Harvey, an economist with Duke University.  Other economists agreed, and many said that this latest measure of the economy is a direct effect of the Federal Reserve's economic restraint policies initiated over a year ago.  The Fed recently relaxed its clamp on credit amid concern that the economy might slow to the point where it could topple into a recession.  Some have worried that the central bank reversed course too late.  But many economists seemed to regard the latest GNP report as solid evidence that the economy is headed for a "soft landing," a period of slow but sustained growth that will ease inflation without bringing on a recession.  Michael Boskin, President Bush's chief economic adviser, told reporters: "We believe the economy will continue to do well.  We believe that modest growth will continue."  But for now, inflation remains high.  The annual rate of inflation, as measured by a broad GNP-based index that gauges the prices of a fixed basket of goods and services, increased to 5.2% annual rate during the second quarter, up from a 4.6% rate in the first quarter.  Increases in food and energy prices accounted for much of the rise, the report said.  At the same time, another measure of inflation that reflects changes in the mixture of goods and services in the GNP grew at an annual rate of 4.9% compared with 4.0% in the first quarter.  Economists say there is often a substantial lag from when the economy slows to when inflation begins to taper.  But Michael Darby, undersecretary of commerce for economic affairs, was optimistic about reducing inflationary pressure very soon.  "Recent monthly price data . . . strongly suggest that the peak rate of inflation is now behind us.  From here on, we expect that inflation will slow," he said.  Some other economists weren't as optimistic as Mr. Darby.  "I think that is a bit bold," said Donald Straszheim, chief economist of Merrill Lynch Capital Markets in New York.  "We could in fact see the inflation numbers a little bit higher."  But while a slowing economy bodes well for inflation -- because it relaxes demand and other pressures that drive up prices -- it could be devastating for the budget deficit.  The Bush administration is counting on the economy to grow 2.9% this year so that the government can bring in enough tax revenue to meet deficit-reduction targets required by the Gramm-Rudman law.  But many economists expect the economy's pace to be even weaker in the second half of the year than the first.  In the second quarter, growth in personal consumption continued to slow, increasing at a $7.2 billion annual rate after growing at a $13.3 billion pace in the first period.  Personal income also grew more slowly, as did exports.  But imports jumped, fueled by larger oil shipments.  Business inventories rose at a $22 billion annual rate, but that was $2.5 billion less than the first-quarter rise.  "We have got a lot better handle. . . on inventory management," said Moncure Crowder, executive vice president at First National Bank in Atlanta.  Keeping inventories lean helps protect against recession by lessening the likelihood that businesses will have to cut back on orders -- and factories on production -- to get rid of stock.  In a separate report, the department said GNP growth between 1985 and 1988 was stronger than previously estimated, averaging 3.6% a year rather than 3.3%.  A major factor in the revision was that exports averaged 2.1% higher over the period than previously estimated, good news for the nation's trade deficit.  "The combination of those things leaves the level of GNP substantially above where we thought it was," Mr. Boskin said.  One of the most striking revisions in the GNP numbers was the one for 1988, a year when economists were concerned that the economy was growing too rapidly to head off inflation.  Growth during the year was revised to 4.4% from the initial calculation of 3.9%, the strongest annual rate of expansion since 1984.  Lesser increases in imports, decreases in nonfarm inventory investment and increased nondefense purchases were mainly responsible.  But to some, the revisions were mainly historical footnotes.  "There is little importance in these numbers being released except to make the current slowdown that much more dramatic," said Alan Gayle, chief economist at Crestar Financial Corp.  No changes were made in the inflation estimates for the period, which averaged 3.7%.  Here are some of the major components of the gross national product expressed in seasonally adjusted annual rates in billions of constant (1982) dollars:  @ Qtr.  Qtr.  @ 1989 1989  @ GNP ................................ 4,123.9 4,106.8  @ less: inventory chng ............. 22.0 24.5  @ equals: final sales .............. 4,101.9 4,082.3  @ Components of Final Sales  @ Personal Consumption ............. 2648.2 2641.0  @ Nonresidential Invest. ........... 510.2 501.0  @ Residential Invest. .............. 188.6 195.6  @ Net Exports ...................... -52.6 -55.0  @ Gov't Purchases .................. 807.6 799.7  In the second quarter, the implicit price deflator rose to 4.9% of the 1982 average, from 4.0% in the previous quarter.  Pacific Enterprises, a utility and retail holding company, said second-quarter net income rose 10% to $53 million, or 78 cents a share.  The Los Angeles company cited a 5.3% rise in its natural-gas rates, along with increased sales of other fuels to large-volume customers.  Per-share earnings were unchanged from a year ago because of an increase in shares outstanding to 64.2 million from 59.3 million.  Revenue increased 19% to $1.5 billion.  Net income for the first six months rose 3.5%, to $120 million, or $1.80 a share, on a 22% increase in revenue, to $3.4 billion.  Pacific Enterprises owns Southern California Gas, a large utility; Thrifty Corp., a drug and sporting goods retailing chain, and Enterprises Oil Co., an independent oil and gas concern.  France's Groupe Victoire said it reached an agreement in principle to take control of West Germany's second-largest insurer, Colonia Versicherung AG, in a move that marks a further consolidation in the European insurance industry.  Under an agreement unveiled yesterday, Victoire plans to set up a new holding company that would take over the roughly 60% stake in Colonia held by the Sal.  Oppenheim Jr. & Cie. banking group.  Victoire would own about 70% of the holding company, which also would include Victoire's non-French assets, and Oppenheim would retain a minority stake, sources said.  The value of the transaction wasn't disclosed, and several details of the accord, such as how it will be financed, remain unclear.  "We had to carry out this transaction quickly, and now we have to study the financing," one Victoire official said last night.  But one person with knowledge of the transaction values it at about 15 billion francs ($2.37 billion) -- making it one of the biggest acquisitions ever of a West German company.  The source said the price is "not cheap," and said the acquisition could require a hefty capital increase for Victoire.  But he said that this wouldn't be an immediate problem because the agreement calls for part of the payment to be delayed.  Despite the cost, analysts and financial sources hail the accord as a good move for Victoire.  In a recent study of European insurance groups, analysts at Paribas Capital Markets in London had described Victoire as badly positioned to face the 1992 lowering of internal barriers within the European Community because of its small international presence.  Victoire had been trying for several years to join forces with a major European insurance group.  Last year, it came close to an alliance with Britain's Royal Insurance PLC, but the proposed transaction fell through because of fears that Victoire would hold too dominant a role.  Now, in one swoop, Victoire will more than double in size and move up from fifth place to second place among French insurers, behind Union des Assurances de Paris.  The new holding company will have premiums of about 50 billion francs and will manage assets totaling 150 billion francs, making it Europe's sixth-largest insurer.  "We had been looking for a European alliance for a long time to jump from being a middle-sized French company to a middle-sized European company," said a Victoire official.  "We're finally achieving this."  Michael Lindsay, an insurance analyst at Paribas Capital Markets in London, said, "Victoire was a very French-oriented company: 80% of its premiums and its profits came from France.  It was a French company sitting in a corner of Europe while others were building up European groups."  Even more significant to some analysts is that Victoire managed to make its move into West Germany, which is widely regarded as the most difficult European market to penetrate, particularly in financial services.  "What's exceptional is the nationality of the group they're acquiring," one financial source said.  "A lot of people have been moving into Italy or Spain, but West Germany is another matter."  Victoire was helped by a long and close business relationship with Colonia.  Victoire, which is jointly controlled by Cie.  Industrielle, run by financier Jean-Marc Vernes, and Cie.  Financiere de Suez, had total premiums in 1988 of 18.9 billion francs ($2.99 billion) and posted net consolidated profit of 1.47 billion francs ($232.7 million).  The Colonia group had total 1988 premiums of about nine billion marks ($4.82 billion) and profits of about 120 million marks ($64.3 million), according to sources close to Victoire.  This makes it West Germany's second largest insurance group behind Allianz AG. Colonia officials were unavailable for comment last night.  The transaction reflects Oppenheim's desire to focus more on banking and less on insurance.  It also is part of a broad restructuring.  Oppenheim said it will convert to a limited partnership this year and plans to raise its paid-in capital to one billion marks from 200 million marks by drawing from reserves.  Great American Management & Investment Inc. said it reached an agreement to acquire all Jepson Corp. shares outstanding for $12 a share, or about $222 million.  The Chicago-based financial services concern said that Robert S. Jepson Jr., chairman, chief executive officer and principal shareholder of Jepson, and certain members of his family, have agreed to sell their 69% stake, or 12,748,590 shares of Jepson's common stock to Great American.  In July 1988, Jepson, a holding company based in Elmhurst, Ill., which has interests in consumer, commerical and industrial products, hired an investment banker to advise it on a possible sale of the company.  Great American said it expects to begin a tender offer for Jepson's 18.5 million common shares on Aug. 2.  Royal Insurance PLC of the United Kingdom said it agreed to purchase a controlling interest in the Italian insurance firm Lloyd Italico from Italy's Fondiaria Group for #99 million ($164.8 million).  Fondiaria will retain a 10% stake in Lloyd Italico.  Royal has been attempting to boost its limited presence in continental Europe, partly to offset its overreliance on unprofitable U.S. insurance operations.  The following were among yesterday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ CORPORATES  Memorex Telex Corp. -- a two-part issue of notes was priced late Wednesday.  A $400 million issue of senior guaranteed notes, due Aug. 1, 1996, was priced at par to yield 13.25%.  The notes are noncallable for five years.  The sinking fund feature on the bonds is expected to produce an average life of 6.5 years.  A $155 million issue of senior variable-rate guaranteed notes, also due Aug. 1, 1996, also was priced.  The rate will be reset quarterly at 300 basis points over the three-month London interbank offered rate.  The variable-rate notes are callable on any payment date with 30 days notice.  The sinking fund feature on the variable-rate notes is also expected to produce an average life of 6.5 years.  Rated single-B-1 by Moody's Investors Service Inc. and single-B-plus by Standard & Poor's Corp., the two-part issue will be sold through underwriters led by Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.  General Motors Acceptance Corp. -- $400 million of 8.4% noncallable notes due Aug. 1, 1993, priced at 99.932 to yield 8.42%.  Rated double-A-3 by Moody's and double-A-minus by S&P, the issue will be sold through underwriters led by Morgan Stanley & Co.  The issuer is a unit of General Motors Corp.  Panhandle Eastern Pipe Line Co. -- $300 million of senior subordinated reset debentures, due Aug. 1, 2001, priced with an 11 5/8% coupon at par.  Rated Ba-3 by Moody's and double-B-minus by S&P, the issue will be sold through Kidder, Peabody & Co.  The interest rate will be reset each Aug. 1 beginning in 1991 to an annual rate 385 basis points above the rate on the greatest of the one-year, two-year or five-year Treasury note.  The rate will not be reset below 11.625% or higher than 14.125%.  The issuer is a unit of Panhandle Eastern Corp.  Hyster-Yale Materials Handling Inc. -- $200 million of 12 3/8% senior subordinated debentures due Aug. 1, 1999, priced at par.  The debentures are noncallable for three years.  Rated single-B-1 by Moody's and single-B-plus by S&P, the issue will be sold through Goldman, Sachs & Co.  Household Finance Corp. -- $100 million of 8.4% noncallable notes, due Aug. 3, 1994, priced at 99.839 to yield 8.44%.  The issue was priced at 72 basis points over the Treasury five-year note.  Rated single-A-1 by Moody's and double-A-minus by S&P, the issue was won in competitive bidding by underwriters led by Goldman Sachs.  The issuer is a unit of Household International Inc.  @ MUNICIPALS  Jacksonville Electric Authority, Fla. -- $75 million of electric system revenue bonds, Series Three 1989-A, due 1991-2007, 2009, 2012 and 2019, through a Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. group.  The bonds, rated double-A by Moody's and S&P, were priced to yield from 5.90% in 1991 to 7% in 2019.  Serial bonds were priced to yield to 6.90% in 2006 and 2007.  Term bonds due 2009 have a 6 7/8% coupon and were priced at 99 1/4 to yield 6.94%.  Term bonds due 2012 have a 6 7/8% coupon and were priced at 98 3/4 to yield 6.98%.  And term bonds due 2019 have a 6.9% coupon and were priced at 98 5/8 to yield 7%.  Austin, Texas -- $65.8 million of combined utility systems revenue bonds, Series 1989, through a First Boston Corp. group.  The bonds, insured and rated triple-A by Moody's and S&P, were priced to yield from 6.10% in 1991 to 6.95% in 2003.  The $11.2 million of bonds due 2008 and $41.8 million due 2019 weren't formally reoffered.  @ MORTGAGES  Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp. -- $500 million of Remic mortgage securities being offered in 12 classes by Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  The offering, Series 77, is backed by Freddie Mac 8 1/2% securities and brings Freddie Mac's 1989 Remic issuance to $19.6 billion and its total issuance to $33.6 billion since the program began in February 1988.  @ EUROBONDS  Kubota Ltd. (Japan) -- $300 million of bonds due Aug. 17, 1993, with equity-purchase warrants, indicating a 4 1/4% coupon at par, via Nomura International Ltd.  Each $5,000 bond carries one warrant, exercisable from Sept. 1, 1989, through Aug. 10, 1993, to buy company shares at an expected premium of 2 1/2% to the closing share price when terms are fixed Aug. 3.  Sankyo Aluminium Industry Co. (Japan) -- $150 million of bonds due Aug. 24, 1993, with equity-purchase warrants, indicating a 4 3/8% coupon at par, via Daiwa Europe Ltd. Guaranteed by Hokuriku Bank.  Each $5,000 bond carries one warrant, exercisable from Sept. 7, 1989, to Aug. 10, 1993, to buy company shares at an expected premium of 2 1/2% to the closing share price when terms are fixed Aug. 2.  JDC Corp. (Japan) -- $100 million of bonds due Aug. 24, 1993, with equity-purchase warrants, indicating a 4 3/8% coupon at par, via Nikko Securities Co. Europe.  Guaranteed by Mitsui Trust & Banking.  Each $5,000 bond carries one warrant, exercisable from Sept. 7, 1989, through Aug. 3, 1993, to buy company shares at an expected premium of 2 1/2% to the closing share price when terms are fixed Aug. 2.  Tsumura & Co. (Japan) -- $100 million of bonds due Aug. 24, 1993, with equity-purchase warrants, indicating a 4 3/8% coupon at par, via Nikko Securities Co. Europe.  Each $5,000 bond carries one warrant, exercisable from Sept. 4, 1989, through Aug. 17, 1993, to buy company shares at an expected premium of 2 1/2% to the closing share price when terms are fixed Aug. 2.  Also, 100 million marks of bonds with equity-purchase warrants, indicating a 1 7/8% coupon due Aug. 24, 1994, and priced at par, via DG Bank Deutsche Genossenesschaftsbank.  Guaranteed by Mitsubishi Bank.  Each 5,000 mark bond carries two warrants.  The first is exercisable from Sept. 18, 1989, through Aug. 4, 1992, and the second from Sept. 18, 1989, through Aug. 4, 1994, to buy company shares at an expected premium of 2 1/2% to the closing share price when terms are fixed Aug. 2.  Student Loan Marketing Association (U.S.) -- #100 million of 11% bonds due Aug. 16, 1994, priced at 101.70 to yield 11.05% less full fees, via Samuel Montagu & Co. Fees 1 7/8.  MetLife Funding Inc. -- #120 million of 11 7/8% bonds due Aug. 17, 1992, priced at 101 3/8 to yield 11.88% less full fees, via Credit Suisse First Boston.  Support agreement from Metropolitan Life Insurance Co. Fees 1 3/8.  Eksportfinans A/S (Norway) -- 150 million Canadian dollars of 10 1/8% bonds due Aug. 25, 1994, priced at 101 7/8 to yield 10.13% less full fees, via IBJ International Ltd. Fees 1 7/8.  Eurofima (agency) -- 125 million European currency units of 8 5/8% bonds due Sept. 1, 1999, priced at 101 1/2 to yield 8.70% less full fees, via Bankers Trust International.  Fees 2.  Deutsche Girozentrale-Deutsche Kommunalbank (W.  Germany) -- 500 million French francs of 8 3/4% bonds due Aug. 23, 1996, priced at 101 1/2 to yield 8.82% less full fees, via Credit Lyonnais.  Fees 1 7/8.  Dresdner Bank Berlin (W.  German parent) -- 40 million Australian dollars of 15% bonds due Aug. 17, 1993, priced at 102 to yield 14.91% less full fees, via Dresdner Bank Luxembourg.  Fees 1 3/4.  Nippei Toyama Corp. (Japan) -- 90 million Swiss francs of privately placed convertible notes due March 31, 1994, with indicated 0.25% coupon at par via Yamaichi Bank (Switzerland).  Put option Sept. 30, 1991, at indicated 108 1/2 to yield 4.16%.  Each 50,000 Swiss franc note convertible from Sept. 5, 1989, to March 19, 1994, at 5% premium over the closing share price Aug. 3, when terms are fixed.  Tsubakimoto Machinery & Engineering Co. (Japan) -- 50 million Swiss francs of privately placed convertible notes due Sept. 30, 1993, with an indicated 0.25% coupon at par via Nomura Bank Switzerland.  Put option Sept. 30, 1991, at indicated 108 3/8 to yield 4.09%.  Each 50,000 Swiss franc note convertible from Sept. 5, 1989, to Sept. 16, 1993, at a 5% premium over closing share price Aug. 2, when terms scheduled to be fixed.  Yuasa Funashoku Co. (Japan) -- 70 million Swiss francs of privately placed notes with attached equity purchase warrants and convertible notes in two parts via Banca della Svizzera Italiana.  First part is 40 million Swiss francs of notes due Aug.23, 1994, with equity-purchase warrants, carrying a fixed 3% coupon at par.  Guaranteed by Industrial Bank of Japan.  Definitive terms and conditions of the notes and warrants fixed Aug. 2.  Convertible note portion is 30 million Swiss francs with fixed 0% coupon issued at par and maturing May 31, 1994.  Put option fixed May 31, 1991, at 106 15/16 to yield 3.86%.  Conversion period Sept. 6, 1989, to May 24, 1994.  The bond market bounced out of a two-week period of ho-hum trading yesterday as it became clear that the Federal Reserve is easing credit and that the economy is growing weaker.  The Treasury's 30-year bond rose nearly one point, or $10 for every $1,000 face amount, while its yield fell to 8.02%.  Yields on some intermediate-term bonds, especially those with five-year maturities, fell to the lowest level in several years.  "Trading was very heavy," says James Capra, a senior vice president at Shearson Lehman Government Securities Inc.  That was a welcome change for bond salesmen who have complained about the slow pace of trading activity in recent weeks.  Michael J. Moore, manager of government trading at Continental Bank in Chicago, says widespread speculation that Fed easing will continue -- although perhaps not right away -- brought bond buyers of all stripes into the market.  The Fed sent strong signals Wednesday that it had eased credit by allowing the closely watched federal funds rate to drift lower.  The rate, which banks charge each other on overnight loans, averaged 9%, down from its range earlier this month of 9 1/4%.  Yesterday, the rate drifted as low as 8 15/16%, but averaged about 9%.  In response to the decline, a few more banks lowered their prime lending rate.  The largest to do so was NCNB National Bank, an NCNB Corp. unit, which lowered the rate to 10.5% from 11%, matching Chase Manhattan Bank's July 10 cut.  In the futures market, traders say there were signs that investor sentiment has moved from cautiously bullish to strongly bullish in just one week.  "We saw a really big jump in volume of bond futures trading, double what it was at the beginning of the week," says Richard L. Sandor, senior vice president of financial futures and options at Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. "When you find prices moving up on extremely large volume, that is a sign" that a lot of people believe interest rates will continue to fall.  Meanwhile, investors bid aggressively for the $9 billion of new one-year Treasury bills at yesterday's government auction.  The average rate on the new bills was 7.22%.  That was down from 7.58% at the previous 52-week bill auction on June 29 and was the lowest rate since 7.04% at the June 30, 1988 auction.  The bond market got off to a strong start after the Commerce Department reported that gross national product grew at a seasonally adjusted annual rate of 1.7% in the second quarter.  That was down from 3.7% in the first quarter.  Also contributing to the gains was news of a sharp rise in initial claims for state unemployment insurance.  "That piece of news suggests that the employment numbers coming out next week will be weaker," says Mr. Capra, refering to the July employment report set to be released next Friday.  Treasury Securities  Treasury bonds ended higher in heavy trading.  The benchmark 30-year bond was quoted late yesterday at a price of 109 16/32 compared with 108 18/32 Wednesday.  The latest 10-year notes were quoted at 108 6/32 compared with 107 13/32 Wednesday.  The issue's yield fell to 7.88%.  Among short-term rates, the latest three-month Treasury bills were quoted at a discount rate of 7.91% for a bond equivalent yield of 8.16%.  The latest six-month Treasury bills were quoted at a discount rate of 7.56% for a bond equivalent yield of 7.95%.  Here are details of Treasury's one-year Treasury bill auction yesterday:  Rates are determined by the difference between the purchase price and face value.  Thus, higher bidding narrows the investor's return while lower bidding widens it.  The percentage rates are calculated on a 360-day year, while the coupon equivalent yield is based on a 365-day year.  @ 52-Week  @ Applications .......................... $31,640,910,000  @ Accepted bids ......................... $9,036,600,000  @ Accepted at low price ................. 50%  @ Accepted noncompetitively ............. $550,140,000  @ Average price (Rate) .................. 92.700 (7.22%)  @ High price (Rate) ..................... 92.720 (7.20%)  @ Low price (Rate) ...................... 92.700 (7.22%)  @ Coupon equivalent ..................... 7.75%  The bills are dated Aug. 3 and mature Aug. 2, 1990.  Corporate Issues  Investment-grade corporate bonds ended 1/2 point higher in moderate trading.  Public Service Co. of New Hampshire's bonds soared on news that Northeast Utilities made a $1.9 billion bid for the financially troubled utility.  Northeast Utilities said the bulk of the offer, $1.62 billion, would be paid as cash to creditors.  PS New Hampshire's 14 3/8% debentures due 1991 jumped 8 1/8 points to 82 7/8 while its 15% debentures due 2003 gained 6 points to close at 82.  Foreign Bonds  Eurobonds bounced up following the U.S. gross national product report, ending 1/4 to 3/8 point higher.  Elsewhere:  -- British government bonds, bolstered by the pound's strength and technical factors, rose 3/8 point.  The Treasury's 11 3/4% bond due 2003/2007 closed at 115 13/32 to yield 9.67%, while the 11 3/4% notes due 1991 closed at 100 5/32 to yield 11.58%.  -- West German government bonds were unchanged to slightly higher.  Bonn's 7% bond due February 1999 ended at 102.42 to yield 6.64% while the 6 1/2% notes due 1999 ended at 99.40 to yield 6.65%.  -- Japanese government bonds ended slightly softer.  The benchmark No. 111 4.6% bonds due 1998 closed at a price of 96.74, down 0.05 yen per 100 yen face value.  The yield rose slightly to 5.135%.  Mortgage-Backed Issues  Mortgage securities rose 10/32 to 15/32 point.  Ginnie Mae's 9% issue for August delivery ended at 99 2/32, up 15/32, and its 9 1/2% issue closed at 101 1/32, up 14/32.  Freddie Mac's 9 1/2% issue was at 99 30/32, up 10/32.  Municipal Issues  Municipal bonds closed unchanged to 3/8 point higher.  General Motors Corp. and Ford Motor Co. began showing the effects of the slumping U.S. car and truck market as GM's net income fell 3.5% in the second quarter, Ford's dropped 15%, and sales at both increased only modestly.  However, the results, which were in line with analysts' expectations, may be the best the world's two largest auto makers will see for the rest of this year.  In the second half, both companies are expected to feel the brunt of lower production and temporary plant closings caused by slow sales.  "There was overbuilding in the fourth quarter {of 1988} and the first quarter {of 1989} and now we're all trying to work our way out of that," said David N. McCammon, Ford's vice president and treasurer.  "I would hope that by the fourth quarter we will have worked our way out of excess inventory."  GM reported its net dropped to $1.45 billion, or $2.23 a share, from $1.51 billion, or $2.26 a share, a year earlier.  The No. 1 auto maker achieved record quarterly sales in the period of $33.6 billion.  But it was only a 1.3% improvement over the $33.18 billion in revenue the year before.  Meanwhile, Ford's net income fell to $1.41 billion, or $3 a share, compared with the 1988 second quarter, when it reported record quarterly net income of $1.66 billion, or $3.43 a share.  The earnings decline was Ford's first in 12 consecutive quarters, dating back to the second quarter of 1986.  The drop occurred despite a 3.8% increase in sales to $25.89 billion from $24.96 billion a year earlier.  "We think we had a good second quarter," Mr. McCammon said at a news conference.  But he added, "We can't have every year be over trend.  We have to expect there will be downs as well as ups in this business."  GM executives, meanwhile, were cheered that their earnings declined far less than Ford's on a percentage basis.  Between 1986 and 1988 Ford regularly earned more than GM despite being a much smaller company, but now GM has out-earned Ford for three of the past four quarters.  GM also showed slight improvement in its operating profit margin, while Ford's declined.  Still, Ford continues to operate more efficiently than GM, earning 5.5 cents on every dollar of sales during the second quarter, compared with GM's 4.8 cents.  Ford earned 9.7 cents on each dollar of sales overseas, but only 3.2 cents on the dollar in the U.S. GM didn't break out its results by region.  Most analysts expected both companies to report flat earnings for the second quarter.  Estimates for GM ranged from $1.18 billion, or $1.95 a share, to $1.6 billion, or $2.35 a share.  Analysts predicted Ford would earn between $1.3 billion, or $2.80 a share, and $1.5 billion, or $3.20 a share.  By winding up squarely within the forecasts, neither company's stock moved much in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange.  GM common shares rose 37.5 cents to $45.125 a share, while Ford shares climbed 37.5 cents to $50.125 a share.  Several analysts, however, cautioned that the second quarter may be a prelude to even worse earnings for the rest of this year.  "Things are definitely going to get worse before they get better," says John A. Casesa, an analyst with Wertheim Schroder & Co.  "I see overcapacity and oversupply of vehicles as the issues that will keep driving profit margins down."  As has been the case for the past couple of years, strong overseas results helped the two auto makers overcome the effects of slower production, weaker sales and heavier incentives in the U.S.  GM said its overseas factory sales increased 7.2% from a year earlier, while its U.S. car and truck sales dropped 4.8%.  Ford said its automotive profit outside the U.S. increased $54 million to $775 million, while overseas factory car and truck sales increased 9.3%.  Ford's U.S. auto profit fell 37% to $459 million, cutting Ford's overall automotive profit to $1.2 billion, a drop of $213 million from a year earlier.  Officials from both companies said higher buyer incentives were a heavy burden on their results.  Mr. McCammon of Ford said the cost of incentives reached $700 to $800 a vehicle in the quarter, an increase of $200 to $300 a vehicle from a year earlier.  GM officials declined to specify their incentive costs.  Ford also greatly expanded its capital expenditures to increase capacity in its assembly plants and develop new products, including new engines and transmissions that will better compete with Japanese technology.  To fund those projects, Ford poured $1.63 billion into automotive capital expenditures, or 55% more than it did in the 1988 second quarter.  The capital spending helped eat into Ford's deep cash reserves.  After reaching a peak of $10.29 billion in the 1988 second quarter, Ford's reserves fell to $7.8 billion in the latest period.  The company also dipped into the reserves to reduce its debt to $2.2 billion from $3.16 billion a year earlier.  That cut Ford's debt-to-equity ratio to a low 10% from 15.8% a year ago.  Mr. McCammon also said Ford used some of its cash to repurchase $1.5 billion of its stock under a $2 billion buy-back program launched in September 1987.  Higher interest rates hurt the results from Ford's financial-services operations.  The company said earnings from that segment of its business declined nearly 20% to $173 million.  Interest expenses from the financial-services group jumped nearly 50% to $2.1 billion.  For the first half, GM had net income of $3 billion, or $4.60 a share, compared with $2.6 billion, or $3.82 a share in the first six months of 1988.  The year-ago first-half results included an accounting-change gain of $218.1 million, or 35 cents a share.  GM's sales for the first half were $59.63 billion, compared with $56.34 billion a year ago.  Ford's first-half net income was $3.04 billion, or $6.45 a share, compared with $3.29 billion, or $6.74 a share.  Ford's first-half sales increased to $51.76 billion from $48.15 billion a year earlier.  Dairy Mart Convenience Stores Inc. said that First National Bank of Boston suspended up to $80 million in senior bank financing that had been committed for the proposed acquisition of the company by a management-led group.  The Enfield, Conn., convenience store chain said the financing was suspended because the bank viewed the company's recent operating performance as a material adverse change under the terms of the commitment letter.  Dairy Mart had a loss of $1.3 million for the first quarter ended April 29, compared with net income of $928,000, or 21 cents a share, in the year-earlier period.  The latest quarter included a non-recurring charge of $800,000 for restructuring costs, while the year-earlier period included a nonrecurring pretax gain of $2.9 million.  The management-led group is working with the bank to gain reinstatement of the commitment.  Dairy Mart agreed to be acquired by the group for $15 a share, or about $63 million.  Octel Communications Corp., Milpitas, Calif., said fiscal fourth-quarter earnings rose 57%, and announced plans to sell 1.5 million common shares.  Octel, citing "good results selling our voice-processing line to large corporate customers," said profit for the quarter, ended June 30, was $3.3 million, or 21 cents a share, compared with $2.1 million, or 15 cents a share, a year earlier.  Revenue rose 63% to $25.9 million from $15.9 million.  The company said profit for fiscal 1989 rose 71% to $11.8 million, or 78 cents a share, from $6.9 million, or 54 cents a share, a year earlier.  Revenue rose 82% to $87.2 million.  Octel also said it filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on a proposed offering of 1.5 million common shares, scheduled for next month.  Octel's systems are used in conjunction with providing voice-mail, answering-machine and other telephone services.  In national over-the-counter trading, Octel closed at $24.50, down 12.5 cents.  The Senate approved an $18.4 billion energy and water bill providing the first construction funds for the superconducting supercollider and accelerating spending for the cleanup of defense nuclear wastes and research on global warming.  Final approval came last night on a simple voice vote, hours after the chamber adopted a separate $44.25 billion agriculture bill incorporating an 10% increase in federal nutrition aid for poor, pregnant women and their children.  Both measures cover the fiscal year beginning Oct. 1, and the back-to-back votes reflect the rush of spending legislation as Congress moves toward its August recess.  A half-dozen fiscal 1990 bills are slated for consideration in the House next week, and rules were waived yesterday to allow a House vote today on a Treasury bill carrying an amendment to block the enforcement of new tax rules governing employee benefit plans.  The Senate energy bill allocates $225 million -- $25 million more than the House -- for the Texas supercollider.  But this is a modest down payment for the massive atom-smasher facility, where annual costs are expected to more than triple from that $225 million level as construction gets under way.  Among other research projects, the Senate restored most of a House cut and funded magnetic fusion programs at $330.4 million.  But the more striking initiative was a proposal by Sen. Bennett Johnston (D., La.) to more than double the administration request and provide $52 million for the study of global warming.  An estimated $3.15 billion is provided for the Corps of Engineers, but water projects represent a declining share of the bill.  More than half the total appropriations will go to nuclear weapons activities, and this spending is driven less now by military buildup than the immense cost of cleaning up weapons facilities.  More than $1.57 billion is provided for defense waste and environmental restoration accounts, and though less than the House allocation, it is still more than 60% above current funding.  The rush of spending legislation makes the bills attractive targets for high-profile amendments.  It was only after protracted debate yesterday that the Senate was able to sidestep an effort to embroil the energy bill in a fight over the fate of the Medicare catastrophic health insurance act.  The rider, which would have delayed implementation of a surtax for one year, was sidetracked by a 58-40 roll call on a procedural motion.  But the House has been effectively overwhelmed by the small-business lobby seeking to use the appropriations process to block new tax rules scheduled to take effect Oct. 1.  The so-called Section 89 tax provisions were intended to prevent discrimination in benefit plans, but business interests insist the required procedures are too burdensome.  The Treasury has delayed the effective date once already, and though House tax writers are proposing their own solution to the problem, pressure has continued for outright repeal.  Amid this maneuvering, the power of individual appropriators is often enhanced.  Attached to the Senate agriculture bill yesterday is a $2 million amendment for grants to statewide public television systems in rural states -- a proposal authored by subcommittee chairman Sen. Quentin Burdick (D., N.D.) and designed to assist the Prairie Public Television network in his home state.  A more costly amendment to the energy and water bill directs the Interior Department to use $15 million from the appropriated funds "to compensate" the Strawberry Water Users Association in Utah.  The provision was inserted by Sen. Jake Garn (R., Utah) as part of a land settlement with the association, a well-connected and established irrigation group representing about 1,500 users.  Mr. Garn has argued that the payment amounts to far less after taxes, but the price being paid has been questioned by critics, and the appraisal is the subject of a General Accounting Office inquiry.  Speculators betting on a wave of pharmaceutical industry mergers sent the prices of drug company stocks soaring.  With Bristol-Myers Co.'s agreement to acquire Squibb Corp. -- the drug industry's third major merger in less than a year -- Wall Street has, for the moment, become convinced that bigger is better.  "The industry is facing a crisis; mergers and consolidation are inevitable," said Hemant Shah, a Warren, N.J.-based analyst.  Warner-Lambert Co., Schering-Plough Corp. and Rorer Group Inc. led the list of potential targets compiled by traders and analysts.  Also mentioned were Pfizer Inc., Syntex Corp. and Upjohn Co. Share prices of all those companies started rising Wednesday, amid rumors that a deal for Squibb was pending, and they picked up steam yesterday.  Drug companies are trading at high prices -- as much as 18 times underlying earnings -- and acquirers would have to pay above current prices.  On fundamental terms, "the group is fully priced," warned David Lippman, an analyst at Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.  If Bristol's agreement to pay 26 times earnings for Squibb is a hint of things to come, some analysts doubt whether mergers will do much for companies on the acquiring side.  Speculators are betting that drug companies will, regardless of price, succumb to a widely held fear that smaller pharmaceutical firms won't survive in the 1990s.  According to this view, only larger firms will be able to afford the increasing costs of drug research, compete on a global scale in the U.S., Europe and Asia, and achieve economies of scale in marketing and distribution.  "The alliance of Bristol and Squibb is going to force companies to make strategic alliances or find themselves in the arms of foreigners," a Wall Street money manager said.  It's just like media company Paramount Communications Inc. "felt looking at Time and Warner," the manager said.  "They don't want to go it alone."  One investment banker familiar with pharmaceutical firms said some companies may make "pricey acquisitions" to keep other drug companies out of the hands of competitors.  "People are actually making billion-dollar acquisitions for defensive reasons," he said.  Potential acquirers are thought to include other drug and chemical companies and consumer-products concerns, both domestic and foreign.  "I don't think there will be a shortage of buyers," one money manager said.  Possible suitors include F. Hoffmann La Roche & Co., Du Pont Co., Ciba-Geigy Ltd., Glaxo Holdings PLC, Merck & Co. and Procter & Gamble Co., traders and analysts say.  They divide the potential targets into two groups: companies with high-margin, high-cost prescription drugs, and those with lower-margin, over-the-counter products.  "There is a great debate," said one industry executive.  "Do you want to risk $100 million developing a drug that would have enormous margins, or spend less on an over-the-counter product that would require greater annual spending on marketing and advertising?"  Prescription drugs are tremendously profitable.  The top 12 U.S. drug companies produce an average return on equity of 29%, according to PaineWebber Group Inc. analyst Ronald Nordmann.  However, these profits are under pressure.  Prescription drugs face increasing competition from generic drugs, an oversupply of distributors, and a shortage of new products.  Drug research costs are rising, and the patents on many existing drugs will expire in the 1990s, putting their manufacturers in a bind.  In addition, surging health-care costs make it likely that third-party payers, such as insurers, will fight to keep down the prices of prescription drugs.  Manufacturers are thus under pressure to consolidate.  Prudential-Bache Securities Inc. analyst Neil Sweig predicts friendly mergers involving stock swaps, as in the Bristol-Squibb merger.  Pfizer, one of the largest drug companies, is suffering from competition from generics, less-than-spectacular research, and patent expirations, analysts say.  Syntex, though highly profitable, is very dependent on a single drug, which treats arthritis and is losing ground to competition.  Upjohn has a good pipeline of new drugs in the offing, but analysts say its biggest current products, tranquilizers and sleeping pills, appear under pressure.  Warner-Lambert and Schering-Plough are coveted for their over-the-counter drugs, as well as for prescription sales.  Over-the-counter drugs, such as Warner-Lambert's Listerine mouthwash, are thought to have franchise value.  "They aren't research intensive, they're marketing intensive," one analyst said.  However, analysts say Warner-Lambert and Schering-Plough are trading at 18 times estimated 1989 earnings, so both will be expensive to acquire.  ---  @ Drug Share Leap  @ YESTERDAY'S TWO-DAY  @ COMPANY CLOSE CHANGE  @ Pfizer .......... 63 3/4 3 7/8  @ Rorer Group ..... 41 1/4 3 5/8  @ Schering-Plough . 75 1/8 4 3/4  @ Upjohn .......... 33 2 3/8  @ Warner-Lambert .. 108 6 3/4  Niagara Mohawk Power Corp. directors took the rare step for a utility of postponing action on the common dividend.  While Wall Street analysts had been expecting the Syracuse, N.Y., electric and gas utility to omit its 30-cent-a-share quarterly payout, Niagara Mohawk effectively put off a decision until the last week of August, when directors plan to meet again.  To meet the scheduled Sept. 30 payout, the dividend must be declared no later than Aug. 31, the company said.  "We're in a holding pattern," said Daniel Scotto of Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette Securities Corp. "Clearly, there is uncertainty on the the part of directors as to whether a dividend can be paid."  Investors, who learned of the company's decision shortly before the market closed yesterday, took it as good news.  After being down for most of the day, Niagara Mohawk common closed at $12.25, up 12.5 cents, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  Volume was heavy at more than 1.2 million shares.  Moody's Investors Service Inc. said it raised its ratings on revenue bonds of this forest products and real estate concern's Kaiser Aluminum & Chemical Corp. unit to Ba-3 from single-B-1.  The rating concern confirmed its single-B-3 rating on the surbordinated debt of Kaiser Aluminum's parent, KaiserTech Ltd.  It also assigned ratings of Ba-3 to KaiserTech's senior notes due 1991 and single-B-2 to other subordinated notes also due 1991.  Moody's said the ratings, its first for KaiserTech, reflect improved operating trends since Maxxam acquired the company in late 1988.  ---  VALLEY NATIONAL Corp. (Phoenix, Ariz.) -- Moody's Investors Service Inc. downgraded $400 million of Valley National's debt, saying the bank holding company hadn't taken adequate write-offs against potential losses on its real estate loans.  Moody's downgraded Valley National's senior debt rating to Ba-3 from Ba-1, and confirmed its commercial paper rating at not prime.  It also lowered the rating on Valley National's Bank of Arizona unit long-term deposits to Baa-3 from Baa-2 and its short-term deposits to Prime-3 from Prime-2.  For the second quarter, Valley National Corp. reported a net loss of $83.2 million and took a $181 million write-down against potential losses on its real estate loans.  Moody's argued that "continued deterioration in the Arizona real estate market is expected to result in higher levels of problem assets at Valley National Bank," and that the second-quarter write-offs weren't large enough.  Richard M. Greenwood, Valley National Corp.'s executive vice president and chief financial officer, said the company believes the write-downs taken are "adequate" and that the company has no plans to take additional reserves.  But Moody's said it expects that "the bank will need to continue reserving at high levels, which will have a negative impact on earnings, capital formation and capital adequacy."  ---  ZALE Corp. -- Standard & Poor's Corp. said it lowered the senior debt ratings of this Irving, Texas, jewelry chain to double-B from double-B-plus and cut the subordinated debt ratings to B-plus from double-B-minus, affecting about $800 million in debt.  The rating concern cited the company's recent $450 million acquisition of Gordon Jewelry Corp. and its increased debt load as the reason for the move.  Zale is owned by Peoples Jewellers Ltd. of Toronto and Swarovski International Holding AG of Switzerland.  Integrated Resources Inc., the cash-strapped real estate and insurance concern, is attempting to placate its restive 4,600-member sales force with offers of an equity stake totaling almost half the firm.  The firm also told its brokers that efforts are being made to shelter at least some Integrated assets from creditors.  Earlier this month, Integrated defaulted on $955 million of its short-term debt and has since proposed a debt restructuring.  Many Integrated brokers say they are having trouble under the current financial cloud selling the firm's insurance, mutual funds, limited partnerships and annuity products to clients.  In a conference phone call to Integrated's sales force yesterday, Gary Krat, president of Integrated's broker-dealer unit, said, "We are working now towards giving 49% of stock ownership to our field force."  The stock distribution would be "at no cost" to the sales force, he added.  The loyalty of Integrated's brokers is vital to the company's future because they are independent contractors paid solely by commission.  Thus, the salespeople are free to sell other companies' competing products.  Mr. Krat told the brokers that "if you cannot work with the name Integrated Resources," brokers may be empowered to sell products under the name of one of several different New York-based companies already set up by Integrated.  Mr. Krat also said the company has formally restructured as of last Friday to bring its broker-dealer unit, Integrated Resources Equity Corp., under its life-insurance holding company.  "Therefore, we are insulated by one more layer of legal protection," he said.  Mr. Krat declined to elaborate on these or other comments.  Mr. Krat said Integrated officials will meet with creditors Aug. 15 and predicted that Integrated's restructuring and refinancing plan would be completed 30 to 40 days later.  In thin trading, Integrated's senior debt is trading at about 40 cents on each dollar of face value.  Subordinated debt is trading at about 16 cents on the dollar.  Mr. Krat said Integrated is continuing to package for sale limited partnerships.  It has introduced two California real estate partnerships in the past 45 days and plans several more real estate investment trusts and equipment-leasing partnerships this fall.  Thirty additional programs, including cable limited partnerships, are under "very serious consideration," he added.  In a question-and-answer session after his address, questions from brokers centered almost exclusively on the possibility of a bankruptcy-law filing by Integrated and on the need to protect brokers' commissions in that event.  "Under a worst-case scenario, can we be assured we would be paid any outstanding commissions?" one broker asked.  Mr. Krat replied, "We still have over $18 million in cash in this broker-dealer, and we're in separate bank accounts" from the parent firm.  Mr. Krat said he is optimistic that the firm won't make a bankruptcy-law filing.  "I assume there will be a sale of the core businesses," such as Integrated's money-management unit, life-insurance related companies and the trust companies, he said. 